      "identifier" : [
         "8_06912_190"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "OCTOBER, 1915 N WINNIPPC CANADA t. y -",
         "Pay for ~ The Piano you buy nowshould give compicte satisfaction f or a lifetimie. Fifty years hence your children and your children's children should bu înjoying it. Buy a Hleintzman \u0026Co. Piano0 and that Nvill Ub fichecase. -The Ileintzmafl roputation isaTot ation buit on long servie-l)er- rnanency of t one, pcrmanency of construction, .pernianecy of finish. Write for descriptive literat tre aind particulars of priccs and terms. 'I I1l-l 1 11 AWo rd o r Two About the Purchase of Your Piano 1uy your Piano as voit -Would a lionse. Look, into the î'eputation of its designer anid luilder, seek thie advice of impartial judges or recoglliiC(l auit1îorities as to thie ý%ortii of thie materials in ;t and tiie quality of t1in w%%orkýmanshiip, ItîacLîOw m)iaiy ycars cf good service it -vill give von - thien conýsider thie price. If y'ou cannlot do thiese thingrs, then protect yourself uîuier thie reputa- tion of a w ehlxîiow n house. THE HOUSE 0F McLEAN for nearli thîrty vear- lia- been sehhling'ever.y instrument entircly -uponi its nierits and(l wit1ha t a teof satis faction w ithi everY sale. A consist- enit poiicy of sirict ly o priglit ilietilois ]lias biuHt lUp thie la rgest 'Musie JJou.se ti tbe \\W.est' ani proviîldti a absolute safeguard for satisfactory piano buy- i ng. Uet ini toucli -withii ie Jliîîse of ?.IelLeani before voit buy. Heintzman \u0026 Co. Piano, Nval mt case, regutlar price $495.00; uow $37500. Heintzman \u0026 Co. Speciai Art Piano, regular price $5,30.00; niow% $475.00, Schaeffer Piano, ebonY casj r'gular price $375.00; now $175 00. Weber Piano, inahogany case, regular jinice $350.0û; now $275.00. Richter Piano, regiular price $400.00; now $280.00. Wormawith Piano, mabilogaoy1\\ case, regular price $425.00; 110w $20500. Crane Piano, w%\\alnut (asv, special $95.00. Write foîýfumrtlir particulaifs and for prices oit -{liiorclî Orgams, 'Musical Instrumuents, Bl ook alid ;-heet -Music, etc. Y mlTe Horne of tire Heiintzman \u0026 Co. Piano and tire 'ictt-oIa Dept. W Xà\u003c Victrol a i a source of veldless pleasure, ani is ever ready to amuse, to entertain andi to educate. The mwnd's great est bands and instruiinvi alists. tlle mnost fanions opera starsthe b popîtiar sîngers anid erittrtainers, are 3-ours to 'comU- malnd and enjoy. If vou wanllt (idance the Victrola is a1hva.ý,S ioady to provide thoneesar \\Ve carry evcr:c style, si/e ani price of Victrola froila $21.00 lop to $30.-).00, soid on easy ternis if desired., Also tule ost complete anid u p-to- date ]ibrarv of brand 110% records ini the West- Anothe Ê'Househo1d Convenience The best tea on1 earth will speedily deteriorate if exposed to air and moisture. The old lead wrappers for tea were good.' But the world mnoves, and a better waY has been found. Heavy parchment, impervious to moi sture, dust-proof, air-tight, now brings tour home in perfect condition. An outer covering of almost impental cartridge-paper makes security doubly sure. No possible deterioration can occur. 'You know IlBLUE'RIBBON TEA\"-the best on the market. Now look for the new packet-a perfect wrapping for a perfect tea. ................................. ... ....... . .. 329 Portage Avenue Winnipeg, Mat",
         "The Western Home Mon thlyý E2~ Sunshine cannat fade them; dust andi dirt can be wiped off instantly with a damp cloth-they cannot crack or, Mpeel, and they can be kept clean ad brght andi beautiful. SANITAS is printesi in ail colors on a strong cloth foundation. It is as lasting as the wallg themselvs- ansi is absalutely hygienic. Over 130 distinctive designs-dull and lazed finishes-whase cambinations ao pst- terns and colars permit the most artistic effects for every raom. See the New MSITAS Designs Ask yaur decarator ta show iyou. If he cannot supply you write las. Identify the genuine by the trade mark on back oi cloth. Permanent SANITAS Exhibit-show- ing suite of roorna done in SANITAS by interior decorators-at Craitsman Home Builders' Exposition, 6 East 39th Street, New York City. THE STANDA D'»IL CLOTH CO., Iaorporated. 320 Braadway, New York, Dept. 12. Send me booklet showng the new SANITAS designs and the naine of the nearest dealer. Namne............................ Address........................... THE MATCH 0F TO-DAY L. the perfected product of over 60 years experi- ence in the mnatch-making business. BED DYS \"'Sient Parlor\"' If correctly held and struck on any rough sur- face, is warrant- d to give a steady clear ight first stroke. The E. B.. EDDY CO. LIMITED HULL, CANADA - nen writing sdvertisers pleas.? men.tionl TWestern Homne Monthly. Vol. XVI Published ManthlyNo10 By the Home Publishing Ca., Ltd,, Winnipeg, Canada. N.10 The Subscription Price ai The Western Home Monthly is $1.00 a year or -- three years for $2.00 ta any address in Canada, or British Isles. . The subscription t 3 to foreign countries is $1.50 a year, and within the City af Winnipeg limits and-- i5in the United States $1.25 a year. Remittances af small sums may be made with safety in ordinary letters. Suma r 1 ofa one dollar or more it would be well to send by registered letter or Money IOrder. Postage Stampa will be received the same as cash for the fractional parts of F a dollar, and in any amaunt when it is impossible for patrons tu procure bis. Change of Address.-Subscribers wishing thejr address changed must state E their former as well as new address. Ail communications relative ta change ai address, must bc received by us not later than the 20th ai the precedisd; month. When Yau Renew be sure ta sign your name exactly the same as it appears - on the label ai your paper. If this is not done it leads ta confusion. If you have recently changed your address and the paper bas been forwardedta you, be sure ta let us know the address on your label 71 ........t.......... 11t 8lm .111 i w l............. . u u . ý M .......u A Chat with Our Readers The month of October usually starta the aubscription ýeason bail rolilng and especiaily so-wiil this be the case this year when an early harvest has been the rule in eary eer loaliy. urng he astyer, he estrnHome Monthly kealizing thatmony ws rthe tiht vry iflngl a~~ t exend subacribera a f ew monta' redi. Te sbscrptin prce f Te Weter Hoe Monthly is, as is well know, sricly ayale n ~dvane-jst s ay ohercomodity is paid for at the tim ofpuchae-nd e hveno ntntin o cangngour business methods in thisrespct. s stted bove howverwe mcle xcepin ithe cases of certain subcrierswhower aniou tokee onrecivig teirfaorite magazine, but whose financial condition did flot warrant paying at that time. We now appeal to those readers to, give us a ready response to our appeal, for subscriptions. By reritting at =n\u0026o show your appreciation i a very tangible manner and mncidentaily gave, us a cratdal of trouble mn having te write you. The months of November'and December are always very bs for the cir- culation department because we have between ten and fifteen thousand subscriptions expiring during the last two months of the year. Some subscribers are considerate enough not to wait until their subseriptions have expired before send.ing in their renewals, but forward us their remittance three or four weeks in advance. je is an' excellent idea. t saves us the necessity and expense of sending out bille and saves you the annoyance of receiving them while it is an iron-clad guarantee that your paper wil not bc stopped. We ask our readers to show us every possible consideration i this respect and we believe that our appeal will not be in vain. We have at the present time under consideration several premiuxs- -some of which will be offered our readers ini due course in return for a certain number of subscriptions. Western Home Monthly premiums always bear the hall-mark of excellence, and this year's offerings will be no exception to the rule. Ke ep your oye on our premium offersl The publishers of this magazine have watched with keen interest the ail round development that has taken place in ail the Western provinces and have endeavored ta keep the publication well advanced in the march of progresa. That we have succeeded ta a somewhat cominendable extent le proved byr the favor and apprecia- tien of over 40,000 subscribers. Yearly they spend their good money freely with us, and the general opinion expressed is that they would not be happy without their favorite magazine. It le now in the seventeenth year of its caxeer, started when the territory which it naw covers so, well, froin the Great Lakes to the Pacifie Coast, waa but very sparsely populated. Even in those days it quickly made its way, and found a place i the affections of ail our people who read the English language. We are told by our canvassing agents that in some districts it le rare to flnd a home that does not receive the magazine, and indeed many of our readers are now paid up to 1916, 17 and 18. We appreciate the fal l a busy season for many of our people, but even while in the midst of work in connection with the harvest many opportunities are accorded aur friends for1 saying a good word for The Western Home Montbly. Some af your neighbars may be reccnt arrivais in your district, and they would appreciate your courtesy in drawing their attention to a magazine which they would really enjoy reading, and which le. essentially a Western magazine, published in the West for Western people. We have not published any appreciations lately but don't think it wus because our subscribers have ceased writing us in a kindly strain. We append a few extracts from recent letters. * I was introduced ta The Western Home Monthly last January, finding it at the house of a friend, who had been taking it for about twelve years. A magzi. as to be pretty good ta stay in a family for that length of time, so I took the copy home with me and decided that-I wanted it too. t was the Christmas number, and everything about it, front the cheery girl oni the cover to the very last page looked good to me.\" III first became acquainted with The Western Home Monthly by receiving a saml)le copy. I got interested in thýe stories and went Io our leafing hook store and asked them ta subscribe for me. 1 think it is thc cleanest, bcst paper I ever read.\" \"When 1 f ef1 you that I wasa subseriber to The Western Home Monthly in 1902 id have t aken it without a lapse ever sinoe, it wil give you sonile idea of my opinion of it. Evcryone who subserihes through me tels me that the quiality of the maga, zinc. amazes themn, and they wonder how it can be issued at the low Jprice asked for 111 flrqt hecame aequainted with The -Western Home Monthly about six years ano Ld s'xer ,ince then if 1 did flot get the' papcr each month 1 should think soine vr'important pairt of my reading mat ter was missing. I intend ta ake The Weste-rn 1home Mo tvthe rest of my days AIl my subscrihers are deighted wif h t Pc iwigazimfe, in 'fac.t 1I(Io not rfmember getting a single' eomflaiflt abolit iV It Ls ncver an)y troulie to g\u003ct renecvaL.''ý ECONOMY la to-day the duty of British people. Eenomy mns pend judiciouely and get value for your mofley. FAIMEECONOM'Y îa to buy a shoddy article simply because the piele l low, it means buying anothes' ta replace it inaa short time snd the garmient lot worth ~UVE ECONOMY in to avoisi extreme fashion, buy a goasi article of saunsi mater- lai, and well made that will ive long wear, continuai comfort and piseure ta the wear- er andi wii look well te the endi;-ac#az mente are worth takinLcarboiand repalrg. JAEGER PUEE WOOL wEAR hua been tested for 33 yeaxs andi bas iven sat- isfaction te thoupands ail over -t he warid. Think ai thfis when you need Underwear andi Knittesi Goads this year. JAEGER G00DB ARE TRUE ECON- OMY. Â fufly illustrated. catalogue andi Dr. Jaeger's 'Heaitb Culture\" wll be ment-hme on application tat - DR. JAEGER \"erv \"CO. -flia MONTRER I ORONTO INNIPEO lneoePoeatd h n lmm. a IM wu DaM 'Wh%= ~çg O~r hIhe New Method Dental Parlors guarantes to complote Deutal Work of any desciption wlih- out pain, or6 urEu» TOUR mONE No porioni too Nervouo No work too Difficuit New uystem Tegth, without plates; crowna, lnla7s, a\u0026l k\"n of fillingi; extractions o ra ny other form of work performed for you 127 the most up-to-date methods. Zamples of our work ubcon inà estlznates given upon roquet. .Offices: Corner Portage and Donald cANADA'S BUT 4ZP MOST UW-TO- DATE DENTJL070 R..L E I(fT ýJ - M AIT I munowpMy'Walls IAre Entirely Satistactory Now 'I",
         "T1x,-Woud Cai pr wl P6 lib th, 'an ke fat at foi ho on w]- th( arc w I Ilu h a th; a rei",
         "Thle western Home Mon tl LOOK WITHIN 11 In the current' number of The R ound Table is an e,.ýtract from a letter wripten fromi the trenches at Gallipoli. T'h.i s letter is 50 heart-searching that a quot- tation f rom it shonld be read by every son of the Empire. \"If there i s'9ty possible influence which could be ex- erted to §hcyw the nation at last what it is rcallv fighting for, there might be more hope of a'near end at least something wpnld Le donc. If the nation could realise thýat it is flting not so much against German miii- tarism, or for J3elgiurn, or for anything else, but just against itseif, against ail that which has kept us where we are, instead of the liv- ing Empire we ought to be, there wonld be more hope. Uniess we first cast the beami out of Our own eye it is of no use shrieking at'the size of the mote in the eyeQf another nation, and tintii we do it ail our strugglcs and the heavy price ef manhood -we are pay- ing will really be as Vain as they sometimes appear.\" As an expianation of this some- what pessimistic outburst the writer of the article says: \"If' we are to cxert our ful national strength in the war, we must decide to act much more as if we were an army than as if we xvere free independent citizens, obe- dient as in peace oniy to a iaw of our own choosing. . . . In this war the larger haif of the army is in the mines, the workshops and the fields at home. . . . Eývery sec- tion of the people, at home or in the field, nst carry out that fraction of service which falis to its lot with Ioyaity and determination j to the end.\" Another writer -in the sameý magazine deal- ing with the finan,ýial situation has some- thing to say which puts the possibility of heipful action on the part of every citizen in a .very striking way. \"If evcry man who smbked tobacco in this country were told that by everyone abstaining from smoking fcir a ycar, we couid afford to bny, in order to aid onr cause $40,000,000 more of guns and shelîs, than wc otherwise conld, how niany wonid refuseý If every man, woman and child saved oniy 25 cents a weck, it wdn ld,-amount to $600,000,CJO a year.... If this was to be a war of exhaustion, then that people will win which can bring to its aid the greatest energy, abstinence and en- durancé.\" SOMETHING WRONG It is not necessary to explain why the price of wheat has declined so.suiddenly and with stich amazing swiftness. There are mnany reasons that will explain it, snch as the p6ssibi e opening of the Dardanelles and the liberation of the enormons Ruissian surplus, the phienomenal crop of this year in America and Euirope, the sudden glntting of the mar- ket bv the output of Canadian and American farms.ý The one- outstanding, fact is that there lias been a disastrous collapse of prices at the very last moment. It is impossible for the Western grain grower to understand liOw lie should flot be able to get more than one-haîf the Liverpool price of a busiiel of wheat. Hle assumes that lie is not getting the Iighlest price the market xiii afford, o r hIia le cost of bringying the wheat to inarIket IS altogether too grecat. Botli assumnptionis are ful111V arranted. Thiere is a county to tlue soth of us wliicli this ycar lias an cnoriiîous whlîat crnip. butt w ic!l ivetiee s î. aixiots t (1tai11 1i1l11(lreù(IS of thotusands of buI1eLis Of our llrlrvarieties. *\\ct 1w an iii aane cusis~ n rc '-Llkltion -wc are sliiuf -ont of cxportini' to thi cunftry. The exl)ort cltv is tefl cents a l - I i luother woin-,. i t *SV c ric 1o C i, etue 1arrier to the Imnportation if Editcsrial ''Comment wheat into this country, as asked for by the ,Western grain growers themselves, our grain would automaticalîy be shipped into the United States at a price far exceeding 'that now received. This, however, does flot explain ail. Even if it were permitted to send our- wheat across the border the price received would flot be in right proportion to that paid in Liverpool. The spread between producer and consumer is unwarranted. Insurance, rail and water rates are altogether too high. It may be tlîat the federal and imperial goverriments cannot buy the Western wheat at a fixed price, but they can regulate carrying rates even if it means the building of a new fleet of merchantmen. People are getting tired of the samne oid story-this rake-off by the middiemen. They teli us of a million pairs of boots being ordered for the Russian soldiers, and oniy 10,000 getting to men-in-arrns. AJIl the rest went for rlake off. That story may be a fabrication. Let us hope- so, We' hear of $40,000 going into the gateà and fence of a public building in one of our Western'provinces-when the value was flot more than $6,000 or $8,000. We are told of a poor Ruthenian farmer cutting wood and carrying it to a barge on the lake -for about a dollar a cord. The rate to Winnipeg was 95 cents a cord, and the selling price of the wood between four and five dollars. That is even worse than the Wheat rates. When is the thing going to end? Over in'the Motherland they tell us there is a very serious condition of things. -Young men are saying, \"Why should I go to war? We have no stake in the country, no land, no hiouse, no prospects., Let those fight whô have something to protect.\" 0f course this is a weak argument, for life and honor are more than property. Yet the argument is flot altogether pointless. The surest way to make men patriotic is to give them a stake in the country. Material prosperity counts for something. So, if our farmers are being deprived of their honest dues it is worse than a misfdrtune. It is a crime-a crime that in its time will 'lead to revolution. Surely it is clear as day that tariff sched- ies and public gifts have been for the few rather than for the many. The time has come for a change. The man who does the work should receive a fair amounit of the income. And this applies ail around-to producers- in the shop a well as to pro- ducers on the land. NON-ENLISTMENT On aniotiier page is an. article froni the pen of a mcll-known journalist of Moîîtreai deal- iîîg with the matter of enlistment in the province of Qnebec. Whether he is righit or wrong in his facts and deductions The Western Home Monthiy cannot pretend to ,--ay, not being in close touch with life in the Eastern province. If the article presents tue case tinfairly no doubt the' writer will 1)e corrccted by some of our snbscribers. Inideed The Quebec Telegrapli commenting on similar criticisms in Nova Scotia papers lias tlîis to say: \" 'Our Englishi confrere, who is liot obligecd to be au fait withi the discipline of the Cati- d)ic clergy, will learn with pleasuire tlîat the clergv, of the comntry as weii as the clergy of tÏle city adopt regarding the war tint the prirîcipfles of sucli or such politicians, b-:t tiiose vwhiclîare taugrht to ius' bv ie 1), -e and the bish ps. No, pon this inmý r- tant poliit the bi-slops of our p\u003c,'nc li:îx ccxpres e lcessential words U:it'le illeml\u003eers of the cler,-y have madle tlie-;r\u003cei. 1 Icre they are once more: Wec cannot. disý- simulate fhefact that the confl:*ct is'one of the most terrible the world has ever seen, cannot fail to have its effect on our cýbuntry. England is engaged in it and who is there that does flot see the fate of ail parts of the empSire bound up with the fate of its arms? The, empire righitlv counts uipon our assist- ance, and this assistance, we are happy to, say, has been generousiy offered to it in men and in money.' This wholé'subject-is of more than pass- ing interest. It is of the highest personal and national importance. Nor does-it end with the people and the province tQ which reference is made. There are right here in Western Canada some who'. for various reai. sons remain apathetic and inert. One man said to me last week, \"ll fight for Canada, but not for England.\" To him I conld but- say \"Weil, it is lucky for youl and ail the rest of u his time t'hat* we have Old Engiand for our fohrAlttex. perience with Germany or Austria as a sté~ mother would soon make you changé yvo.ur tune.\" And to this lhe was forced to agreee, Another man said, \"I'arn a Christian.' I inust love ail men. I cannot fight. 1mrust refuse to eniist. I mnust protest agairist a war tax. I cannot contribute to the patriotic fund. I will -not assist in the Red Cross work. My kingdorn is flot of this world. I arn a Christian, anid a Christian belones'to' ail nations, and uses'no sword to, win ýhis batties. The spiritual -kingdorn is the only one I acknowiedge. I disclaimni ere flesh and Islood ties. I disciaim, force. .1 lov\u0026peace.\" To wiiich I had to say, \"'Young, man you are committing the uinforgivable offence' of putting asunder whiat Go4, has forever joined together.' There is no spirit-ý uial kingdom apart by itself. It mnst manifest itself in individuals, in families, in commufii- ties, in churches, in states. A good Christian surely attains to the ideal of love to ail men, but this comprehiensive. love is prepared for by love in the home, love in the community, love to one's country. There is more réal Christianity in Engiand's love. of justice, hatred of slavery, loyalty to freedom and faithfulness to her trust, than there is in ail your beliefs,'and ceremonies and prayers and vague feeling of brotherhood. You are lost in the forms and symbols of truth. England has been living the truth. It is quite time you came to lier assistance. Voit accept hier protection, while you find fault with hier. You accept every favor she has won for you through life sacrificed, and yet you refuse to come to hier aid in hier extrem- ity. British victory is the only way to world peace. You know it. Your i ingratitude, your suipreme selfishness bespeak your un- Christianity.\" This and more, but, of coursd it fell on deaf ears. And so it should, for it was the wrong reply. The real reply is to, point to the homes of Belgium, to shrineà polluted, children maimed, wome 'n wronged, and to ask, \"Is it a Christian act to stand to one side and to permnit that? Oh, it would l)e possible to point to the Lusitania, to the Arabic, Io the Hesperian,- and ask if it is Christian to remain apathetic under such conditions. And if the only -answer to this shouid be, \"I am a praying mýan,\" the further rcply could- be muade, \"Then in If eaven's name, get to Prayer, as Moses did wlien lie setJoshua to l)attle with the Amalakites. Pray!, pray! pray !-but give up this ever- lasting whine. Pray! but he loyal to your cotintrv! Fear God but Ilonor ihie King!\"ý M\\en ! -Fast and Wrest, havec yoti thought v hiat defeat xvoultid imean-notto the Em- pire onlv, buit to thie world, to the cause of Itrilth, to d' kingdom o)n earth ? 1 lavè voti figuire\u003cl 'ut. what it, xv\u003cv,!d mean to yqu, yotir fn and your faith? ~. ~- I i. ont~nd v",
         "The Western ýHome Pfonthly 96 TOU'RE cming on fineiyu Y'business,\" said John Stanton, M. P. for the Nova Scotia coun- ty -of Luxemburg, \"and as an election worke yoin can't be beaten in certain liqes. The way y ou caught on to the kodak voting machines last year was a maiterpiece Of strategy.\"J \"Ar I otquaiifedto be your son-rn law then?\" demanded Grant. Iionly wish,\" evaded Stanton, \"that wecuipersuade. you to take a more \u0026 DuI\u003eIi«1\u0026t lmu-the coming-campiu =hees Fred Turner, for instancewt Dt àoire than balf your ability, inmsin «t;a reputation as a talker, while y ou àbsolitely refuse, to go on 'the public 'It -isn't , \"ot air' that coumte when ellection day comes,\"l defended- Grant 1 \"tit i- the iuet worker that gets thevotes.' \"Judt-tiie same, 1 wisfi you would get bdee the publie a little môre,\" parsisted Stanton. 01I suppose he thinloe beeause he l aa maturai sput grpmbe Grant, as he retired\"=d vrbody else mut go and do - Îâewie.' For John 0tanton, be it known, was ithe opinion of the people of Luxemnburg, \".a bon orator.\" This opinion was largely due tothéefaltthat whenother speakers5 appealed te, the \"Ifishermen\"Whef e mmm\u003eety per cent of the voting'strength of theoéounty, they always called theniby that 'pro. name. Stanton, however, )uaiby pk f \"the hardy citizens Il f- our rocky coasts who go down te the wis a hips and siaite the sounding f ur- 4 roue cf the deep.\"y __ Accordingly when the chairman cf the ilovmncial party orgamzatioi opposing Stanton called young Fredl Barry mnto the \"biýner room\"' at the party headquarters f inHaldsxa few days before election, and told him togo down to Luxemburg and \"puteelover\" on Stanton, he naturallY demurred. \"That's impossible,\" declared Barry. Î;That Stanton's a regular taiking machine, il ad ail the people down there think he la a heaven sent genius te lead them out cf the poitical wilderness.\" \"A chattering parrot like that can always be 'got,'\" deelared the chairman, \"if you work-your carda rigbt and watch\u003e for the 'break,' and it's up te you te do it. Good day.\" Barry knew better than to make any ýîl further objections, and the next day he srrived at the Shireliown cf the COunt cf Luxemburg, wherd he found the Camn- paige in active swling and bis own party doing everything possible; but openrngs for putting anythrng \"over\" on Stanton SeeI remote enough. ..1Two days after bis arrivai he sat in, the little \"Exchange hotel\" gazing rue- f uIlIyat a telegram from the chief in reply te bi own wire suggesting that nothing could be. done, and asking permission to return te Halifax, which was not witbin the purview cf the provincial prohibitory law \"If you can't do anytbing,\" the telegrarn read, \"ýyou might as well stay there and .et .a) job, on the fishing smack. \"T4here's only one possibility that I can . Y\") ae ary \"They say it's a Mathematical fact that the impossible ay happen if. one tries often enough. Now tins Stanton la an endless talker, and if a fellow taiks all the time he la sure te çet 'cff something that we could use agauist hr. He'turned te the table, picked up the \"Luxemburg Leader\" and scanned the lilt of meetings advertised therein. \"'He speaksaiat Lennox to-Ih, he de- clared \"and I'm going te drive eut and hear 1dm and take a long chance on him saying something that I can pick an argument eut of,\" and half an heur later the party auto was whirling hlm eut the Lennox road. About two miles from town a rea(l turned te the right. \"Where Idoles that road go?\" asked Barry. \"It runs about 20 miles north\" was the reply, \"te 'a big settlement called Innishown. 'I\"Irish, 1 judge,\" rcmarkcd Barry. \"You better think, so,\" was the reply; \"the wholc îî1acel without asingle excep- tien is Irish frem t.he word go.\" \"'How do'they vote?\"Y \"Pretty evenly divided.\" When theyr arrived at the' Lennox meebing they found the bail well flled, and a few moments later the local dhair- man rose and halingly introduced \"Mr. Stanton, our honored Federal 'représen- tative'.\" Stanton rose and glanced over the aud- ience, acknowledgig the generous ap- plailse of bis supporters with the easy grace of a seasoned camainer. mne, \"He bas got a Mod plaorm any blamdife hsn. admitted Barry. 991r. hM an ladies and gentlemen,\" began Stauton, \"I assure you mn no per- fufictory sne but very heartilr and sinoerelyta I amn both honored and delightedte, be present with you to- niçht ax!d \u003eve the privilege of addressing this large and intelligent audience, com- poeed as it la of the sturdy vothg strength, the warm sun, the p aie stars and the gray fog, the Io leaÎ4 gray fgtn machines of E la stand'betWeen us-aux ~annihilation. %et the thin khald line once break, reinove the dreadnoughts and the battie cruisers from their ceaseleas vigil, and instantly every Englîsh and Canadian coast town would be exposed ýo the raids of the German navy, the soldiers of the Hun would land on our shores, our cities and towns would be given up to sword and flame, and the lives of our children -and the honer of oflr women left to the tender mercies of German 'culture' as enun- ciated by the leaders of Teutonic thought in the cuItiv-jted city of Berlin, and as practised by their generais upon defence- less towns and cities of unoffending Bel *uEM\"Y \"I'om taiker,\"l muttered Baurr, for those that like that sort of tit. \"Already we bave paid te price of participation. We have seen our own Canadian volunteers gather at our mili- tay depts and cross the boundess deep, and to-day over thirty thousand of thema are upon Salisbury Plain pining \"Better late anever\"p and at the same time, I arný happy te observe a large proportion of the charming female beauty and grace of this prosper- eus section of the good old countyl of Luxemburg-that county whichi I have had the honor of represcnting for the Iast ten years, and which I know 1 will con- tinue te represent after the tenth day cf the coming month.\" (Loud applause, yells cf \"Sure yen will,\" \"That's the stuf\" and \"Good boy,, John.\") \"A miodel opeaing,\" decided Barry. \"'Just the right amount of 'taify,' and rouses bis own feilows, too.\" \"In discussing the issues of the present earn.paign,\" continued Stanton, \"I enly întcnd referring te one leadingissue, ani 1 make no apology for doing se,-mnf act 1 wouil feel that I owcd you an apoIcgy if I reerr-ed to anything else. Thiat issie' is the rst Eurepean w'ar-a conflict which is flie greatest bistoricai event fromi the heginning cf tâme down te the present hoiu'. \"étTpon the plains cf France :înd Flib- ders the fatc of the Empire is beiing(o cided, andwith i t tlie fatc cf C~îaiial ri evéry other colony Ithat is beuind iii with the Empire. Up lU the North Scaî, ui for the heur when they can flght ide by side with their imperial kinsrfen for the unity of tl4e Empire and the Jacred aith of treatietý.' \"England bas ýse far borne the brunt of tefght and suiffered accordingly. Some of the best bleod of Britain bas been shed. and thousands have paid the last fuil measure cf devotion te bking and country, 'honor and fame. Whole regi- ments have been wiped eut fighting te pietect the ashes cf their fathers and the country cf their gods from the foot of the foreign invader. The Gordon High- landers, the gay and gallant Gordens, are ne more, and rnany cf the crack English regiments have been reduced te a mere corporal's guard. And the end is net yctX\" The rest cf Stanton's speech was equally flowery and guarded, and as Barry whirlcd back te tewn he relue- tarîtly admitted that bis trip had been a fruit less one, As heY passed the Innishown road, howeveu, he turned teo the driver. \"Go liklic evxi hum litre in,\" lie or(Ieu'e(. ''But thte ed liihit.'' \u003c'Blessed are the Peace Makers\" Written for The Western Home Monthly,'by Marvin Leslie. «There's no speed limit after the writii are issued for an election,'\" replied Barry. A.- soon as he reached town he ruahid doCn to the office of' the newspaper supporting hie party, and the dy before the election Inzdshown was flooe with a bright colored dodger gi4ýing verbatim quotations from Stanton's Lennox speech. \"Electors will observe,\" it con lue, \"'that while' Mr. Stanton praises the English and Scotch regiments, he did not evèn mention the Irish regiments who have f ought equally sa well. There can be but one conclusion from this pointed insuit to the Irish race, and that is that Mr. Stanton don't want any. Irish votes, and if we havé correctly Judged the feelings of the people of this county, we don't imagine he will-get any.\" That afternoon Grant who was mak.. ing a personal canvass of the Scotch settiement of Argyle, a f ew miles fromn Innisbown, received an urgent telephone message from k9tanton. \"I'm told,' declared the agitated can- didate, \"that Inmishown ia up i armas over mly Lennox speech.\" \"They are,\" replied Grant.t \"I've just got one of thefr dgers and i's a pretty neat piece of work.\". \"Wbat can we do to contradict it?\" asked Stanton. \"IOh, I can fix that,\" declared Grant.. \"1I've engaged Tara Hall and billed thé place for a meeting there to-night. That gives us the asat word.\" \"Yes, but there's no time now to send %~ speakers for it. If I'd known it in time I could have corne myseif and brought O'Brien or some of our Irish sup- porters,\" objected Stanton. \"Neyer mind,\" said Grant. \"You'd do more hurt than good., Stay where you are and ll do the speaking.\" \"IYes, \"' declared Grant. \"You've ail. ways wanted me to get befGre the publie and this la my chance.\" That evening in Tara Hall, Grant faced a large and hostile audience. \"I'm not a public speaker, as you wil soon observe,\" he began, \"and I did flot corne here to talk politics. I do intend, however, to discuss and explain a certain dodger.that has been circulated in this 1 alitr during the past twenty-four \"1t'1 stand a good deal of explain- ing,\" shouted an old immigrant who was \"4a long way from Tipperary. \" \"IThat's what I'm here for,\" declared Grant, \"as I know ai about that Lennox spe ech I an 1osly connected with Mr. Stanton and I may tell you that it is bis invariable custom to write out al bis speeches and read them over very carefully before delivering them.\" \"H1e couldn't have read that one very carefully,\" shouted another voter, \"or be wouldn't have slurred the Irish the way he did.\" \"I want to teil you,\" Grant went on, \"Ithat Mr. Stanton read that speech to me and'I made the same objection that rny friend in the audience bas made. III said to him: 'Mr. Stanton you haven't said a word about the Ir si.l diers at the front, and you know they've fought as well or better than any others, bar none.\" \"H1e said,\" Grant continued, calnily, \"1that it was necessary to say that the English and Scotch were at the front and fought well, but that it was \u003eabsolutely unnecessary to mention the Irish atal for everybody who knows anything at al.knows that whenever there la a scrap on anywhere the Irish are alwayýq in it and always fiight well.' 'The people would laugh at me,' said Mr. -'Stanton, 'f would take up their time telling them that the Irish are g'ood fighters. I might j ust as well teil themn that a duck swins., The man from Tipperary was on bis f eet. \"Three cheers for Stanton,\" he called. Electioni night when the Innishowfl returns came in showing that Stantoli had carried the poil by a neat majority, the happy and elected candidate turned te Grant. \"You ceÈtainly did it up brown,\" he exclaimed. \"Weil enough to be yoùr-son-in-law?\" demanded Grant. \"Yes,\" admitted Stanton. III oew you could talk if you'd only try, and next t election you rnust go on the stump in caLrnest.\" \"Not on your life,\" rcplied Grant. \"'Jhis is a special case.\"",
         "The- Wester'n Home Tufont hiy Th eStranger within our Gates' Written for The Western Home Monthly, by E. G. Bayne Sthe writaj led Barry. lie rushéd lew.paper 1ad before Dj with verbatim ex speech. moncuded, aises the ;, ho did aents who Chere can is pointed .at is that ,i votes, idged the )un~tY, we was mak. ie Scotch liles froxu teléphone :ated can- lui arma \"I've just s a pretty adict it?\" ed Grant. billed thé ht. That w to send own it in yseif and Irishi sup- «,Youd ay wliere rou've al-. ILhe publie rant faced s you will I did flot io intend, a certain d lu this renty-four explain- Who was decla.red Lt Lennox ted with that it is 'ut aIl his carefully one very oter, \"or Irish the went ol 3peech -to tion that nade. Lton yoU Irlsâ sol- Y they'Yo iy others, caimly, that the bhe front LbsolutelY sh at ail, tling at s a scrap ays in1 it pie would on,- \"if I ng tliem ;hters. 'I t a duck ts on bis Ee called. nisliowil Stantoli majority, turned to :Wf,\" he -in-law?\" CI knew and next stump in 1 Grant. \"If only we liada stayed lu Naples!\" Luigi's sombre eyes smoldered witli re- sentmerit, as lie spoke. Why b.d ho ever set out .for this Canada, this so-called \"Land of Promise?\" Bah! There were liars and thieves liere, as evýerywhere! '\u003cAh, Naples!\" eclioed Lucia, shaking lier head wistfully, while slow tears gatli- ered in lier eyes. Dear dirty Naples! How the very name warmed lier beart! Was it only lasý sum- mer that, tley had sailed away from that dear port? Hero tlioy were strangers lu a strange land, luvited, urged to corne, and then-cast aside, allowed to starvo treated like cattle and worse. The Bay of Naples, with the olive-ila clustered about, rislug amphitheatre-like above the curve.of yeilow sand that em- braced the arm of sapphiro sea! Naples! With the white doves lu the city plazes PRIEHAT NIGET If One Uses the Right Kind of Foodi If byF proper selection of food one can M feel stroug and fresh at the end of a day's work, it is worth whle to know the kid of food that will produce this resuit. A school teacher lu the West says in this conuection: \" \"At the timo I commenced the use of Grape-Nuts my liealth wB. so, poor that I thouglit I would have to givo up my work ltogether. I was rapidly losing in weight, liad littlo appetite, was nervous and sleepless, and experienced, alinost Constantly, a feeling of exhaustion. PlOesir, ourc \"I tried various remedies without good resuits; then I determined to givo par- that camne clustering upon the hoad and ticular attention to «my food, and have sixoulders of the passerby.- Naples! Witli Iearned something of the properties of the liquid song of the boatmen wlien the Grape-Nuts for rebuilding body, brain, sea in the evening shone silver with a glory and nerves. pllfered from a splendid moon! \"!ýSince using Grape-Nuts I haveo made a \"We cannot starv,\" repeated Luigi, as Sconstant sud rapid improvornont in health, lie settled bis cap more firmly on bis head. in spite of, the fact that ail this timo I have H is glance traveiled across to the deal been engaged lu strenuous and exacting t le upon whicli stood only a portion of work. t e bread and a tin teapot that had cou- .\".I have gained twolve pounds lu weight ta ecd] a very weak brew. There was no and have a good appetite, my nerves are oth food. The cupboard was as bare as steady and I yleep sound. I have sucli old ame Hubbard once found bers. strength and reserve force that I feel Yet up on \"the bll\" on Millionaire almot as strong sund fresh at the close of Avenue many familles would be break- a day's work as at the begining. 1 fastiug presontly on crisp bacon, tender \"eoousing Grape-Nuts I was lomelet fragrant coffee and frcsh fruit. troubled mucli witb weak eycs but as mySonicely its world divided; seO neat the Vitality increased the eyes becamestrong- lino that is drawn between the slieep and or., the goats. The stranger cornes at our \"I nover heard of another food as nutri- urgent invitation. Ho rears our fine build- tious and economical as Grape-Nuts.\" ings, lays our railways, makes our cities. 'lThere's a Reason.\" Wo tel hixu lie eau do better here in the Name given by Canadian Postum Co., New World-make more money, educate Windsor, ont. the bambinos, become the equal of any Ever read the above lettor ? A now man. When ho loarns the trutb, learus one appears from turne to ti.me. They that mnoney does not grow on the maple àr genuine, true, and full of huiflan 4rees, learns that lie and bis are only interoat 'cattle,\" learus that the land is as ah- jectly unËder' the thumb of, the Big Interesi as ever France was servile to Louis, .whe the hour of disillusionment coxes-who, i to shoulder the blamne? For thé blain belongs somewliere! Luigi opened the door and. a flood c morning sunlight poured into the squalii rooxu. \"'Poor Luigi,\" murmured Lucia, layiný fier liand tenclerly on bis worn coat sleeve \"You musta not wa1Ik so mucha to-day Lesta night so tirod you were an~' da féetý 80 sore. You- Luigi laughed bittorly. \"Whon- you hava no car tickets yoi musta walk,\" lie said. \"Da-pavement! It il a hlard.\" Lucii went on. \"Oh, Luigt, if we could geta ti da country!\" \"like everyt'lug elso it taka da money Carissima, to go to da country.\" \"'Ah, d4 money!\" echoed Lucia. \"But il 1 could geta dere I show d1 people liow to farin! My padre-lie wa da besta vine-dresser lu da province o Tuscany!\" \"$0olie was.\" ,Iothesamaregone \"Dose people home dey wasta du land like water. Only yesterday I pass ton empty lots, t'ick wit du weed' jJT is a sin! Sucli wasta!\" 'Da owners holdu du lot for beeger prico. Sacristi! Dey are a lazy lot dem- selves If my padre hada but balla da acre'y ho maka feeda du family ail du win- ter?\" \"It la already halfa-pasta seex, Ltuigi. You liurry now. It may be du lesta chance.\"~ \"Ali-so it may be.\" be said gloomily. Was lie born under an unlucky star lie began to ask bimself? His fate liad lately seemed so perverse, bis every hope doomod at its birth to disappointment! They went slowly out and around the old building to the street. \"For me,\" Lucia said, summoniný a brave smile. \"For me, 1 eau do wit out fooda loiga time, but da bambino au' du leetle' Guisseppe, dey musta eat. Dey musta have milkaan' breada.\" b\"iI try dis lasta place,\" said Luigi, \"I been houesta up to dis moment. After dis, if I not gta work, 1 steala! 1 geta da fooa-da breada for du bambins-I geta, it somehow!\" ~~T7iSSme gooda-bya, Carissima.\" I~\"Say bya,\" coaxed Mrs. Kapa- A tetti, lifting the black-eyed baxubino up to meet ita father's bent head. The womandid not ernile and the in- fante usual gurgie too was absent. The other children,~ rangmng 1.1 size like stair- steps, clustered about their motlier's uirts. It wassi o'clock in the morning and breakfast-God save the mark-was over. \"You try again, Luigi?\". queried the woman, in a duil toneless voice. \"Agin,\" replied lier husband, listlessly., \"You t'ink you eeta da job to-day?\" Luigi shrugged bis heavy shoulders. \"I1 musta try,\" lie said. \"An'--if you not geta-\" The woman broke off. A deep trown gatliered on, Luigi's brow. t. \"If I arn turned away agamn, Lucia, I swear-you lieara me-i swear, 1 steala da food.a! I-\" \"WÔ cannot starvel\" \"Dere is-dere is always-da Çliarity Bureau.\" A spasm of pain shot across Luigi's face. Ro wflxced as under a blow. The woman, as she spoke tlie lated name, sent an anxious glance into the wliite pinclied faces of the children. In their great, mournfui dark eyes was the look of half- starved creatures. ~''f we only hada da leetie fruit-sliop!\" siglied Mrs. Kapatetti. She bad made that fervent wisli so often in these past dark montlis. The littie fruit store had been tlie goal she and Luigi had worked. soliard to aclieve-linl the city sewers, she over the wasli tub. But there were so many littie mouths to'feed, rents were go criininaily higli and sickness had invaded the littie f amily so often, that since coming to Canada ten months bofore, they had neyer risen higlier lu 11e than ýO occupy a small dark room at tlie rear of an old factory that was tumbling to pieces. And then, the rent for this hovel was sucli s wouid make the angels weep. Eigliteen dollars a -month forix the privilege of looking çut into a particularly squalid back yard, fflled with ail kinds of rubbish that had nover been carted away. Into sucli a narrow, circumscribed rut liad their higli hopes falen, for Luigi had been thrown out of work lu November and had had no mcupation since., 1' I I... Hs e spoke paseionateIy. Lucia sighed n and tuxned back tolier simple dutiesni-. e doors she bad nparted some touch of neatness to the room, and wra péd u* the ýfhaif loaf of bread carefuly g. a =anp 1cloti, she made tlie two littie girls .ready for kmndergarten. g Kindergarton! Blessed source of tom- fort in these dark dayst There the child- ren received. at eleven eacb day a generous bowl of soup sud one soda cracker. They were assurod of one meal[ on every day except Sunday. I'hat wus something to ibe thankful for. Aeanwhile, Luigi, fondl believn ho àwould be ear-ly (for the big peof \"buanequl Qthat had caL for one hundred, mon, bad been announced to open its doors at moyen- thirty) arrived before seven only to find hinsolf at. the extreme end of a oz -ulne that liad been foring apparently .aine dawnl. \"One hundred men '-suid bers 9were twice that numbèr s.lready with more farriving every minute.. Lua* wM bems on an off-chance as, it was. . *iws là lest straw, for lie was flot a skilled work- mian, only willing,- so wiiling to learn. It seemed to him. that bis very oagernus wwu bis undaing. Thb careleos onewore * l-~ Eigt oclck-ndtwonty-f ive gmnbd been7selectod. Nino--aud fifty -bbsn accepted. 'Nine-tbirty-anud .eventy4lye wer mclehapy with work. Ten-.t4hs hundred had be chosen! \"No more men wanted.\" So read thie bigeard that was now hung on the dOpr. Three hundrod disap poitéd appliepita turned awayi-some gloomy and mçro P some cursmng ferveitly, othors marl'Y white-faêed and spiritieua. Luigi f or a tino waa so crushed-in lm-Fpit that ho lest al monse. 0f \u003ebis. wlioeslOVte and kept plodding on without a*thouOt- et destinaiocn. Traxpi* the ofty.Wm mentsehad become ahabit. Mter a turne, ho looked up to, find bimaif in a, quie ÇÏ elegant district.- Wealth \u003cid not fipit. itself bere lu garish gradeur, but tholre was an sir of siibstantial comýfoet to the building.sud the lawnse. The houas.ha hers been joined b uins lokfn restaurants, a motion pioture palace. nid other modern appointraentfa oui OÏVil- zation. This fact alone maroed the-«ws- triot; es'one of the very oldeot of the residential portions of the city. Luigi waa h=. Ho caught the fragrant odor ofIishtew oooking aaqe- where near sud hot rébellion uurged up in hlm. It was nearing -the luncheop -hour. He b.d almoet dedidd to beg a uuel but bis pride stl held out. Ho -wotld'- st.ml rather tha'ask charityl AMdbe u!OM-i cursed volulyU,:sud with 9a whole-sut. abandon. \"'Here, my insu'--Do you want-tOb. run nP Luigi had jostled a weil-dresd goptWe mnu, who swung a cane a rily, but who stop pednw to look severely at him. '\"Swearing lu public lsanau ldictible, off once.j Luigi cst alookaettheseaer out of his black eyes and then paseonlinsilence. \"Drunk\"'I was the other', montai com- ment, for' the Italien wsiked noue too 'steadily. Extreme bunger, weariness, sud the habit of living on oinenali day doms not make for a springyupriglit carniage.' A restaurant! ]iugi's tired foot brought lin up short before awindow, full o toothsome deliglits.- It.was o4e of* thoos middle-class eating places, haif w\"Y b.. tween the luxarious velvet-carpetsbd gill, where they stick you a dollar sud: a i 'for the simpleot meal, and the antihe, wliere flues abound and the table napery is decorated with an arabesque of egg-youk and tomato ketchup. Heme were meat pies, chains of wienerwurst, a cooked chiok- on with a wreatli of paroley about its neck, a disli of stearning saghetti, f ehly su - ared dougbnuts,liah eeseandçup.jol- lies. Oh, blase diner! You who must coax the appetîte with cocktails sud-tabasco rel.shes! Oh, ple dyspetie!lolk .hors upon Luigi, a hýsky giant of a mn, ean living, simple of tastes, stsrvm* ingua land of plenty! It would ho ridiuls rei not se pathetie. clu eoi Luigi ontered. Why, he could not have isaid. It was an irresistible impulse and his foot led him lu toward the source Of those good things. God knows ho hsdu't a cent in bis pockets. Ho seated birnslf at a table lu an obscure corner, and pullod the menu card toward hlm. A briuk waitreas drifted up and, hauding hlm a",
         "The -Western Home Jtfonthly starched -serviette, stood awaiting bis order. Behnd 'Injnia-tetceda bail wall of gre as î àwihwas evidently a sort of general clearing bouse for tray's of dishes. From afar off came the tanta xg odors of the kcitchens, but here in this plaue betwëen, sizuled gasoline burners for coffee. The calfe fale up quickly. Presently there enterçd a dainty young wornan iji groe with golden hair2 who gls.nced un- certainybout for a tue and then took t1Ée (\u003e11137remai n eat, which was beside Euigi, with lier back to the baise wall. This dismayed Luigi, -for deftly and fur- tavýey hasd been stowing away portions of hie dinner li the capacious pockets of bis ôversfls, for Lucia and the- poor' kiddieo. Now he mustat -, The orchestra was anst effn \"G. Out and: Get Undr 'Md Lugi 1hsd fin iuhed his coffçe, wken a report like a onon-shot. stunned the crowd into quick ç1Slee. PoUlowed a hissing sound and tbai over the baise acreen poured à tbick volum»e of amoke. A tongue of flame lic*- ccl the flurnsy nuaterial -and in leus than tbirty seconds the whole wafl was blauug. d\"Ds.dYy The olc[geteç.gan wbeeled. \"Good heaved M C oreare yu se \"Sale and sound.Y ou got m ms sage?\"y \"Why yes. You 'phoned your mother you would lunch at Hector's, and so-as soon as I heard wliere the fire wa-\"ý She mnterrupted bis pantin sntence to seize Luigi by the arnu ndtbrust him f orward.» \"'This maxi saved my 11e,\" she said slMPly. Luigi flushed beet-red, but the girl's parent, alter a precursory glance at the man, tbrust out a fat white liand.\" \"I'rn mucli obliged, rny man,\" lie said, graciously. Ris daugliter proceeded to give a de-. tailed account of her fortunate escape, but Lnigi interjected a sentence of depreca- tion, spoken in bis sof t Italian tones. \"You are a foreigner? An Italian, I take it?\" Luigi nodded and was about to turn away. \"Stay This is a service I cannot hope to reward as it deserves, but you will accept-\" \"Yes ir.\" N \"Would.y ou goon the land?\" Luigi did flot understand. for a moment. \"So mâny of you feilowB, you see Won't go to the country,\" continued tue old gentleman, testily. \"So I ask you,'would you be willing to go and work on a farm, thirty miles out-a truck farrn? Your wile could go along and cook for the men. 1 arn after the right man-have been after hM àill spring. WilI you go?\" -Mother ef ail the saints Would lie go to the country If lie eould have spoken English more fluently lie would have ex- plained that the Italian lias reduced tilling of the soltoa fine art. The dago knowe the virtues of soil economny, of fertilization, of conservation, of drainage. He knows because the knwledge has been handeâ down to him.,frorn the epxly Roman days, the secret of making the desert bloom like the rose. \"I1 taka da offer,\" said Luigi. And you could not have discerned in his quiet, brief statement, how joyously hie bis heart was beating. An expression of satisfaction passed -over the old gentlemnan's countenance. Duck Raising, a bighly profitable industry. The picture shows a section of a duck farm that weekly sendas ita thousands to the New York market But the crowd had not waited to ýee this. At the fltst alarm the diuftirs had bolted for the street doors, in a dense mass --ail but the girl with the golden hair, and Luiéi. She 1usd risen anid taken one step f or- ward, blindly witli lier arrns before lier face. Then, se thick was the arnoke, she had f allen first te lier kneca, fighting the acrid odor, coughing and gasping, and then 1usd fainted quite away. Before theux there was ne outlet, for the doors were blocked in front by the escaping, panie-strioken crowd. But Luigi saw a balf-boarded up window at the ide. Seizing.a chair lie broke the glass and lifting the girl up i his arma lie passed lier sliglit form througli to sorneone on the outside. fier dresbore holes here and there, but otherwise she was unhiurt. Luigi.*'s hair was singed, and bis sleeves burnt nearly to the shoulder. Bare- lieaded and panting lie stoed beside the reviving girl, his white teeth gleaming in a broad smile of relief. The liook and ladder now dashed up and with difficulty, rescuer and~ rescued es- eaped through the surging mass of buman-. * ity packed about the now lýlazing build- ing. .Suddanly the girl gave a ci-y indicative cf deliglit, and, following lier glance, Luigi saw a portîy old gentlema-in just alighting' from an -automobile, and bearing on bis rubicund features a very agony of sus- pensee He began to force Lis~ way through theArowd, hitting tsmartly with bis cane riglit and left. Luigi gave a fleeting glance at the bill- fold the old ger leman bad puiled eut. He shook bis head and spread eut bis bandi3 in a gesture of mingled gratitude and acorji. \"But, yu-I-\" puffed the old gentle- man, blinking with a puzzled expression at the Italian. It was clear the man was poor. At the instant a bright idea struck the young Nvoran. She leaned forward and whia- pered something into ber fatlier'a ear. \"Tbat's se, that's se,\" lie said, nodding. Then, \"Where do you!, my man? My daugliter suggests tbaV'we send you a lit tie treat, seeing yeu won't accept meney.\" Luigi did net comprehlend. \"Wliere do y ou live?\" asked the girl. Luigi named the place. \"What do you do? Where do you work?\" asked the gentleman. Luigi smiled faintly. The question seemned almost a meckery. \"I gota ne work,\" lie said. \"H1e must be ene of the eut-cf works, observed the gentleman in an aside te hIe girl. \"Well, well \" lie xclaimed, for want of an idea. His daugliter suliplied the rnxssing i(lca, however. She again whispcrcd some- thing in bis ear. rejhejery thing-if he'a bcnest and \"At any rate we could give him a trial. fie loeks reliable,\" said the girl, naivel, \"and I'm sure he's bonest.\"ý 11Ail1 right We'll try hlm. Now-, my man, yeu have a fanlilY, 1I uppse'\" Again lie produced'bis bill-fold, and drew eut of it some money. \"Thisa arount will be in advance then. Pack up your belongings and be at the depot Saturday morming at ten. Can, yeu do it?\"' \"'Yes, sir,\"* said Luigi, taking the biils. \"I wiil add that, if you give satisfaction you will be taken in on shares and in a year or two will bc gîven land of your own. I hope for both our sakes you wiil make good.\" An hour later Luig', bis arma filled with packages, 'a new cap L n bis liead, and with a heart as light as a baloon, passed the scene -of the recent fire. 11e wàs on bis way to catch a car that lie might the seoner reacli Lucia with bis glad tidinga. The ruina were stiil smoking. The in- terier was completely burnt eut but the ahlcl remained. On the pavement stood the proprietor, bis cash regiater safe, high and dry, on a pile of boxes. The acrid smell of fire and smnoke and water-soaked wood stili clung te the place and the fire- men were stili hiosing the rear timbers. Luigi stopped, and the proprieter turned and looked at hlmi disapprovingly.. Ex- eepting for bis new head geai-, he looked the meat diareputable 'dago\" the propri- etor liad ever clapped eyes on. 11e did flot recegnze the bero of the fire in this aoiled \"vag. Luigi flslied down inte bis over- ails and drew eut a crisp dollar bill. \"Dis belonga te you,\" lie said, passing the rneney over te the wondering pro- p rietor. \"eTo me?\"y Luigi nodded. \"A gy corne inta da shop to-day an' tooka dmeal-you cei it swipa da meal -lie sorry. He nota do it again. He rich now.\" Sambo's R.aaon -Col. Dàvis, a fine old Southern gentle- man, and a faithful attendant upon the beautiful services of the Épiscopal Church, was alwayýs driven into town on Sundey mornmin most orderly and digni1léd style by Sambo. After carefully seeing to the fàstenig of the staid and sober liorses, Sambo hinseif - used to slip intc a pew and be a mosat Veni tive listener. Under any ordinary circuui- stances neither master nor mani were ab- Fent. It so happened that on one p articule ny fine Sundlay the Colonel noticed, on casting hie eyee around to the usuel pew that Sarn bo was nbt in bis pleace. T h e doonel was surpe d, but said nothing, supposing Samn- bo la sorne good reason for bis absence. But noticing for two or three Sundays the continued vacancy in Sarnbo's place,, hie determined to enquire the reason why. \"iSambo,\" -Pid he, \"I haven't noticed you in curcli for two or tliree Sundays.\" \"No, Mausa; no, M4assa, I want dere,\" said Sambo, shifting about uneasily. \"And where were you, Sambo? 1 should like to see you in cliurch sir \" \"Well, Mas-sa,\" eaid âarnbo, \"I'se jus' down to de liIIMethodis' cých rotin' de conali.\" \"Why, Sambo, P'r surprised a1«\"you. Wrlit have -you got against rny churcli? Doesn't it suit you, Sambo?\" \"Yes, Massa. Yo' churcli good churcli, Massa; but den I mus' go an' look ater. de liesses now, if you'il scuse me.\" \"Neyer mind the horses, Sambo. Just tell me the reason.\" \"Weil, Master, it's just like dis. Up at' your place dey spen's so mucli time reedin' de minits o' de previous 'meetin', but de Methodis', dey gite rite down to bizness to once.\" SLUGS HARD Tea and Coffee are Sure and Powertul. Let the tea or coffee slave be denied bis cup at its appointed time! Headache-.- sick stomacli-fatigue, etc. \"Strange that thinking, reasoning bc- ings will persist in the use of coffee,\" ays a Western man.. 11e says further that hie did not begin drinking, coff ce until lie was twenty years old, and that slowly it begaii to poison him, and affect bis hearing tbrough bis nervous system. (Tea produces about the sanie eff eets as coffee, because they both contain the drugs, caffeine and tannin.) \"Finally, I quit coffee and the condi-\\ tions slewly disappeared, but one cold morning the smell of my wife's coffee was too mucli for me and 1 took a cup. Seen I was drinking my regular allowance, tear- ing down brain and nerves by the daily. dose of the nefariotis beverage. \"Later, I found rny breath corning bard, had frequent fits of nausea, an~d then I was taken down witli bilious fever. \"'Cemmon sense came to me and I quit coffee for good and went back to Postum. I at once began to gain and have haedne returns of my billous symptonis, bead- ache, dizziness, or vertigo. \"I now have health, bright thouglits, and aclded weight, where before there wast invalidismn and the blues. \"My brother quit coffee because of its effeet on bis health and now uses Postum. He could not stand the nervous strain while using coiffce, but keeps well on Postum?\" Name given by Canadian Postum Co., Windsor, Ont. Posturn cornes in two fornis: Postum Cereal-the original form- mnust be-weil boiled. 15e and 25e pack- ages. Instant Postuni-a soluble powder-- dissolves quickly in la cup of bhot water, and, with cream and sugar, makes a de- licious beverage instantly. 30e and 50c tins. Both kincls are equally delicious and cost about the samie per cup. \"There's a Reason\" for Posturn. -old by Grocers.",
         "The Western Home. Monthly A Laggard ýin War- I or T he eser Hctmièýonthly hy William LuttonFR T In, the acheme of confederation the n rovince of Quebec la politically pivotai. Çhat iswhy criticism of anything Quebec May, think or do takes on a acf t and placable tone. A traditioir- bas grown Up that Quebec must be treated diler- ently from the ether provinces. If there are any favors te be bestowed, ulie Must get them. If there are exemp- tions or privileges or advantages she must be first considered. Quebec is peculiar. The Frencli people are different from the other elements. Back in history therè was a fight; and Quebec teils us, with mueh inistence, that on account of that fight she must be treated with peculiar tenderness; Must be indulged, even at the expense of the other provmees. When Quebec hinders, therefore, any large scheme of advance; when 'she re- fuses te link herseif with the other pro-. vinces in any plan or policy.which would, in her opinion, impair ber peculiar idi- vidualism, we shrug the shoulders and say, \"Oh, well, you know, at the time of the Cession, Quebec obtained certain privil- eges.\" It la on thia account that pblic seak- ers, when they refer te the sacrifices which the Dominion has made for the war, spe-Jk cf the French and English and simple, and has always viewed witb disfavor even the innocuous inilitia, wbich made an imposing parade on Sun- day. The pastoral life tende te phiegin. The inhabitant cultivates his land; he saya bis prayers; he smokes bis pipe; be hastens te the Cure as the veice cf God; he gees te sleep, and lets the world go by. Tere are 2,000,000 of him like that in the province. In the city it's' a littie dif- ferent. In Montreal for instance, the Frenchi Canadian ferma the great body cf workers-to the num-ber probably cf 350,000. 0f course in the individual' case he will be a lawyer, a doctor, a poitician; in the mass he la seen in indus- trial life, smart, eager, doing bis werk well and'cleverly. 'Almoat in infancy the French Can- adian comes under tbe influence of an educational and religieus system cf wbich the geniua might be aaid te be a large and immovable passivity. That system bas many excellences, ne doubt. It la the friend of order. It renders obe- dience te ail proper autbority.. It con-. serves societ-m' u urmuring con- tent. But tý\"ear1y aschool gives the chief prominence, net te this world and its concerna1 but the next. In the cate- Gejieral Botha Acknowledging Salute of Guard of Honor on Hlis Return from S. W. Africa. Left ta right: Guard of Honor Cape Town Officers lining the jetty along which the General has ta pass. General Botha, Mrs. Botha and staff officers. It is not often that the navy furnishes a guard of hanor for an officez of the junior service and the fact that it did on this occasion, must be règarded as a remarkable tribute. figting ide by side- paint glowing pic- tures cf -the Frencht Canadians shed- ding their blood for the two mether countries which inspire their conduct. ,They know tbe statements are net true. Tbey hlow that it la ail a fiction. Tbey know tbat only a bandfull cf the 2,200,0 French people cempesing the population cf the province bas responded te the cal! fer service at the front. They are aware, in loeking over the casuality lists that the bonored namnes are Englisb. Tbey are fully conscieus that even wbile tbey extol the valor cf the French Can- adians, tbe latter are indifferent te the dlaims eitber oef their own mother coun- try or those.cf their foster mother:-Eng- land.i Tbe truth weuld be ilisagreeable, and it la net apoken. Let any speaker des- crîbe the true conditions and there would be a race cry ever the province wbicb at this juncture it la net desirable te pro- voke. Many bave sought te account fer tbe indiff erence sbewn by the French Can- adians in this criis-an imdiferenee which! was strongly empbasized in Mon- treal when recruiting officers were stcned by a rowdy niob; an indifference un- accountable wben it la considered that their mether country, te whieh tbey appeal with thrilling pride, la împerilled. Canada is cf course a non-military Country. It was this wbicb sppealed to the bundreds cf tbousands cf so-cslled foreigners wbo came te our shores te escape tbe burdens whicb an inexorable Iilitarism forced ;upon, them iu Europe. Quebec, however, is peculiarly pastoral cbism, tbe confessional-and ail the Catbolic acheels are confehional sebools -tbe cbild learns tbat this îs a transi- tory state; that tbe concerna of the world are trivial and passing; and that the cbief 'concern la te bhave the rigbt faitb by whicb one saves one's seul, wbiàcb is tbe prime consideratien. If the lad enters the college after bis school training this ecclesiastical system la accentuated for the eigbt yea~ cf the course-philosophical or theological. Goed principles are instlled; tbe education pro- ceeds upon acholastical ratber tban modern ines; the phiosopby la medieval; and modern science bas ne place in tbe curriculum. Having completed his coilege studies the yeung man becomes a notary, aý lawyer, a doctor, a priest, a politician. As a netary be ila iligent-a littie meticu- loua, but eminently respectable. The Iawyer is quick and able, brilliant in ors- tory, for wbich every Frencbman bas an instinctive cspscity. Tbe doctor ia grave and dignified; the priest, pieus and attentive; thé peliticisii, eager, dramatic, coruscatiflg, vehement with the glow, and at tbe same time, tÏie inimitable grace cf tbe latin. This type is, in mot essential respects, eminently desirable. It does not. play hasebali or lacrosse or indulge in any athietie games. It is removed frein the rougb and tumble cf life. It is (barring the priest) a fittie sceptical to-day and weuld amile (net publicly) if yeu'asked it wbether it accepted ail the dlaims put forwsrd hy the cburcb. 1But the mass cf tbe French, wbo have only gotthe rudiments cf educatien, who Figuré what It wo1ldQuebyou if you couic!levé, one ton ln every' seven. Saves Tne Ifecla Furnace hmu a one lire pet that micans a big Imcp ton in heat yeu get [rom the ceai- Seven. ameunt that lu wasted Up the chi The Hecla Grate, with Its imde 0fenables yeu te dlean out ail the mi cf the geod ceals- another savi water pan of the Hecla gives pic out the whele houme Dust- Hecia rnaeOrHe'ete Tight \"used- tsgca n nyr luèy i o thed by eiOn c ti hat Send for this I3ooIe a patented steei-ribbeil' 'esse in the emenflt cf -a big decrease In the Ûmney. lpendeut, trianguler bars Mhes wkthout waatlng anY 'ing. The large circulai lenty of moisture throughi. dust miglit leakIt nto O)ur bookiet \"Comf\u003eYi.... Heaith\" wili give you semE' valuabie points about heating and turnaces\" #Use the Clare Bros. Western Ld. Coupon WuamIEG, MAX. Dept. E Suecessors to Clare \u0026 Brockent, LImfted., ____ Coupon CLABEE »os. WSBiEj,LTfl. ept. H WInap.g.Mu. 4 C Send we yourBooket\" COMFORT ANI)EALTE\"' Name. ........................... ---- o-day an' t da mea! gin. He n gentIe- spcon tbe 1 Cburch, L Sunday dignified teniIig cf o birnself. F cîrcum- were ab- rticulorly n casting bat Sam- lonel was n g Sam- absence. Sundays )'s place,, son wby. Snoticed unda3 s.\" it, der,\"' eiy. 1 should 'I'se jus' roun' de al('you. cburcb? 1 churéh, k ater de D. Jist Up at, ereadin' Lbut de mzess to wertul. tied. bis dch- iing ho- e,\" ssAys t begjn twenty egali te througb saabout se tbey ne and s condi- ne cold ffee was Soon I e, tear- e daily g bard, ,ni I was 1l1 quit Potum. ad ne , b.ead- Lougts, e there e cf its ?Ostum. 3strain vel on nadian form- Pack- \u003ewder-- ,water, es a de- 3d 50e us and xrocers.",
         "The western Home IflontÈly. A Money-Savtng BoleA Bottie of Bovril ini the Kitchen will cut dw Bottle butcher's bills. 1t1 enormously increases the nourishing vàlue of food - m fact, its body-bulding powers have ~been proved ten te twenty times theý amount taken. It must be Bovril. ]FOOD is' for Infants and Invalids anrd for those whose digestive powers have become weakened by *ilinea or advancing ago. If the diestive funcions, however weak, canA:o any ork at ail they should be given - work to do Io the. exieni of iheir poméèra. In the easy proces Of its repara- dIon the -digestibiity of Benger's can be regulate o give [Ciark's To xrma«ncto ethu In 8 oz., 12 oz., 16 oz. Botties und 1 gallon Stone J ugs . Made from home grown ripe red tomatoes only and guar- anteed absolutely pure. Your grocer keeps it. Montreal compose the great body of workers- these are obedient to authority; they are faithful te duty; they are good huabanda and fathers, marrying young and brlng- ing forth a progeny, which as the late Hon. Mr. Farles used te say, would swalnp the Englishlinl the Dominion in fifty years, if the English did not mend their ways;- but they are net a robust element in' the population. The, long habit of obedience produces passivity. The dutiful surrender of the wiil te an extraneous authority robs the individual of initiative. When a man la willing that another should direct him and do his thinking for hlm, hie has lest the voli- tion wh alone ceuld bulk as an ex- pressio of character. When a life la inarkedout, the human interest of it dies eut. The French Canadian young men have net joined with the KngÏh speking citizens, because they have been shopherded for other purposes They de net plaýy robust games, because they are occupxd, in the time which should be lelaure urne, in koing te ýhurch. The daring, the aggres.siveness, the ambition which la feit when the 1f e la independent, becomes inoperative when that life ta regulated. by an external authority, which ia net to be questiened. Sir Wilfrid Laurier said-in Lendon at TH1EApril sun ad just dropped below the undulating wail of wooded hills that skirts the valley of the Assin- iboine and shot his arrows of light f ar across the heavens, when a herseman sud- denly appeared upon one of the hîghest pealcs, and, stoed, for a mement, darly silhouetted against the blood-stained sky. His eyes were fixed upon a point a littie (lown the valley; bis whole attitude was one, of close concentration, net unusual in one who lived on the Canadian West in those dangerous times. Eyen bis herse, ai muscular littie animal beibnging to the type known as mustang, stood stock still, with bis ears put forward, champing has bit softly, as though in deep meditation. UTp frem some bidden recess in the valley came another horseman dressed in the red t unie of Britains \"preservers of the law.\" He rode at an easy gallop up the hilside, itnionscious of the keen eyes ef the man above, fixed upon him with that tense look of a hunt cd animal in their depths. As the M'vounted Policeman drew near, the other suddenly plunged bis spurs into the flanks of his liorse and1 galloped at necli- break speed aroiund t'point of the wood, and caîîîe out oit flic path taken by the Coustable, w~ho Nvas now out. of siglit on the other sidc. A sarcasfic in ile spread over lus face. ''Well (lotie, 01(1 boy!-'lie said aloud, st rokinig tdit, su uk ivclk of bis little nmount Nvit h affect ioni, it t akes yo amnd nie to get ahiead of thieni bloonîiiin' ella-legs, don't it; though 'donner und biitzen!' 1 wvas afraid oncve that he'd t raok us down. Ilowever t bat danger i-. asi noNv. He viii probably go baec k t o t bc luit aid 1puit the first colonial conference that lie did not wish to participate in the foreign policy of the empire. Canada waa loyal, su he was net inilitary, and she wished to remtain out of the military vortex. There- fore he, as representing Canada was willing that the councils of the FËmpire should be held without bis presenée or participation. In saying tis ha was instinctively stating the French Caiadian attitude iu respect of native robustness. The combative sense la lest when the chief consideration is to save the soul. The church has said that this la a right- eous wer, and the French Canadians have been urged te join;'but the pressure bas not been insistent. A system wbich per- mita ne individual expression producea .in time a fatal benumbment. Certain of our French Canadian citi- zens have gene forward and done their duty. . In proportion te number they have not responded in a degree -which could be called cemmendatory or patriotic. Those who have gone -tt the front are highly spoken, of. The inertia which la not aroused by the, extreity of peril which faces, not only tfie mother ceun- tries, but Can~ada itself, la due te the atrophyin effects of a system, which while it kindies piety, blows eut the fires of patriotism. up a long-winded yarn te the Colonel about hair-breadth escapes from a whole gang of us fellers, and the Colonel wil slap hn on the shoulder and say ha can't sea hew he did it; the chief factor will treat the boys te a stiff Scotch, all round, in honor of the' hero of the hour; and the old Indian nurFe will use the story te frighten the factors' youngsters with wbenthey won't go to sleep.\" He paused, and laughed softly, «'It's a good thing we ain't as black as them se called civilized fellers inake us out te be, ain't it old man,\" hie added. \"And it's a good thing, tee, that we can get along without the good opinions of our feller- ..nen when we have te pay tee big a price te get 'em.\" He dismounted and set himself te the task ef loosening certain packs, which, while the Constable was in sight, he bad endeavored te conceal by the tail of bis long coat, but which he new caxefully rearranged, and '\u0026xed by leather strings attached te the sa e. 11e was net bad fo look at; there was. nothing of the criminal ia bis appearancej in faci, lie wa.s a man, who if his real idcentity as an illicit fur trader were con- cealed, one would instinctly trust; for there w-as something friendly and con- genial in bis smile and the humorous twinlde in bis dark ex-es. His face was ovcrcast by a deep bronze, suggesting long hot, sumuiners on the pluins, andf long coid winters wben the snow lies tee thick and sof t for ught but snew shoes, and when the nortle wind, which pierces enne like the eold thrust of steel, fills the air with'its w'eird inelody, ailuring, yet hateful withali. 1 l - l 11 -- - -, , W. Clark Ltd. Taking the rest cure The Wolfer Written for The Western HIome .Menthly by E. Fern Rear, Regina Collage Blaokwood's RasgIberry Vinogar Somethlng. Deliclous Te b. obtalned of ail Grocers Manufacturers of BIackwoo\u003ed's Celebrated Sot Drinký Winnipeg The BIakwoods Limited '~\u003e~. ..... ember. of the Commercial Educators' Association Winnipeg Business College Canada's Greatest School of Rusinesi Training' Secre- (arial X'ork, Bookk(eleping, Slorthand, 'É;),wiii Simanslup, Awarded First Prize at World's Exposition Individual instruçtion. Visitlors welcomne, espeeiallv teachiers. Ail werthy students assisted te desirable, positions. Please write, eall or phionc Main la lfor fre iMustrated catalogue. Winnipeg Business College 222 Portage Ave. (Corner Fort St.) Winnipeg I~ J 'SUlwan A ~No graduates out of e mployment. ne i a lie ch th Ur hi: th ran di: th le( th IJ sa f o cil",
         "The Westez'n Home Afonthly The dusk was deepen rapidly now. Theasubset I1ights lef t the 'topa; i the deslidoqvy ravines the trees drew dwrtogeth , whispering among them- Weves secret world-old yet, ever mysteri- 00a, ever ne'w. It was the hour in which, in the wilderness, tafter a long day of rest, Uature suddenly bestirs herseif and rouses to active life. Frogs began to croak in the ponds; a fox brushed close paut the traveiler; in a tree near by a kld cat loet its clutch, and f e, screaming with rage, to the earth; and somewbere far awar rose the long-drawn liowl of a timber wo joined in a moment by anothernear st hand, then another and another, until, own the cries became a whoe chorus. 1As the traveller rounded a curve in the Valley, lie observed a tiny spark, like the light of a glow-worm, flot far away. The wiy littie pony saw it too, and doubtiess scented some other horse's supper, for lie quickened hs pace and soon brouglit bis moater wthin siglit of a teepee set in a ovgitef re with a camp fire burning rightly bforeit. An old ýchef sat on bis blanket, gazing with stoie gravýty into the- flames and drawing at a long clay pipe. Behind 1dm, and near the door of thc wigwqm, waS a heap of furs, the fruits of bis wfinter's toil. Doubtiess bis thouglits were on those furs now for ever and anon lie turned his kingiy head in their direction and gazed at them long and earnestly. He had waited heart on fire with the joy of living. Xf it is foreign to you 1 ahould say thaty ou need sometbing to warm you up; a figurative matchj to toucli off the tinder of your soul as it were. IVve got the very stuf that wil do it too!\" The Indian was watching him closely. A sudden gleamý of understanding came into his8eyes. \"You don't mean-?\" the other nodded. \"I do too, I've got the material riglit in here. H1ave'you got the furs?\" The old man pointed with a skinny finger to the bales beside the wigwam dpor. 'Good! then it's a bargain?\" \" Well,\" replied the Indian warily1 \" that depends on how mucl you are willing to give for them. 1 could get enougli tea, tobacco and ammunition, bsMes shawls and beads for the s9uaws, ta ast us a year, at the companya store.\" 'Oh, but you wouldn't'get any liquor at the company's store. I can supply you with ail the things you mentioned, and liquor, too: good sparkling rye, that t ickles aJ the way down, and makes you feel like a young brave again!\" Thle chief's eyes gli8tened. - le tossed the long dark braids back from bis face, from which ail dignity and regal hauteur was gone, leaving in their stead a greedy lust that was almost beast-like in its intenaity. The trader noted it. with a smile of triumph. H1e begnunpacking bis wares, wbile the other motion~ to the a long time for the trader from the fur po'st to pay bis annual visit and buy them up, but, as the weeks went by and still lie failed to put i an.appearance, the Indian was forced ta take tbem' down himself. With bis squaw and grown-up daugliter lie was now' on the way. On the edge of the ring of fireliglt the newcomer was surveying the scene with interest. H1e comprehended the whole at a glance; knew where the Indians were headed for and why tliey were going, and a chuckle of satisfaction escaped him as lie thouglit of bis good fortune in liglting upon the camp. The old squaw heard hlm and came forward. \"Good evening, mother,\" lie began in the tongue of the Saulteaux, \"your supper smells good.\"l lier only response was a grave nod. 11e dismounted, and she, motioning towards the fire, took bis horse by the bridle and led it away. The man saun1tered over ta the aid chef who was eyem~g hlm steadily, s.nd stood wgiting fçr him ta peak. There was a long silence then the Indian said in beautiful broken English, \"came You as-a friid or foe, my brother?\" \"That depends,\" replied the white man lightlv, \"one man's friend is another's f, '\u003cou know it al l inges an themi. \"Yolu speak sf range words my brother. éi1 \u003cown and let's take supper, and then yoi, sliall explain yourself.\" ý'Vwv and with gr'eat dignity hie rose end ;-arranged bis blanket sa as ta givc the .\u003e11anger an end, flien the y bath sat iland the white man began rollirig a. \"Ilout man!\" lie said in aniswer fa flic ûtIi r¼ remark, \"my words arc biii eheer- flil. Cheerfulness flows na'furally fror a. squaw to bring bim one of the bales of furs wtich he loosened and spread over the ground. Tliey were beautiful peits, soft, deep-furred, and superbly satiny. The white man gave a low.whistle as lie ex- amined thçm. \" They'il bring me in a small fortune at Montreal,\" lie said ta himself. The old chief was watching hlmanxiously. \"They are weil stretclied but of blamed pOoor ,uality, old dog,\" growled the manlalud, 'I really can't afford to give you more than two bottles of rum for them, but, as you are an old customer, l'Iliake it three.y The Indian was plainly disappointcd but bis simple mnd could not fathom the white man s treacliery. His disappoint- ment, however, was short-livèd after the liquor came into view. Thereafter, they sat around the fire until far into the night, drinldnîg and gambling. The two squaws sat across from themn partaking of the contents of the flask, which the men had tossed over to therli, and watching their movements ýwith wide, wonderimg eyes. 1'My gamet\" cried thle Wolfer brcaking the tense silence, as lie swept flic cards from the board.1 \"n! ou cheat-I saw you l'Il ' er\" \"What wiil you wagcr?\" in- t\"ýersedy \"My furs-the rest of imy furs!' cried the Indian excitedly, spriing- ing to bis fecet. 'Sit dowvn!'' comaianded the other ws! lh a wave of the hand. \" Look here,. how Nvoul!d if be for us fa play that gaule ovvr :igain., If I lose y~oîs are to gefl ail filie i ypack asol if voii loyse 1 gvt firest o vour furs. ilsal suit oi Tihe In\u003cian nodu(led ,and saîldoWn iMain, unsteadily; the liquor w a.s bcgiiuiirig ta 'clOu and Lita bard - brinma Rpafm ht~4 clown \u003clucka leanly t long rangea. EC Bujlt ao ou cm1260 .g usek w hue t sc9 They have SoUd Top-a thick @\"eelw.!!cir fort. LEaa7 to load and Stection that alao ke.ps out ram, snow, dis% joavuis unioad. O.itathe on. twipaand sand. Soid SteldBreect horoiv b beet al-around gun lutely aolid teel t ruerasau elam CMtop. SâgeEjeha and1 t . aest face and e-e bumt ~~ toe-thay pull a---1.at ,.ture-for convensent carm id cleMd î - GRAE \"~-1 Ga. *2016iorSO Ga., 4.00 jgà\u0026m ReDatushetuu» wlth visible Hammer - 12, 16, 20 arbh top, aide ejectio\"n,losed-in breech, maued barvel, talie-dowu.- etc.,am saieithc ,fghiguni Srd5S*poaiqf*,bg Iéfont am Pberamd haiemueyPueng sho(guna and Mia ma sng M44 yA~,2AzdbJkva.~wsG 74 WMIow StresS, New Ha»@%,Ce.. THIS LABEL 011 Iyour paper wil 1 tel 1 you whien your subscription expires. SEND IN YOUP. RENEWAL WEN DUE .4 fi. i. lie did foreign ta loya, isbed to There- Fýmpfre enèe or be was aiiadian tness. ben the he soul. a riglit- ms have nire bas ici per- )roducee !an citi- tie their ley have hi could striotic. ont are L which of peril mr coun- to the Lwbich, the fires He's Had Farm ExFperience On thousands of steh-usIoete farms, Big Ben bas beboo q up job the - . ock Of ail work- H's husky, deep - volc.d :ringig up tho Peoplo mndstrfg.Hie cali la cler- Who must gto%t ey 'bis bold numerale show plein- and telling th iig lyht. l lg time of day to those o, dd..dhuaaetol Stay 'round the house. doN iam-Lssuflhi 0' Bg Ben works 24 bouts at la the Sm»-i Under the cm of a kindly cn el about g ang of bm lon liow lie le boy )r of the' Lni nurFe factors' t go t0 \"«It's a ,hem s0 t ta be, id it's a t along feller- a price ta the which, lie had tail of arefully -striings ere was. araflce» is reai re con- ist; f or id con- [mraUs ce w'as ng long ng cald ick and d when like t he wif h ifs wif hall.",
         "Thbe Wester\"n Ho m- Mont lly àhat Stand Scrutiny 'T'HOROUGH daly cleansing withdhe mild, creaniy jather of PALMOLIVE is the surst means of securing the healthy natural complexionr that'bears 'close inspection. -, mthe.Palmolive doctrine of so«af and waler bas been adopted byhundreds of thousandi of progressive women, who appre- daethe value of thia scientific combinatioii of Nature's greatest cleasingagents. -Tevalue of these famouw ails was ciscovered 3000 years ago by the royal wmnfancient Egypt. who derived great benefit from their ý6e aven thougli ohgedtouse them in their crde natural atate Fortunate modim wamen are inheritora of their great diecovery. -g-LMOLIVE SOAP The PALMOLIVE line includes PALMOLIVE SHAMPOO, -which lu pure fquid PALMOLIVE eaPecially prepared ta make praper cae a the hair easy, and PALMOLIVE CREAM. a delightful creamnwhich fireshens and invigorates the complexion. Ail Sold everywkere by teading dealer\u0026. For trial Packages '1-tEfOD MLOFER-Amnaturo coke of PALMOUVE SOAP. boule af SHAMPOO sud tube af CREANM\"uatvefr aced sailed im.*zooeiz* ofi v. 2c tsmps. Addreu S. J. JOHNSON SOA CO, Limitod 1817 Goge Stmeot.Tmoon Ont. \"alau Addrss:S. LY I oh» 1«op 6N., lac. tel -on hin. There ýfollowed a period of alin out death-like silence during which the two played ase for dieir 'lives. The old èhef thougli so absolutely intoxicated, e;sried is faculties to their utmost capabilities, and played fairly welL. The white, iin uwas growing impatient.- It wa ute time for him to be on hie way if he were to reacli headquàrter by dayliglit se. he had arranged for. Watching hie opportunity, when tlie attention of his oppcnent was distraeted for an instant lie once more swept the carde from the table and reached for the furs. Witli an oath the Indian sprang to hie feet, but he was no quieker than the white man, who rose also, and tlie two stood glaring at ecd other like infuriated animaIs preparingTto spring',at one an- otlier's thoats. me squ4,ws, soenting trouble liad risen also and seized a couple of burning sticks for thc purpose of back- ime up their chief if lie proved unequal to the Occasion. For a full second tliey stood tlius tensely silent, eacli resolving in bis mina to strike down tlie first one that mnved or spoke. Finally the red man's nerves could bear t h strain no longer. H1e made a quick move toward bis opponent 'You',re, a dam clieat!\"lie growled. \"You're a-li.\" Hie ery subsided into an inarticulate muxnble, as lie feil, stunned by tlie Wolfer's telling blow, across plie lire. By tie time the two women bad reaclied bis Along-tlie edge of this ravine, whicli as we have said waa very narrow but ef pro- found depth, the man guided hie wearied horse, until he arrived at a Point Where the sides broadened out and becomes less in- accessible.. Here he struck upon a blind trail, b y which 1 mean a track so elightly marked by the passenger's footsteps, that it can but be traced by a sliglit shade of verdure from the darker heathi around it, and, being only visible to the naked eye when at some distance, ceases to be dis- tinguislied while the foot is actually treading it-right down to the deepest depth of the glen, to where, in the very ridst of au impenetruble thicket of ever- green and narled sbrubs interlaced with vines _thât liung over the path and quite concealed from open view, la group of buildings were\" situated. - A long low cabin erected of unhewn loge and chinked with mose stood against a rock overlooking the littie stream; and, a littie below, a miserable shack with win- dows knocked out and door hanging by one hinge, gerved as a shelter for a nuxnber of cayuses and balf-a-dozen forlorn looking sleighdogs, one or two of whicli were nosing about the door-yard in searcli of a stray morsel to feed their half-starved bodies witli. There was about the place an uncanny atmosphere of secrecy, which could be more easily feit than explained. It was not difficuit to surmise this to be the lieadquarters of the gang; for, it was to al appearance,; an altogether ideal locaticn Sheep raising ie becoming popular and profitable in the West FREE! FREE! TO LADIES A Bottie of Blush of Roses The regular prire of the bottie of i3lush of Roses I send frec je 75lc. In other words, it is a regujar full- sized 75ec bottie that I give to any lady absolutely free. The xnost perfect face preparation and com- K ein beautifier. Whitens the cannot be detected. BLUSH 0F ROSES is ccar as water; no sédiment to fil the pores. BLUSH 0F ROSES will positivcly remove tan, freckles, pimples, hlackheads, I iverepots, moth-patches, erysipelas and salt-rheum. Remember this, no matter how dark or sal!ow your complexion niay be, you will Seo it i mproving day by day until a eklar, smooth and beautiful com- plexion is obtained. )Gentlemen who admire a lady's flue, lear complexion are not adverse to laving the Samne themnseives. And why should they hesitate to use the BLUSH 0F ROSES? It is clear as water, takes the shine from the face, removes ail the imipurities of te skin and leaves no sign likie powder or paint. l'he only ear, truc and harmiesa face preparation made. Cures eezemna and al Skia ,,i,.eases. Price 75e per bottle. Address Mrs. Frances E. Currah, Windsor, Ont. U~,Write For Free Trial Olier Biislî of Roses is Also F;r Sale by the T. EATON CO. LTD.t TORONTO and, WINNIPEG side the WoIfer had mounted, and, as tlicy lifted the miserable creature from bis fiery bed and brushed the red-bot cinders from bis face and clothing, the hoof beats of tbe former came down fainter and fainter on midniglit breeze, until at last tliey died away in the distance. It was almost sun up wlien the Wolfer reaclied the end of his journey. He had lef t the Assiniboine valley sev- eral hours ago, crossed the height of land, and entered the Swan River valley, which here ini spite of its serpent-like windings proceeds almost due north. The country was becoming very wild and rough; and had an appearance of desolution whicli the season lent to it, for, aithougli it was April, there was as yet littie or no verfure to, bide the ugliness of the rugged hillsides and the black mornas of the ravines, save t he clurnps of spruce and jack-pine which relieved'the sombreness of the landscape witli one occasional touch of green. A çcolumn of thick, white fog rising from the river, traced its winding course through the hlis for miles on eitber band. Not a sound disturbcd the soleman bush of morning, the monotonous murmuriflg of the rapid belIow, and thbe distant drurnming of l)rairit'-clîi(kels served rather to aC- cent u:t c ttlail 1isti îîrbt bat rtbls Our ar(i :îiii tannle \u003ci ad t a folui iiliseif 0on a il lotit1): lin ru I e hanging a glen of glre:t (elfft h but, ex- trcrnely narrow. The sides of the. glen wÇ're broken :i l\u003cs of (:111 h :Mid rocks of rot tenstfolle, whîe suîkl her ynto ithe litte ie vîlirig sI reain i bslow\\, :fforl-i)g many a t bieket of setbuid busInvood or tuf t of fern. for tlie nursery of crime, tlie birti place ôf tbe works of darkness. It was very quiet about the place whcn our traveller arrived. He decided that the gang must be either ail asleep or away. His entrance into the cabin, however dis- pelled botli suppositions. The breakfast table, well laden, and surrounded by the \"boys\" was tbe first objeet that met bis view, and the familiar frizzle of frying meat camne from a box stove in the corner wbich was attended by an ancient squaw with a blanket around lier shoulders.- \"Howd'ye, boys,\" hie said in greeting. \"Hello, hello Old Sport!\" \"Tlie top o' the mornin' toye, pard!\" and \"wbat luck?\" came from ail sides. \" Fairly good luck,\" hie replied dropping the bales of furs in the corner and seating himself at the table. \"And it's a peachy morning, too; but, 'donner und blitzen', I've bad a narrow escape!\" \"What! red-coats on the trail?\" \"Yaw. The colonel bas got on our scent at last. I came across one of, bis men down on the Assiniboine yestcrday morning. We bad a grand game of cat'n' mouse which lasted al «day. ButlImanaged to double on bim just at dusk, and tbrew himi off the scent.\" \"'Saperment! You don't suppose bie will bribe 'em to squeail do youi?\" 'Not as long as IÇetchcmoonae is. on ogr side,\" returned anot1ber, \"y'ýodcean depend on the old chiief to kecp 'vni quiet.\" 'Not now! That won't do-the old cibf's dead-killed--laid in1 the locker, man-and bis spirit is imbibing fire-water in the happy hunt ing grourid.\" 'Detd?-,killed? Sonie more of your m-ork, 1 presume. Tbousand Thunders, ian! You sbould have hadj more sense Iihan to 'do up' the binge on mWeih our %vhole trade, swinigs.\" -, y.. r .1 ~2O",
         "The Western Home Mfonthi y B, which as but of pro. lie wearied L where the :Les lems in- on a blind so slightly step s, that t shade of around it, naked eye to be dis- actually le deepest- i the very et of ever- Laced with and quite group of îhewn logs against a ~m- and, a with win- anging by a number Srn looking hich were earch of a af-starved le place an cy, which ,explained. s to be the was to al 1 locaticn h place ôf lace when idcd that ior away. ever dis- breakfast d by the t met his of frying Ie corner nt squaw [ers. greeting. le top o' id \"lwhat IlFairly the bales g himself morniflg, ve had a \"\"Yaw. t at last. vii on the Wce had ici lastéd le on hîm ic scent.\" se hie wil \"' Not as ir, side,\"1 E pend on -the old c locker, Ire-water of youf 'hunders, re Sense hich otir 4iMaybe he ain't dead,\" sug4ested sommoe, k it takes a lot to ' do' a nitchie, you know-they have as .many lives as a \"lWell if lie ain't,\"* returned the other emphatically'lY, \"twl be -ail the worsc for us. An Indian don't forget a foc sooner than his friend.\" \"Are you turned hen-hearted, Jack?\" asked the doer of the deed under discus- sion with infinite scorfl. \"iko,-Thousand Thunders !-no more than yourself. But it was something like that stopped ail trade seven or eight yearq ao. It happened down on the Old Man River, shortly after the first Mounteil police force i the West took up quarters in Fort McLeod, under this seif-same -Colonel Frenchi. You've heard of the lost placer of gold, and how it camne about that it did pot reach its destination? Well there was a big dust about it, and it did up the trade for one while.\" \"lIow should that be?\" \"Why,\" replied Jack, \"the nitchies got rusty about it and would flot deal; and the Colonel got so man4r warrants out- . \"Well, for ail that,' said the other, I wouldn't be a bit squeamish, myseif, about goin' down to thé post, after we' ve ýsent the furs down-stream to join i the celebration, and try to find out just how matters stand in regard to us.\", and lighting up the bronzed faces and bright-hued, picturesque dreos of the haif- civilized savages. The chiefs, gorgeous in paint and feathers, strutted about like imperial monarchs as they were, greeting onie another with their most formai salutations, and inquiring solicitously afý\"r each othee's health, but, keeping a wdtchiful eye always on th e gate. Within the precinct of the fort there was also a busy scene. A huge mound of loga had been heaped in the center of the courtyard ready to be lighted; and in the store-room the ire-place had been abund- antly replenished. The flames thiew -a cheerful glow over the chairs Which drawn invitingly axound it. A littie table, on which was placed the historie pipe of peace and a flask of brandy, stood nearby, for it was here that the chefs were to be entertained and the business was to be transacted. It was ail very cheerful and honéeike, the factor thought as he closed the door upon it and stroledà across the court toward the gate. In ail the buildings ightý were flashing; and from his own house came the sound of music and dancingfor twa the season of festivity for àil. Colonel Frenchi and haif a dozen red-coats stood beside the gate, waiting to usher in the guests. As the factor approached, the former stepped up to hlm, \"McLean,\" lie began in an Sheep. washing, a practice that is being discontinued in the West \" You can go if you like-none of the gang that bas ever done that lias come out alive-birt we ain't responsible.\" \"Donner und, blitzen! I'd like to sec French try to get this younker's head into a noose,\" returned the other and closed the subject. Ail day long the waters of the Assini- hone lad borne the leavily freighted canoe\u0026 of the natives down its swirling icit- fringed current. Ail day long they had been gathering at the pier, and the big gate of Fort Pelly lad swung for the patient squaws, who, with the fur bales strapped on their backs, lad toiled up thé hllside and deposited their burdens in a email out-building, adjacent to the maga- zine, or store; until, now as evening ap- proached, the little buding was filled alrnost to the roof with the precious wares which meant gold to both tradesman and customner, and presided over by one of the Mounted Police and one of Colonel French's surly blood-hounds. It was the trading season, 'afs much an event as Christmas or the First of July. The In(lians had come for miles in every direction and, after announcing their arrival and disposing of their furs, had gathercd outsidc thc gate to await the formal \"opening\" when they would be ad- rnitted into the fort, and begin the joyful rites of the célébration. 1 pivards of two hundred of . tlen there were. They had separatcd into grOuPs- eavh tribe, seeming by its owfln volition, to sUvby itself-and had lighted fires to kepthemseives warm. It was a wi1d1Y habri,îi yet with all, a pleasing seefle. *\\H r]ong the crcst of the bill on whieh tPelly stands, glimniered the sparks of f eslike glow-worms on a summerys A kinlflirig the dark, expantse of hcath, undertone, \"a buncli of men came in to-night to join in the celebration. Most of 'em are rougli-riders, fr~m the Swan River ranch but there's one among them whom I suspect to be one of the gang of illicit traders we've been scourig the country for ail winter.\" \"Surely not!\" \"I do thougli, they're regular dare devils you know; brassy enough to defy t'hc king and ail lis court.\" \"I doubt if either the king or lis court would be capable of doipg ruch wîth one _Lthemgents,\" grinned Mc Lean \" How- ever I hope it is one of the gang and that you get kim. Theyre a frightful menace to lawful trade. Good luck to you!\" He mounted the steps the watchman's gailery, and the colonel dropped back into lis place. As chief factor McLean appeared before them a hush of expectation feil upon the throng of natives without. The chief stepped forward, ali a row, and, after making low obeisance, stood silent, wait- \"Ify brothers,\" began McLean, \"I arn glad to welcome you ail back to Fort Pelly again. The heart of Adam McLean warms at sight, of you. You have suffered many things in this year you have been scparated from; have nobiy dared, bravely borne. You have brought your furs màn.y miles, shooting dangerous raj)idl5 have passed by the posts of the rival company, withstood the aluremneits )f illicit traders; ail this, to bring your ftirs to me. The hcart of Adam Mcl,(:mi 1 hrilLs with gratitude for vor loyalty; andI now, lic invites you to partake of bis hospitality and of that of vouir friend aiil aIly, Colonel French.' As lic finishiedspeaking\"4l( iHIe (afllori ini the bastion was diseharge , !'e t Things to Plant in October FORL ail eolors, per dos. 40c. 55c., 65o, and $1.00 1-19acinths,~ If required-by mail add'20c. por d. FO ASingle and Double Tulips, \"I l \u0026ulI Ie 25e ,,and 40c. If required by mail add 15c. per dos. ds 5. . * Il' Narcissus and Daffodils, L '' : If required by mail add 15c. to '2k. pcr dos THE FINEST7 u uun B/ aaou e'an Wv IN TREOrAlinWubCtlgewIan it0 LAND bu/bs, suitable for ail purposes, and wviil be mailMd. on request. Wm. Rennie Adelade\u0026 Jarylu Sts., Toronto, Ont. 190 \"MGU st., Nntra, Que. 1138 Nmi, Ist, Vumacu, \u0026C. muIe gÂH OF CANADA DANII BY MAIL A#VD SAVE 41iik ~LONG DRIVES. If none of our 200f Western Branches im ne-ar your homàe, mail un the cheques or cash y\u003cu receive, with your I'amsook, and vo ilIl return it with the Depomit oedted. Tien yoù en pay y'our bills las Il by cheques, whvh we viii honnir, or if YOU w:nt the cash yours elf sosaIII send i a cheqiue in your own favoir ,andl wc ill forward the mono\u003e'. saii'1 BRANCHES IN SASKATCHEWAN -Ahbey, Adanaeý Alsaak, Arcof a, Asquith, Asinibola, Bounty Bruno, Buchanan, Cabri, Canora, Carlye, CraikCupa, Cut Vftizfo Dinmmore, D)umyfler, Fast Bnd, Eeterhasy, Estevan Eyebrolmi- more, Gravclbourx, Guctrresw-Y, Guli Lake, Heriert, Hughton, Humboldt, Indian Head, Jres-n, KeIfielid, Korrobert, Kinderole\u003e' Landis, Lang, Lanilran, l.aw4on, Li.nberl(, Loverna. Lumudeu, Luseland, Marklin, 'Major, Miaple Creck, Maryfield, MacRorie. Melfort, Milesto)ne, Moope Jaw, Moosomin, Morise, Netherhil, Neudorf, Ogerna, \u003c)utlook, Oxhow, Pénae, Perdue, Piapot, Plenty, Prince Albert, Qu'Appelle, Regina, Robsarý Rocanville, Ronetova, S.skatoon, Seott, Sceptre,, Mîanavon. imp ri, Sintauta. Southey', Head O-ffice, Wnnipeg strmsbhurg, Swift Current, Tessier, Theodre, Togo,Tnpds To)talAsses gover$W5)jv( (OUVanguard, Veregin. Viveroy, Vidora, Mapesi, Wots, Watros Deposit'i fuer Oq'ï ) W ebb, W f-i,irn, W ilki, W indthorst, W iseiPY, Y rk on7 ea 1 i * t. . O t' ~1 when the Investment ait. À\u0026 - Tiri,c T-QPrnim - ant an issue, no small interest attaches tc the following statement by. the Manager in one of the publications of The Great WÀest Life Assurance C. : \"The investmetnts of the Company as a whole were neyer in a mgre satisfactory position than they are to-day. We find Ift now a matter of -supreme satisfaction that the investment policy of the Com- pany has always been direct(d towards mortgages on real e#tateý especially on farm properties. Contrdry to the general experience, we now find that the security back of our investments has been rather increased than diminished on account of the war conditions, this fact being due, of course, to the increased value which has accrued to ail farni productu.\" insuring in The Great -West, Life êssuAranoe Co. - WINNIPEG HEAD OIZFICE - 1 11",
         "was throwni opn, and the great tbrong of Indiaoe marched in4t,tothe mqsic ofthe military band'migled with tHe beatmng of tum-tums carried ky te 8ies h latter were ushered \"*t the holiest of holies, other'wise thie aforementiOned store-room, while thepopulaoe remained without in the courtyalrd indulging in the saltatory gyrations. of tler savage foré- fathers.' Around the palisade, stood, or squatted, upon the ground, a number of white men, employees at the post;* while ini a doorwaY of the stable lounged the rougli ridera from the Swan River ranch, who had ,éome to participate in the annual cele- bration., They seemed to be attractmng a deal of attenition froýn everyone; partlY, perba.ps, because they were strangers, partly for the same reason that cowboya m other climes meet with like attention. They were watching the wild grotesque dances of the Indians with interested eyes; and finally, sSering to catch the spirit of tZe hour swung into a lively trot known as the ÎReà River Jig. Now it was the Indip's turn to stop and look; and there was one àmo4 them- who looked more attentively than the rest. An old chief, with a fresh scar upon bis cheek having no furs for disposal had dedllned to join bis brother chiefa and remained without wandering disconsolately up and down and utterly refusing, in the aadness of bis spirit, to join in the merrymaking. Now, however, as he looked interestedly at the F,.\u0026ndhand his mn wm ecomning. The factor, foilowed 1y the chie!. was alio rushing sero S te yard. hi crowd parted to, admit the former, and then cloeed up again. The Wolfer's fingers are upon bis antagonist's tbroat, lie ischoking the breath out of him. And, even as Frenchi retiched the spot, the old chef rolled over on bis ide, and lay stili. A sudden frenzy aeized the crowd. With a yell of f ury they rushed forwaxd to the spot where the Wolfer stood, looking i- differently down upon the face of bis dead foe. The Mounted Police made a desperate effort to keep them off, but were them- selves swept to one side; and the murderer was seized and borne, struggling, out of the court. For a few moments, the littie band of redý-coats stood stfi, looking around the now deserted yard, lit only by the scattered embers of the fire, which the mob had trampled out in its fury and listening to the f ar away sounds of the hub-bub, then with a queer littie laugli, Frenchi turned to. bis companions: \"Guess we miglit as well let 'em have their way, boys,\" lie said. \"It's a bad business, 1 know, but it saves us the trouble of hanging bim.\" Out ini the silent darkness behind the fort, a man's figure lies quiet under the stars; and f ar away across the sea a mother prays for her boy whose chair stands vacant besfre the fire place. 'F7 ) -~ Towing her into deep water group of merry, rolicking cowboys, lie caught sight a familiar face and a strange exffion at once malignant, revengeful and \u0026mning, came into his own. For it was the face of the only man whose hand lie could not clasp in friendship; it belonged to the man who had robbed Mim of his f urs--it was the Wolfer! A group of Indians were trying to imf- tate the dances of the dowboys, and had swung out from the ire ta meet themn as they reeled and two-stepped \"àcross the yard. Chef Kitchemoonai joined them. He caught the eye of the Wolfer, caught and held it. The white man kticw that when they met there would be a final test- ing of strength and powers, yet lie kept right on. Nearer and nearer thcy cdgcd tao one another, the Indian, bis cyes still holding those of his encmy, was gathering hinýself like a pant ber preparihg ta spring upon its prcy; h ht a nervously fingcrcd the handile of the long knife hanging from hisibeit, and kept on dancing. With a loud crash the bnmd stopped. The antagonists were flot. six feet fromn each other. The white man could see the lurid liglts that piayed in the other's eycs. Suddcnly, as with a single bound lie cleared the interveninig.szlpace, the Indian was upon lii. With a fvearful oath the Wolfer shook hlmi off, but hie was back again instantly, andi the two f cli, grappling (lcsperately, upon the grotind. The crowd gathcrcd around thcrn, watching the figlit with sient fasemnftion. The Incian, being slighter and more supple, was. quioker, but the powerful hvavy frainc of bis oppo-ient, once on top, nievçir let him risc agamu A sIi -uf m'aose /from s5oxuewberc in thedi1ane Colonel Too Vivid One lady of the congregation had lier opinion of the new minister's wifc, and at last, after many veiled statements, ail of a more or less dubiaus cast, she made it known. \"She may be a good wife and mother,\" said aIe, ini the tone of one who makes mental reservations, \"but she lacka a good many qualities that you'd naturally look for in a minister's wife. She hasn't a mite of appreciation in her.\" \"I mean this,\" she went on solemnly. \"When she spoke of going to her mother's for a wcek with the children, I said ta lier: \"''ve neyer taken outsiders into my family, nor ever, should, but a minister is different, and I'd be pleased ta have your husband corne here for that week. 1 will give him the north chamber, that liasn't been occupicd since grandmothcr's death. \" 'There are fcw I should be wiling to have occupy that roomn and bcd,' I told lier, 'but of course the minister is ane.' \"Then I relatcd ta her how that Aunt Caroline, Aunt Eliza and rny mother had ail passed away in that north chamber, and how grandmnother, who was the last ta go, wasn't able to leave her bcd for six years. 1 told her that cvcry chair, table and pin- cushion in that charnier had associations with those who lad passed away in the roorn, and how their portraits ail hang on thie walls; and what do you suppose she '1 can't imagine,\" faltcred thc visitor. \"Shesaid. 'Oh, I think hc'd botter stay at home, alone, thank vou.\" \"Now ipake what youi can lof that,\" said the unappreciated one, lugiiiriously. \"It shows -lie lad no rcalising sense of what I offerod.\" 1 The western Home Mdont hIy I HORROKSES' FLA NE LETTE \u003caeby te*0 nfctreaof the clebraed LONGCLOTHS, TWILLS \u0026 SHERTINGS) are madè from,. carefu11y~ selected CO0T TO0N *The rai is short and close. * No inuioUs chemical are used. Quality, designs and colourings are unequalled. If puchaersoff ~ueMfiiImaterial for Underwear a'the year round would bdiy THE BESTIENGUSH MAKE, obtainable from the Ieading slorstey would appreciate the' comfort and durabiity which ii4enor * ~quaities' of Flanelette do flot possess. SeSthe Dmre \"HORROCICSES\" ANNUAL SALE upwards of où -the mevedge eïery two yards.I T E N MILLION yards. Awarded thé Certificate of the Incorporated In8itute of HiYgiene. Fu w jd mt t6 ineva uc owL..e ,oaule wpiygo Aaua JOHN E. RITCHIE 417 àWgs Hil aa\"meSt. Cathim uin ed eàt MONTREAL Every activity on the farml is worth KODAK RECORD The growth of stock and crops, the condition of orcbards and buildings, the things you see at the fair, at the f armer' s in- stitute-the Kodak can help you get value received front every one of them. A.nd its capacity forî increasing your enjoyment of your auto trips and other outings is equal to its value in a business way. Asic your dealer or writé wu for our illustrated bJokdl, \"Kodak on thte Farit.\" It's free. CANADIAN KODAK lýCO., Liin'itcd(, 6 10 King St W.,TUOIÎ()r",
         "The -Western Home (Ifonthly Madoen Canadia by Lever Brothers Limited, Torontci. MADC UN CANADA 100 visible OLIVER No. 5 Typewriters Price Beduced from $115 to $56-Termfl $4 a Month-IrME TriaI-DUTY PAIDI1 Latest No. 5 inodel, perfect machines only, tnt damaged or shopworn. Every feature; back-.1,)acer, tabulator and 1ruler. Lîncon- ditioxially gtiaranteed against defect of mnateriai or workmanship. Metal cover- Conlete outfit. Only 100 of these machines at this price. They are now in Canada and1 the duty prepaid-yousv ore than hialf thue regular price. his is the greatest tYPe- wsriter bargain ever offered in Canada. Send nanue and address promiplyfor free cata1og. (328) Typowriters Distributing Syndicate 1510-76G Wabash Ave. Chicago, U.S.A. BUY YOe HAISESB AI 11 AE OE The After Treatment of Infantile Paralysis-, Writtis for Tise Western Homne Monthly by Dr. Lnard Keene Hirshberg. A.B., M.A., M.D. (Johns Hopkins). g. T he vas aio icrowd rid then igers are choking even as ~Id chief Btifi. A With a 1 te the king i- his dead esperate e them- ixrderer ,eut of band of und the cattered ieb had ening to Lb, then lrned to* -M have s a bad us the àind the acer the e sea a se chair ALTIOU( H in the aute stQge of ail i attack of infantile paralysie, thse chef efforts are directed towardi cleansiutg the nose and'thlbat, fiushingt the bowels and kidneys, reducing the, temperature by ice caps and Bponging,t and relieving pain, yet the moment1 paralysis sets ini or is evean suspeated,t the treatment to prevent deformity must1 bie beguïh and developed patiently, per-E haps for monthe. The first and most important measurec is to give a prolonged deep, bot bath ati least once a day, if possible three times1 a day, and once ini the nighit. The child1 should bie laid in dee.p ivater, at a tem-t perature of 100 degrees, and hotter waters should hae addciid dring ten or fifteent minutes, tili the bath is 104 degreesl. The body should bie compltely immersed,t the head'supported by the nurse's hand, , and the cramped limbe ehould biet straiglitenec a.nd fioated. The warmth relaxes the tension of ail the muscles, and during the stages of acute pain affords the greatest sense of relief. Many of the deformities corne from a child being alloweýd te lie in bed with one knee drawn up or an arm contracted, because the limb cannot be stretched f straight wthout great pain. Thse value4 of the bath lies in the fact that tIhe limbs ran be, straightened for a few seconds at firgt, then for an increasing time, till they ean reminr in position for minutes. In cases where there ie meningeal pain, with rigidity at the back of the néek the head should, rest in the water till the ears are almost covered. This fioating position eases the pain at the back of the neck. it will be found that after -a few days sliglit voluatary movements can be made ivitîs the para-lyzeà limbe, while im- inersed in water, first the thumbs ori toes can bie moved, 'then the ba.nd or foot, then the arm e tretch out to grasp a floating toy, -or the foot be pusbed againet the foot of the tub. Great importance is attachied te the eve- tematic repetition of these movements, for they can bie accomplished fully two weeks earlier in the water than they can be in the bied. Evea before the voluntary movements cm~ be made the nurse should make passive movements, wliile the child is relaxed in the bath, so t1tat the muscles rnay not become atrophieci. In order to keep a child contended during the long interval of fifteen minutes, there should be. toys, a boat, or bail, or mag- netie fisii in the bath, so that hie eau move his arms and f eet to some purpoe ini playing. A second attendant siîoUld always be at band to keep the -tempera- ture of the wate'r increasingly bot and to assist in the removal to lbed. This must be aceomplised without chili. The best Way is to lift the child iivto a blanket, roll bim up, lay im in the bcd and dry him quickly. Food and necessary mnedications should follow the bath immediateily and then, if possible, tihe patient should sleep. During a period of several weeks which follow the severe pain and onset of paralysie the child suffers from total or partial paralysis, great weakness and tenderness in the linibs. He will always comiplain of pain in the well side of the oyfrthat is tired by the dragging weigb't of the paralyzed limbs. The paralyzed side mnust, therefore, be eup- ported on a p1IllOwe and both Bides inassagcd. As the object of treatmen't at that stage is to prevent deforrity ansd to restore to every muscle wbose nerve sIlpply is not eut off as mnuch power as possible, it is of the greatest importance to carrYv on a series of progressive, exer- hi(si'the hiot bath as welI as il, the bcd or chair. The nurse must use hier ingenuit\u003cy to manake tbese exercises attractive and encourag\"e the child by rewards to increase the nuimber of times of the movements each day. The following are tbe mnovementsthat should be made first in the bath, then in the bed. Glinching the hande, extending thse palmer waying the arms up and down and around, touching eacli ehoulder'and the top of the ,head, holding the hamnds extended and turning t5hem. every wey possible or* performiug any of thse regular echool exercises. For the legs and f eet thse following exercises are of, use: WTriggJing the toes, moving each foot. up anci dow's from aide to side, raieing one foot and placing ite heel on the toes of thse other, drawing the leg up to the knee and extending it, separaating thse f cet andi drawing them, together, kicking up in thse air.,, These exercises begun in the bath, con- tinued in bcd and when: eitting up in a chair, should be practiseci a greoit i\"\"iy. times daily, until the cIsl1d, can make sufficient movements to helb )himaelf. As soon as hie can raise himsif to a eiiting position by the nurshoanc, and ean ait Up dressed for an hour or two, then every. effort ehould be made to develop hie muscles by means of his play. The bot bath should be continued. once a day for splashing, and regular exercises should be especially planned te overcome the par- ticular deformity t\"t is threatened; but wbat the child will do voluntarily for himef ie of tIse greatest importanca Sir Walter Scott was a victim of infantile paralysie,*which attacked him at the age of eighteen menths. It le interesting to note thst the treatment. preseribed tby hie grandfaither, who wasaa distinguished anatomiet andi physician, was the saine as t4s~t recommen ded to- day. He was sent to, hie grandfather's farm in Scotland,.and when the day was fine ho wae carried out ameng thse crage and rocks and laid down inu tIse care of au old shephetrd. He soon began te rol1 about aud t.ry te stand, finially te walk and climb aud run, and in hie own words hie says: \"I, who in a city had probably been condemned te hopeless and heiplees decrepitude, wae now a heo.ltIsy, bigh. spirited and, my lamenes spart, a sturdy cbiild.\" The ideal place to, recever from an attack ià the counttry, by the waters of a 6ehallow, warn lake or river, or the sea- ehore where, there is ne surf. TI's facilitates swimsning or swimming move- mente. Level roads and a slight slope te climb furnislh the best surroundi-ngs; but, lacking these, especially in winter, many artificial aide te exorcise inay beelied indoors. A child should be put on a rug en the floor with toye as soon as lie je well enoughi to oit up for a few heurs, and should boenecouraged te crawl around. If the lowc'r limba are affeted hie eheuld crawl around, turtle fashion, by sprawl- ing on a little wooden platferm. set on castors and pushing and pulling Isimself fromn place te place. A jaunmting car te werk with the arme will afford him splendid exeqrcise for the arme, and a tricycle can be used as soon as hie en walk a feaw steps. Ali sorts of games te strengthen the arme and bande can bc devised, a pulley to, work from thse cbild's' window to another, or acros the room, bitting a ehuttecoek suspendeci from the ceiinîg, ail ki nds of kindergarten work, clapping the bande, to musiç, playing \",Pense porridge hot,\" \"Simon says thumbs up,\" as well as tests in pulling and pusbing. During, the tise of slow recuperatien, massage of the paralyzed limbe ebhould be practised intelligently, and gaivanic treatment givea daily for at least thre or four times a week. Nearly ail the deformities of infantile paralysie cari arnd should be prevented by caref;il attentiosn to exerciscesanid proper posture, or by the u.e' of simple ap- pliasnces, therefore, altbough country life is urgeçl as the ideai, it is weil to keep in touch witb the clinice and specialiets of a city for advice. -, 17~ f 1; k \"àMadîe-In-Canada\": Wrietot ho Cudahp Packing Co.. Toronto, Ceaa\u0026. ft,urBooh1k\"ilOinto Houewivea.\" haci ber andi at ail of a made it vif e andi one who ;he lacks Laturally hasn't a alenily. noter's i to ber: into My [nister is tve your . 1wilI lt basn't s deatb. iing te ,\u003e I tolci one.' at Aunt her bad iber, andi t to go, ix yearS. anci pin- ciations in the ang on pose she visitor. ter st:sy f thatt,\" )riosly. sense of",
         "1 1re 1Western Home Vontlily ASK YOUR NEIGHBOR MW,~of yourfrende and awighbors usne he 0-Cedar Polilth Mop-over a fflMainum-k thear opiu.o They will teli YOu just how much work it flV0the-~bw lgU and iclBp it keeputIieir houme and wvith so limte LOOK HOW EASY, IT is Iieg handie onables you to reach the most out-of-the-way places witlOut 0600109 or reachiug. It is a threo\u003e.in-oue mop-It dusts, cleans and polishes MOtI 0 OP «taOu. It picks up every grain cf dust and'holds it--does not -mb 8P*i t t e m cnewhorelase. At the mare turne it ceaus and leaves a lav4 dry durable lustre wherever it goes. It keepu your furniture and floora soi nshed woodwork bright and cdean. (Tis infGUARANTfiD (moi, in cana\"a) If this Mop or 0-Cedar Poliuhdoen notdo what we eah\" for it your dealer wil refund pur money. ORDER TO-DAY-- very dSky you delay means more work for -you. O-Codar PoIIsh 25C. to$3.00 Your Dealer has them ail. r754. end I 8. Ohannol ChemIncal Co. '~~ LU MITED Round, Standard Mop 389 Smran Ave.,Toronto U.00 and $1.50 Listen to What Nurse WINCARNIS says about 4,; being \"Run Down\" W 7HEN your1 system is under- V'mined by worry or overwork- - when your nerves are \"on edg\"-* when the Ieast' exertion ires you- you are in a \"mrn down \" condition. Your system is just Illke a flower drooping\" for lack of water. And ___ just as water revives a drooping flower - so WINCARNIS gives new hf e to a \"run down\" -constitution. WINCARNIS is, a tonic. a rcstorative, and a blood mnaker combined in one dear delicious beverage. It does nol contain drug . . t does flot merely \"patch you up\"; it gives you new fifIe and new energy for the day's work and pleasure. If you cannot obtain Wincarnis from youm dealer, adian Agent, Mm. F. S. BALL, 67 Portland Street, send you the narne of our nearest representative. write to our Can- Toronto, who wilI Fam'ous War Correspondents By E. L. Chicanot, Thorsby, via Leduc, Alberta T HE first message sent back from. Russell of the' Turnes -\", who, was knighted England, by the men who went to by Km*g Edward, when over eighty years represent American papers at the of age. theatreoft war was i the nature of a com- lus virulent. dispatches from the Crimea plaint or lament \"The day of the war- and his disclosures of the awful misman- correspondent la gone.\" The almost coin- agement of militaq~ affairs led to the fail plete embargo imposed by France and of the existing mimistry. Latterly lie was Eng1and upon newspapermen, has sent attached to. Lord Clive's staff iii India, ad these over to the German military bases, assisted at the capture of Lucknow. 'Af- where they bave almoat a \"passe-partout\", terwards hie went to the United States and or compeiled thein to leisurely follow up through the \"Times\" gave to the English the Allies line of advance through the people, the events of the Civil War. Bis devastated villages of France and Bel- descriptions of the Zulu War, the Battle of gium. Neyer do they approach the actual Sedan, and the Egyptian campaign. were scene of operations, and the literature of marvels of descriptive writing, and the the war when it cornes to be written will fact that these accounts are still extant be done by men who took part in the con- speaks volumes of their literary value. flicts of which they write. \"Archie\" Forbes, the farnous \"Daily It was I\u003citchener's determination in the News\" correspondeiït, peculiarly filled his first place to permit absolutely no news- position, for before embracing the pro- papermen to accompany the expeditionary fession of Journalism lie was for some force, but the tremendous outcry raised years a private in the Royal Dragoons by' London and provincial newopaperst\u0026whieh lhe joined on leaving Aberdecen caused him to retrench a littie and a single'University. His extreme virility and correspondent from each allied country boundlesa good health and spirits, made was allowed to go along with the.troqpa. f enta psile te him which would have Only one correspondent was permitted to bcen beyond the capacity of many a ail neutral countries, and the umqýue honor writer placed mn the awkward situation? ho of being the sole transmittor of viewa from. somnetimes found himself in. Hie ac- the actual seat of warfare, -4,oApierican complished marvellous feats of news and Canadian papers, feil to Frederick transmission in the Franco-Prussian war, Palmer a well-known New Yorkjourai- and in the Zulu war, made is farnous ist..Iv\u003cr. Palmner la perliapo t h e best ride of 110 miles i fifteen hours, by which known war-correspondent on the American lie gave to his paper the first account of continent, having already been under fire the battle of Ulundi, received in England. in the Russo-Turkish war, the Russo- It was just about this tirne that the globe Japanese war, and the canipaigns in came to bc cornpletely circled by cable China and the Phillipines. and telegrapli, and the speedy transmission Apart fromn the politicaL motives Kitch- of the, news of the battle arouged mucli crier seemA to hiave a special detestation for comment at the tirne. Thus on account the war-correspondent as the following of the vastdifference in latitude, the result sqyshows: During has Egyptian cain- of the battle was being cried i London paign, the famous journalist Bennet Bur- tesbuhafnhurfe ihaqq1 leigli accompanied the troops as corres- parenl taken place, whilst the newsa. pondent of a London paper, and hi reachff anFancisco actually ten hours despatdhes forrned the literature of the before it took p lace. Ardhibald Forbes camain.During a short engagement, also went through the Russo-Turkish war, camg ihaegrestoseeey in has journalistic capacity, anid sometimes thing that was to be seen approached very entered into- some very dangerous situ- near the enemy'a redoubts and was in a tations to obtain the \"copy\" for his vivid position of extrerne danger. An English con. soliier noting lus preclicamentwnott Mr. Le Sage, the editor of the \"Daily hlm and brouglit him safely back ht t Telegraph,\" bas filled rnany journalistie ownlin. Te flloing a Kte o roeB and in the Franco-Prussian war, ownlie. hefolowngdayKichener prvd hinself a very enterprising war- in his despatoli to the war-office men- po tioned this soldier and recornnended hlm correspondent. He went through ail the for promotion and a modal \"for con- stirrýng incidents of the Siege of Paris, a spicuous bravery i saving the life of a previous to it becommng public, received camp follower.\"1 the newe frorn a high authority of the The saine Bennet Burleigli made a signing of an armistice. glorious \"'scoop\" on the.eveAf the lst Realising the value of the information South, African war. Ti a an inter- ho hurried with ail speed to the Gare du view with Joubert the Boer general. A Nord and set himself te work to charter a slow train on whîch lie wÀ.s travelling was special train fromn Paris to Calais. He overtaken by a special on which Joubert discovercd, howcver, that lie had been and lis staff were going to the front. By forestalled by the special correspondent of bluffing a station-master lie got the the \"Times\", who had utilized the only special stopped, and boarded it. H1e was available train. Determined that his heartily congratulated for lis enterprise paper should be the first to secure the im- by the good humored generalissimo, and portant news ho commandeered a train obtained a capital interview for lis paper. whicli was about to start for Lille. There The exploits in the saine war of Winston lie was succcssful, and managed te get bis Churchil-his capture, imprisonment at news through to England se that special Pretoria and subsequent escape under a~ editions of bis paper were bcing sold in load of merchandise-are too well known. London somne two hours beforc the newa to need recapîtulation bore. reacbied other newspaper offices. But the reporting of modern wars fades __________ into insigmflcance when wo tak q intoh account the toil and hardship, iïch A Man and a Dog rzealous newspapermen had to undergo ~ ihaooist ie in an era previous to that of the tele- -Wt plgist ie grapli, cable and camers,-when. messages H1e was. a dog, were transmitted by liorsemen and, pictures But ho was loved taken in pendi under difficuit and dan- And petted by everyonc--tenderly led. gerous conditions. Hie was a dog MeltonPriqr, the famous artist-corres- That didn't roamn. pondent of the \"llîstrated London He lay on the couch, or rug, or led, News,\" who dicd a few ycars ago, was in And with the dainticst bits was fed; altogether thirteen campaigns ranging For the (log each beart in that household fromn the Ashiantce War of 1874 to the beat Russo-Jiipanese, of 1913. During these At morning and evoning, in cold and heat. expeditions lie sent scores of sketches to He was a'dog. bis paper, drawn often, st retched on lus stomnach on a hammiliock, ith the shelis lie was a man, -bursting around hiifli.- But didn't stay Anterior to Melton, on the saine famouýs To cherish his wif e and bis bidren faim. paper, was the war-artist William Simp- He was a man son, wlio followed the French troops in the And every day Franco-Prussian 'wam, and afterwards ac- His heart grew callous, its love-beats rare. companied the Germ'ans in their entry H1e was left to himself hy niglit and by day, into Metz. Again in the Afghan w-ar, ho And, shunned by bis family, hurried away kept lis journal supplied with the most To bis work, to the bodge, thé store or vhidportrayals of current happenings. the shbw. Perhaps the greatest warýcorrespondent For thev woul rather he'd go, you know. w ho ever lived was William Howard lie w-as a man. k5 i., , J e t, e f 31 v s a 31 e b s p g e d a d b h q",
         "The Western -Home Monthly Things as knighted ighty years the Crimea, ul misman- te the fal erly Le was i India, and( know. Ai-, States and he Enghish War. nis e Battle of paign'were ~and the tiil extant rValue. us \"Daily y filled bis the pro. for some Dragoons Aberdecen 7lity and rits, mnade uld bave many a uations hoe He ac- of newvs ssan war, às famous ,by which iccount of iEngland. the globe by cable nsmssion ied mnuch n acceunt the result n London t bad q, the newa- tes heurs Id Ferbes rkish waxr, ;emetimes rous situ- is vivid e \" Daily mralistic 3ias wsr, sing war- eh ail the f Paris, a ,received by of the rrmaton Gare du charter a lais He Lad been ondent of the onl;y that his -e the im- 1 a train sThere to get his at special g sold lu the news 4 How inany of us are abject slaves to1 \"things.\" It nearly kilisa me to clean house, says one, for VIve s0 many1 \"ethings!\" Tbey ail have to ,be cleanedi and dusted twice a year and a good many1 have te, be repaired. It takes me ail the time, aays another, te, keep nmy house even decently tidy. We've 50 inany \"ithing,9\" it takes one woman ail hier time to care *eOr them. Amd 80 we go, ail of1 us, weariflg our energy away, puttering1 Our tinie away, enslaviflg ourselves te \"ithings,\" Wbat kind of \"things\"? Oh, eurtains and portieres and draperies and couch covers and sofa pillows and crazyi quilts and vases and things you buy at1 the ten-cent store and cheap pictures and tag' ends of dishes that you've no use fori and whieh you bought at a sale, and rugsi and carpets and blankete and birds inu cages and ar'tificial palms and wax flow-1 erIS and enrarged pictures aind statuettesi and rocking chairs and big heavy wooden i edsteads ,an d tÈbourettes and pedestals and knickety-knackety stands and ail of those other things, which instalmeut stores advertise as making a bouse look '-homey.\" Tbey make it'look more like a iecondhand store. If we could work a reforin lin hous furnishing we shouldl have wrought' a miracle inu-the health and spirite of the women who take care of the houses, and so in the care and training of cildren and in the happineas and success of the maital relation, and se te the next gen- eratien and then the niillenium vwouId bo bore. But women 'will kee~p on being the slaves of Things. When a girl begins lier preparations for inarriage \u0026lhe begiN te gather about her-Things. She collets cushiôns and draperies and curtains and. dishes and gew-gaws of aIl sorts. Men and women are a good deal like the jack- daw who steais everything and anything ho can get bis beak on te carry off to bis hiding plaoe-except rthat the jackdaw steals because hoe doesn't know any bet- ter, and people speud their xnoney and energy on.buying Things because they don't know any btter. A woman will ait for hours in a close room embroider- ing some f oolish littie piece of linen for her table, injuring hier eyes and wasting bier strength when she xight a good deal b-tter be eut in the sus and wiud and air getting strength and health storcd up so she can Le happy and cheerful and nerve-less instead of nerv-ous, We believe, as no one btter, in a beau- tif ul home, but4fhere are a variety of opinions as to what constitutes a beauti- f ul home. Every nation, every age, every decade, almost every year has a new con- ception of beauty. A few years ago walls were decorated with cardboard inottoes, cardboard pieture frames, worsted flow- ers, wax wreaths, hair wreaths tables were littered with conch shelis, star 1mbh, bits of cora. and sea weed, bearing testi- mouyc to the travellcd accomplishments of some member of the family and so to Le displayed in pomp and pride. Another time we carted in great armfuls of cat tails and sunflower stalks-which wasn\"t so Lad because we had to go eut of doors to get theni. We painted the butter LdWl and the jellycake-tins with wtiter scenes and sprinkled diamond dust ever them; 'we painted bottles and cloth and dust- pans and everythiug that wasn't Ling used in the oven--and thought we had an acsthetic taste!\"' Then we swung over te big Bibles and enlarged pictures and cheap paper inache and plaster of paris fig\"ures and vases; and 1 don't know just where we are new. I've sort of lest inter- est in--Things. t's a phase that al honie-inaking people have to go t.lrough more or less, but the pity of it is that the maJority of them go' through it- mlore. A goodly share of the working- ilal's wages goes te the ten-ceflt store for worthless trash. Countless valuable tliiýgs, good enougli for anybody's use can- be bought at the ten-cent store and it lias been of inestimable value in brin.- ~il- coniforts into the poor man's home. PossiblY, too, there is an argument in favor of the çheap \"pretty\" Thîngs. Verv likely ,thé bisque and plaster of paris figures, the pictures and other truck-y things one secs in cheap stores 'atisfYv a certain longing for beauty that. the very poor could sot otherwise have satisfied. If se they may have tlieir place, but if -we could bo taught that it is better, te save ten ton-cent pieces and buy one really good picture for our yýails, instead of ton cheap little things, àÇvalu- able stride would bave becs taken in our education toward better-Things. We have to have some Tbings of course-bureaus te keep our clothes in, beds te selcep on, chairs to sit on, dishes and tables toeaet from. If we eliminated Things cntirely fromn our scheme of life wo sliould be no better off than our- ancient ancesters. But we cau learn -tho beauty of simplicity in Things and that is a lessen upon whieh we are almost universally ignorant. A dining rooni is a place in wbicb te eat. The only thingaS needed theire are a table, a proper nuip- ber of straight-backed chairs, a sideboed, serving table and possibly a closet. or cupboard for dishes. Nothing else is needed, but te add te our pleasure we may have growing plants or cut flowers. Absolutely nothing more bas a place in this room. If there la a mantellet it 'bold a dlock, a vase for fiewers, possibly a rare or treasured dish, but nothing elge. Plate rails are dust catchers. Dishes hung about the wall add little or notbing to'the Leauty of the reom unlens tbey are very rare r very Leautiful and you cau afford te keep some ose to duat theni. The bouse mother has tSe many really important tbings tô do for ber te, spend lier tume dusting uselcss plates. If t1ie dining rooni serves as living room as well Ltheus some lenioncy xnay be had in the furnishings and those things added wbieh are neeessary for the comfort of the famuly. Bedrooms hould bave notbing what- ever in theni Lut the Led, a chair, a bureau or dressing table and whatever other fursitur'e.1à absolutely needed for dressing and sleeping purposes. Any superfinous curtains, draperies, decora- tions, or Lric-a-brac are collectors of dust and ge'rms and aet as conveyors of poison te the lungs. Fleurs xigt better e Le are if ose can afford smootb floors, altbough in these days of vacuum cleaners, carpets or fill- ing cS Le laid over a Lad flour and still Le kept free from dust. Uselees rugs laid aLout bers and there for ornameut are a nuisance. Ail vases that carry no mes- sage, have ne memories, have so use, and are net particularly and especially beau- tiful, se giving pleasure and comfort te thse soul, might better Le thrown it once upos the jusk pile along witb useles draperies and ther rtrasb. Go over your bouse carefuily and sesl bew many perfeotly useless Things there are in it.; how ms.ny Things you are dusting and bandling every day or every few days, Things that are just-Things, If evor I build a bouse-and I bope te some day-I shall bave very few roonis and these witb plenty of room and liglit -roonis that have but two windowless sides to theni anyway, and ene wheroe\\ possible. I shall have sideboards and closets and ahl possible furniture Luilt lu se they -won't have te Le handled in house-clcanling time (and anyway there shaa't Le any house-cleaiiing tume) evea thougb in se doing I deny mysoîf that pleasurable prerogative of womankind- changing the furniture about I sha.ll have smooth, Lare floors and f ew rugs. I shail bave f ew pictures and those chosen Lecauso I love theni. Wbat vases are about will Le there te lsold flowers. There will Le two or three good figures- plaster. if I csn't afford anything btter. There'll Le no band embroidery os my linen, if 1 have to do it myseif, although. I'd liko it te Le of good quality. The dishes sill Le as fine as I can afford, and as beautiful as I can get for my money, but there wu't Le sny more than I need. But there saaLe plenty of garden snd lawn and piazza-heaps of pidzza, and on the piazza will bo good comfortsble solid furniture-wicker, I thiink, with 'ham- Linoeks and lounges, for mny bouse shall be an outdoor bouse 'with a comfortable inside to live lu when you can't livo out. I shalbave nothing te take care of tat I dan possibly avoid, and I shal Le ne slave to Thinge. Puffed Wheat, 12e Puffed Rice, 15sc. 1 Ecèpi lnuExtremaWeil The samne stery applies te Puffed Rice. grain foods, which are btter for thons, thas meat. And for Puteffd- Wbeat and Rice, the Lest forms of grain food. These delightful morsels are scientifle fooe They seeni hike bon-' Lons-flaky. toastcd, almond-lavored Lubbies. But tbore's vaster reason for theni than enticing taste. Net al'grains cau Le puffed. But thon. that ea b. ahould b. largely served lu this hygienic form. TheQakrOis0p1 , Sole mak ors PETERBOROUGH, Ont. SASKCATOON, Sask. ASupperStr for theBo Some night when the boy is eating his dish of Puffed' Wheat in milk, tell him this story about it. Each grain of that wheat contains 100 million food ceisp\u003cý made up of many kinds. Each food ceil is a globule whic'h must :be.broken-,-to ' digest That's why we cook or bake it:' Raw: wheat wu\u003e flot do. But, until late years, no proce ss w as known 'whcb*. would break up ail those food celîs.- - Prof. Anderson' s Disco-vezry Prof. Anderson found thàt each food ceil held nioisture. He conceived the -idea of converting that moisture to steam. To do this he sealed up the grains in guris.. Then .h' revolved those guns for one hour in-a fearful heat.. 'The n he shot the guns and the steam in each-food cell explode\u0026,'ý blasting the celi to pieces. Think of it-a hundred million steam explosions occur in every Puffed Grain. That's what puifs them into bublles,' *. eight times normal size. And that's how whole gr\u003eahls'areý made wholly digestible, so every atom feeds. .erly led. iouscold ud beat. Iren fair. ats rare. 1 bydav, ied away store or )u kiow.",
         "The Westelin Home iWonthly Rich Red Men Written for The Western Home Monthly by Max. 34Di. does flot separate in the : Sboule -jt is the same Sail through -the last- Sdrop is as dêiciou8 as the first. mad.l -s-.,,- . A soit, luminousfilght, which caste no eshadow. Brlghter glian *lectricîty or acetylene. Makesanmd burne its owa gis. Coats 2c a week. rNe dirt, amoke nor odor. Over 200 styles, ranging from 100 to 2000 candie power. Absohately guaranteed. -Write for illustrat.dl catalog. AENTswJrI!DEVFaIWf1.E THE BEST LIGHT CO. dot F.-\u0026hst«,CDto%,O. Impressive Stationery We would like to quote y ou priew on Stationery which la at once both impressive and dainty. We make a specialty ~of Wedding Invitations and Sgolety Stationery, and our p lant enjoyi every facility for turning out work of un- excelled quality. Stovel Company, Ltd. printrs and Lithographers Winnipgg Man. (jet a Farm of Yofir Own Take 20 Years to Pay. If you wish. The land will support you and Sa y for itself. An immense area of tle nost fertile land i Western Canada for sale at low prices and easy terms, ranging froin $11 to *$30 for farm lands witlî ample rainfal- îrrigated lands from $35. Teris-Oiîc- twentieth- down, balance within twentY Year*s. In irrièation districts, boan for farma buildings, etc., Up ta $2,000, also repayable in twenty years-interest only 6 per cent. Her is your opportunity ta increase your farîn holdings by getting adjoining land, or secure your friends as neighbors. For iterature and par. ticulars apply to P. W. RUSSELL, Land. Agent, Desk 64, Dept. of Natural Resources, C.P.R. Winnipeg, Manitoba. AC4 BRANDON, MAN. SEND FOR OUR FREE CATALOG F. A. WOOD, Principal 'It will berather a surprige ta -mbsi jpeople ta be told that aboriginal reÉ pme n of the United States and Calnade aMthe wealthiest people per capita ii the world. The average -iveath of th( lipe fte world is about 810.00; fai Ete-United States and Canade oêimbined about $1,400.. But a tribe cf Osage Indians in 0kma hanta and the Blackfeet tribe in Aberta, have these figures pushed away into the Ibackground. The Osages are wortls pez capita more. than 860 times, and the Blackfeet more than 500 timea, as muci as the average citizen of the world, anc six and four timtez respectively as muci as the average citizen of the United States And Canada. The Osage number about 1,800 seuls, and every one'cf them-înan, woman, and hid la worth $8,612 in ]and and cash, and lias a comfortable incarne be- sides. The words \"every one\" are used advisedly, for ail the worldly goeds af thesepeople are held ini commnon. TlÇeir possessions, reinforced by a preserit capitalization of their incoine, mnake every cone of thè\\tribe worth, it is esti- * .mated, cabout $50b0'\\ Their wealth at bonid consiats of $8,000,000 in cash held îythe geovernrnent, and 1,500,000 acres -cf land, most of which they lease. It was through the sale-of their land in Kanse a everal y q rs ago that the 'Osages we're atarted. on the highway ta tlicir great wealth. For this land they received front the goverrnent a sumn total of $8,000,000, which the government bas since held for them in trust, paying ta, them quarterly, the interest, arneunt- ing annua.lly te $400,000, or $222 for eaeh -man, weman and child. 0f the 1,500,000 acres ef land which they have rctained, they lease 600,000 acres fer grazing at an annual rentai of $120,000, which added ta, the interest op~ their money at Washbington, makes a .,venue of a littie more than $300 éach, or over $1,500 a year for each family cf five or more. Oue fainly cf fifteen, for in- stance, wauldreceive $4,500 a year with- out having te do a tap cf werk. At $5.00 an acre-a email valuation for land in that section, the Osage grounds are worthi $7,500,000, or $4.166 per capita. This added ta the $4,444 in cash, makes 'a total of $8,610 oWtned by each individual f ram the increment. Blackfeet Land Werth $10,000,000. There -are 2,329 Blackfeet settled on three reservee in Southeru Alberta. They belong te the great Algenkian lin- guistic stock. One cf these reserves has ail avea of 349,326 acres, and iso the largest ini the Dominion cf Canada. The total value of Bla.ckfeet land is $10,000,- 000, and the value is increasing at tîhe rate cf a dollar per acre per year. _i3esides th. ir vast reeerves, the Blaek- feet have stock amounting ta half-a-inil- lion dollars; tîteir buildings are worth $150,000; irnplements and vehicles repre- sent nearly $100,000; public properties are set down at $90,000; while household and general efferts bring the total of real and personal property lield by the 2,329 ]lackfeet up ta $11,645,000 or $5,000 per capita. In addition te this they have anl annual incarne of nearly $500 per capita. 'J'ie Sarcees, a srnall baaîd of 200 Tudiamîs, wliose, m.serve cf 0641,M acres touches the cty of Calgary ini Soutiiero Alberta, have wealthnostly inalanud, amnouuting tb a trifle moare per eapita than the B]aekfeet, but thte band is so small that it can scaroely be spokeii of as a tribe or nation. These lIffdis belon- ta the Athabascan race wilîi are sîîread eut between Alaslha,,and MNexico, flue Blevers lu fuie uorth, aund the Nava - *oes anti Apaches ini the southb ling brainches cf this tribe. Ilui the Bliaekfeet nation flîcre a: gevT:1t mnuureildren. The recotn t of1w wweuuîentagents show oilby 6(l i t o '\u003e329 verlte age of 21 YuMrq. I l ll wiealtlu of tlhe trihe \\vere commiiit tel Io flwse, ias it actuali.v is, each -voull b- \\Vori$912.Unilike the Osag l.te real anud personal property of the 131ck- fePt is net iield in common. but N-. to Il lu leads of fainilies. Allow li.,uiz eH t ;t children to a family, which k amnuderate Id estimate, the head of every teepee on a the reserves cf the Blackfeet would con- a trol $40,000. » Fortunately fer -the red men, flîcir r vast estates and personal property is d held in trust by the gevernimen-t ani caunot be squandered., I the Indian liad - ontrol, cf bis wealtlhdwould apend it 4 on fancy biscuits, gaudy handkercliiefs, e nnd fire-water. The fnct, that their r revenue enableus them ta live in idlenes ehais resulted in abuses in many quarters. k Intoxication is said te be on the increase, 1 and inany cf the Osageýs and Blackft à are deseribed as having retrograded ta 1 primitive conditions. The wildest cf the Osages live in the îsouthwest corner cf their reserve ln iOklahoma, where they are said 'ta Iobserve clasely the .custems cf their forefathers. They burn their dead at the stake, go almost naked al summer, and f at dead dog, a custom hardly te be rreconciled with oneus conception of the richest people on earth. jThe Blackfeet were once a pawerful 'confederacy wbîch held by farce of armns for a century ail the territery from the Missouri on tlhe aioith ta the Red Deer On the north, and from the Roekies cast ta the Cypress Hilîs. The protection of *tîjeir vast territery against invasion, imposed upon these India-ns a life cf \u003e almost constant warfare with the num- ërous enemies that surrounded them n ail aide.s, and developed in them a preud and impeTious spirit, which, after mare, thian 30- years cf reseTrvatian 11f e is etill the prominent characterietic cf the Blackfeet. These Alberta Indiane are 60 per cent pagan, and comprise 88 per- cent. cf al tlhe pagan Indians of the province, and 15 per cent of those cf the Dominion of Canada, including the Eskimos. They are the last band in 4anad'a te accept treaty fromn the government and settie on a reserve. Till they were actually prevented by the Royal North West Mounted Police, they continued rfhe bar- barous practices connected with the Sun Dance. -It ie oaly within the last few years that they have made any advane toward eivyilization. The Kodak on the Farmn We are la receipt cf an interesting bocklet fram the Canadian Kodak Ca. which explains the thousand and one advantages cf ewning a Kodak. For those wlio live on the farm there is no more valiant ally against the common f oe, nuonotony, than is pho4ogtraphy. For photography is not just a 'hobby by itself; it is an,. ally cf every other hobby. It makes ne difference what your hobby is, pictures cf everything pertaining ta that hobby have a per- sonal and, compelling interest-an in- terest that is- intensifled if you inake thern yourself. There's a home side, a- fun sid'e, an educational side and a practical side ta the Kodcxak on the farm. The baoklet is fllled' with *beautiful illustrations and tlhe publishers explain that it bas not been the idea in select- iug the pictures for thle littie book to choose unusual subjects, but ta show just the - kind of pictures that anyone can get at home or niear -home. They could have illustrated it with photo- graplis cf acroplanes and dreadnaughts and- subinarines and foreign views- w-itli speed pictures that are marvels; but they bave chiosen. rather the èvery- day things that are within the rech of everybody's lens. President Eliot of Hlarvard recently visited a biotel in New York, and when lie left the dininig-rooin the colored man in charge of the baits Picked up bis tule tithout hesitation and btuxîdcd it to hlm. ''Iow did ýý,ii knowv that waH mv bat wlien ¶j(fl hav-e a hundred Iliere9' asked :\\r liot. 1' td kwif, sah,\" sai(l the negro. \"Didn't know it was mine? Then wby di1vau give ifta me?\" \\Péu ýoi gaveit t -nie LOOK HERE Mr. Reader of The West- ern Home Monthýy Why pay $25 for a suit cf clathes when we will sel1 you ane for $12.50 direct from Engband, fÉade te your measure; . and what is more guarantec it in quality of ma- terial, style and fit to be equal te, if not better, iihan the suit you buy locally for $25?P rhat sounds ike a bard thing ta do, but here is how we will prove it- THE.PROOP Yogi know that clothing costs about haîf in. Ejigland what it does in Canada. You also know that you cannot beat the qualîty of genuine English fabrics. AIl right, then. If you wil f111 out and mail the coupon below we will send you The 'BurllngtonO Our- latest Style Suit, $19.50, duty book. Seventy-two free and carrnage pattern pieces of pald right to your clo t h, t a pe door. measure and a leie i e îsyen aI\" about aur system ofdoing busines-then you can judge aur offer for yourself. Remember Catesbys, Limited have been doing bdsiness in Canada for six years, and. that we are the bargest Mail Order custom tailors in the British Empire. We guaran. tee to satisfy yoru .Or give _y ou your money back. 'urthermore, althopgh, the tariff into Canada bas been increased 5 per cent we are not increasing the price of our suits to you..1 You will soon be needing a new suit, so iwhy not fi11 out the coupon or write a post card and get aur patterns now. MAIL THIS.COUPON NOWI -wM M-Éhm md M. ý MESSRS CATESBYS LIMITED) (of London, England) BooPt 10, 404 Tribune Bldg., Winnipeg Plaesend me your new season's Style Bokand 72 pattern pieces of clotb. I *ara thinking of buying a suit. IFull Name..........................I Full Address ......................... Four Months Acomm.odatone $45 B.i.r.d fot Inds«vidual ~country Instrution Studanis Moiropolitan Business Institute Phone Wnnipeg Main 2529 Manitoba The Only Business Cllet. In a Modern Office Block Expert instruction in commercial sub- jectss SchoI is equipped with ail modemn office appliances. Our teachers have been trained under practical con- ditions and impart' instruction both from a theoretical and practical stand- p oint. Special attention given te backward students. We assist our graduates ta secure good positions. Tc those who cannot leave home we offer special instruction by mail. WRITE FOR PARTICULARS NOW. Removed, ,]Pom,57 OTR ]DM AVENUE te larger and more up-te-date p romises at 338 Colony Street .Tust South cf Portage. On account of war am giving excep- tionally good rates. Woubd be pleased ta have those requiring our services write for further information. Can fit you with the best thatmoney can buy. J.H.lv.CARSON Mariufacturer of Artlfiil Limbe and Orthopedlc Apparatun I (",
         "The Western *Home i' ont»!\u003e A Trip throug h the New Gateway of --he Rockies Written for The Western Home Monthly by Jean Alice Blow The outbreak of the European war spoiled what promised to be the most successful holiday eeason ever known in Jasper Park, and Central Britislt Colum- bia. 'When hostilities began people were already gathering at various re- sorts, but particularly at Jasper, for mountain cimbing, fishing and general sighit-seeing expeditions. A number of artists and magazine writer8 were also among the visitors determined to ex- ploit with brush and pen the scenic beauties of this now accessible wonder- land. But immediately the word was fiashçd over the telegra h wires that at Banff, and are ýalso much higher,'and will undoubtedly soon become a Mecca for people in search of âealth. An hotel and other accommodation for visitors will be provided as soon as 'the park management cma get around to. that feature of the proposed dèvelopment works. The springs can be reached by a ride of fine miles over a. bridie path from 'Pocahontas, but we preferred to take Ithe longer route from Jasper u¶ýtlhe Athabýsca and acrose ýthe mountains. àA t rail has been opened part of the way, and the scenery \u0026long- the route is ex- tremely grand; consequently we f cit well The famous Punch Bowll'ails, Pocahontias, Jasper Park, Alta' Grcat Britain'e -var dogs'had been un- leaslied there vwas a hasty flîtting home- wards of the men folkýs, soma, of whom h.ad business interests, involved,. and others were eager te enlist for service whercver duty might cali. One would scarcely suspect that there vwas sucli a martial spirit in the men, both-young and mniddle-aged, who had set out to have a good, care-free tinie. It flash- cd out spontaneously, and vas really ad- mirable. Aithougli 'their.departure lbat to uts the 'gentler sex, the opportunity of formring new and no doubt desirable frienidships as wll as companionships on oitr various jaunts, we could net he so selflsh as to wishi they were not going. W\"e therefore decided-tlîat ýis our little party of non-militants-that we would follow out our prearranged plans as far ils po(ssible under the cireuatances, and a niost delightful outing ive most cer- tail-ha d. .Xter visiting bhe pretty lakus 'which nl- tIc in the valcys of the' Atliabas(a niMiette Rivers, and in anîong the iii iiLtains in the vicia ity of .J~cwe wHuIe a lîk' with thb 1oiesi to tIeý prings (sulp]îur) , whieh are twenty- Jtmiles south, and enjoYed a couple da ys \"taking the water.s.\" The 1;Iurs of tilie- springs anal-e nîuch erin ine(iciual qualitics iian those repaid for taekling the few difficulties that beset us, and have promised bur- selves a second, and 'if fortune favors us, many More visite in te future, -for there are so many of Naturee glories to be seen, and the mounitain air is so cxhilarating, that one feele that several summer seasons would not be suflicent to satisfy the»longing which seems to be creatqd after one taste of tb.ie niountain grandeur and the life-giving elixir of the pure atmosphere. . For those who are partial to the stren- uous amusement of mountain climbing, enjoyment to their beart's content cau 1- had in the neighborhood of Jasper. There is Mt. Geikie, whose peak rises to a hcight of 11.000 f t. yet to ho conqucred. Mr. Munn and Mr. Hloward atcmpted the ascent last year with Guide' ite- j)hen's, but -were not successful in aclîiev- ingtheir obýject, iso bhe hoiior of reacliing the summi-t,of thiis, Rocky Titan vet rernains for isorne ambitious Alpiner. A trail lias been open- eid to à point close 11p)bo the inouintain, so that it cait now Lie ea-ilv reaehed by pack potny. TVie iieVof Caeikie is lovelY asud ta ost iiruiriiing. Jts ice atid snoflels, udastelatd ([main mid ininor peaks, Ipresrt a fine vîîw frorn -Jasper, particuIIarly at siinrise anud SUnýSet. Then there are two ot'lier AIR Pebnvvne brq0oMýom uu Mad* Un Omnm When writing advertisers please mention The Western Home Monthly. N -*~-.;- 117 RE West- b4lyt i, uty prage \u003e your ,ar systemT an judge ave been rears, and. .r custom e guaran- ou your opgh, the 'rèased 5 the price rsui, o Write a now. )w 1 TED finnipegI r's Style .oth . i ioditiooe ired for country tudonis ýtituto aitoba ln a il sub- thi aUl machers il con- both stand- ta to, ;t our S. To e offer NOW. d LVENUB )-date wet IR excep- plensed servcs Can fit cao huv. paratun",
         "The Western Home' monthly WAS 50 ,WEAIK WOULq\u003e HAVE TO .SlrAYI[N lE68 nbaun's HeartaM Nweoplus Cured Horn Mm* 1. Day, 234 John St. South, Eanitou, Ont., writes: \" I was '80 run down'with a weak heart that I could flot évC.U sweep the floot,, not, could I sleep at ni li. I was so awfully sick sometimes rMto stay lu bcd ail day as I was s0 wcà.k. I uscd three and a half bo es 01 Milburn's Ilcart sud Nerve Pile ind I amn a c9red womau to-day, and as etrgig as auy oanc coiild be, and amn doing wy own housework, even my own wvash-. \u003c,'I d\u0026tored.far over two years, but zt no hbelp -imtll I used your pill.\" Mil0burn's Heart and Nerve Plls are' ÔBie pe«_bax, 3 boxes for $1.25, at al dealers oçrnaled direct an rccipt cf pricc by flic T. Milburn Co., Limited, RCn O. nt. THSWASHER MUST PAY FOR- ITSELF A M utred tu seU me a hors, once. He sd it ~' w» a fine horse and had nothing the. matter with A .itI wectad a fine hors, but, 1 didnt know - isouthorsSmuoh. And I Jdnt know the.mi ,,trywi.borne for a month. H.sid \"A ui 4tbut psy ma firs a\" glive y« Véot yuIdIdnie fthe wa sfrald tii.hors. wasn't \"'al4ht\" and that 1 migt hoe te whistle for w\u003e' mon.- gifletnoe d wLh IL ,4hU gh 1 want.d it badly. Nzothi s st me thinklng. You -aise1maeWshn hty\" Wsse.Ou rvq !lg And 1 sid to myseff, lots .\u003e~ Catiy \u0026i of peole maythini bout greai est convenienoe. m y W shneac i , as ~ w ell as eau e f operaion t-Y h ao 1. oswt/i q7k cLe cd orough at o utti.ma ''o k. Don: 10 kloekt owned IL detachable tub féatur e. But I'd never know, becanse the\u003e' wouldn't write and tell me. Youtee, 1 seU my Washing Machines b\u003e' mal. b ave sold over haf a million tint way. So, t luh ,it la on!\u003e' fair enouh te let people te\u003e' my =shigMachines for a mont befor îhey Pay for ghem, uta s 1wanted to try the. hors,. Now i kqow what eue \"1900 Gravity\" Waaher wil do. 1 know it will wash the. clothee, trithout wearig or tearing them, in leus han haf the time the\u003e' eau be wahed hy hand or by sny other ,1achine. i I now it wifl waah a tub ful of very dirt\u003e' clothes In six minutes. 1 know ne other machine ever ini- * yented ean do that without weaing the clothe. Our \"1900 Gravity\" Washer'doce the work no easy that a cilS eau run lit lmost as wel as a surong woman. and it don't Wear the clothes, fra(the edges nor break but- tons. the. way ail other rnachi c do. 1 tjustdrives soap\u003e' water lear theough the. fibres cf t80 ootes lii. a force \u0026pump nirt ht m So, aid I to myself vldo it _m1900 Gravit\u003e\"' Washer what I wanteS thse man to do with te herse. Only 1 ven't wait for people te soir me. l'il offer frt. anSd VU makejood t he offer every time. Let me @end ycu a 1900 Gravity\" Waher on a aonth's free trial. I'1l puy the freight out cf ni\u003e'own pocket. and if you don't vant the machine after yeu'vc useS it a month, 1 l'Il takre it hack and psyth kegî o.Surely that la fair eneugh. ien't t!.h Doean'Itit prove that the \"1900 Gravity\" Waher mnuet he sU that 1 say it ls? And you ean psy nme out Of vhat itaves for yen. It Winl Uv its whiee cent in a fcw menthe in Wear end teron the clohes aonc. AnS then it wiii save 50 tg 75 cents a week over that on washwoman's vages. If yen keep the machine after the month's trial. l'i1 let yen psy for it eut of what il savea you. If it $aves You 60 cents a vcek, senS me 50c a week til paiS for. i':i taie tiat cheerfuli\u003e'. sud l'Il wait for my money until the machine itself esens the balance. Drop me a lin. to-day. sud Jet me send 'lu alhbok ahout the, \"1900 Gravit\u003e'\" Wsaher hat waaheoes lu six minutes. AddresS Im\u0026personally-- I. P. Morris, Manager, 1900 Washer C 357 Yonge Street, Toronto, Ont. (ractorly 79-81 Portland Street, Toronto) R E 1ymters and Trappers FR E 82p. iLh n rd. ephtos o\u003e roue rde sand o\"mnais. Loen thia prof(ssion Sae oue trophis.. Decorbte rouz home aud tdru. Leam te Rtllff Birds nmal. mo au robes. ue urn rmenon sd b-s. CI-- fits frotBrt tne Itnsl ntrirtinz tuvetigate. Wut tdyfe frseeok. Ooiya fow atroe-o b. 74SIsod aalI HOa O maa sba @b10 E8U~ OHO FAIEM peak$ in the vicinfty, Mt. Hardisty and t.,Fithuhbath 9,000 jeti hgh, wihich climbers wifl fiud worthy Ôf their phyical exertion. Pyramid Mountain ii \"o -so Imnt;ti.sumrniê-gained, however, a. eccue lies spread put ta the beholder's gaze whieh-is eichauting. We \u003clid tiot attempt any af the more diffi- Shit limbs ou tbus accaion, ais the time gt aur disposai was not aufficient ta ~permit it. .kfter doing Pyramid, we made the ascent of ÇGoat Mt. by the new bridie 'path, mnade under the supervision af Col. Rogers. This is a splendid path, and we made the ascent rapidly. The 'view, from the suinmit commands the valleys of the rivers for many mileq, and the panorama of moumtains, lakes, run- ning streains, and cascades, je extremelY beauti4ul. The rich coloring of te water, tseen f£rom this great heighit, la magnificent. No artist, however, talent- ed, could reproducelheir -brilliany., It is asomething lhat muet be seen, ani Ônce seen la* a picture of lovelines that the xnemory will long retain. With a trip ta beautiful Maligne Lake, where an Amenican lady itraveller of note declares is the grandest ecenery in the world, and a second visit ta the canyon of the Ma- ligne River, we bld adieu ta hospitable friends at Jasper, and set out for Mount Robson, fartious for its remarkable com- p ositiob its immense body and for its bing t e highest known peak lu the Canadian flcekies.1 We had 'heard a great deal of Mt. en Mt. Whitehorn on the way whichis 1101. ft. higb, after which Ne soon be- gnto circle the mighty base o'f RobCwn, sdbegan ta realize its wonderful- ex- tent and height. It was only twelve miles by the trail,ý but ýt was Vwo days before we reached 'our objective point, some of the ladies of the party being new ta the experience, thus rendering it necessary ta make short camps. How- ever, arrived at Berg Lake, we found ourselves iu time for an unexpected plie- nomenon. The great glaciers were de- livering themselves of their surplus ice, and we were fortunate ln witnessing the t'all of several enormoue masses frôm the ice eaves hundreds of feet above .ifl, and crashing into the lake with a miglty roar, raising waves which washed clear acros8 the lake higli up on the opposite shore. It was indeed a thrilling and exciting experience. The eurface of the lake was -full of ice washed into many fantastie shapes, which the movement of the 'water gave the appearatlce of ani- rnated life. We did not venture ta emu- late the leat of Mr. Kinney and Guide Phillips, 'who three oit four years ago euceeeded by euperhuman efforts in reaching the highest point on the moun- tain at an elevation of 13,700 ft. We as- euredly did not feel equal ta the task, and we would bave failed if we tried Nevertheless, we enjoyed every Moment of aur stay, even if we did a'wake one morning to find ourselves ln the midst of a very wintry scene as a resuit of a The Giant Pot-h oies cf thec'Maligne Gorge, Jasper Park, Alta Rol)son, as no doubt evervone has wvho takeý(s arn interest in mountain lore, and we wvye tlitrefore in a ineasure sinte- whn t prepatitt for its awe inisli ii ng gra mletr. From N ?t. R(\u003ebsoii sttoti w e pro\u003etî(tltl avitss eoiitry b liVbrile ta t h ~VftiI1olr wat over hils, liîrtîgli and rivuletsl but. forever elinmbilg, ~~ L heavy snowstorni that prevailed in the niglit. This snow 'vas a source of good fortune to us, for it cleared tuie air, and for the Inext two (lys we had clear vicxvs o)f tht l -antt tienbaite to dloine. and what .1, si!'t1îl 'W\\iat, leriouîs tiiits anîd shades ll te iiivs of tt mIloîîîligr sîi w-erm 1iîîîtîiîlatiîe., tIlleak-illi h hitiescett glory, or in ejriî at evejîtide wvhen Bran Needed Every Day Ile dcatos of America have brou*gtmillon. ta bran food. WeIIadvised people, at lerat once daily, now serve blran in some form. The best form is a momig dainty - Pettijohn's It is soft wbeat flaked, with 25% bran bid- den in flakes: The bran is onground, whicli makes it efficient. It is tender. In this com- bmnution h is very ivitbng. This is a Iuxury made to loster bran hab\"s.Seo haw wellàdomsht Rolled Wheat WIth Bran Flakes Il youl grocer hasn't Petfijohn'a, scnd us bis name and 15 cents in stampfoa package by parcel post. WciI then ,as yout store to supply i. Address THE QUAXER OATS COMPANY East of Manitoba, Peterborough, Ont. West of Ontario. Saskatoon, Sust. This Grafonola Is Yours for $24,25 $4.25 CASH $ 4. 00 MONTHLY Ili addition tô these ex- ceptionally easy terme of pay- ment, we also supply with each instrument 10 SELECTIONS WVithout Extra Charge There's no better enter- tainment when friends drop in to spend the evening, and for dance music the Grafon- ola is unsurpassed. Make the long winter evenings pleasant for the whole f ar- ily with just the music each will eijoy most. Grafonolas in vario us styles ail sold on easy payments if desired. Write for Catalogue and fui! particulars ;WINNIPEG PIANO C 33Prtg Ave., Wlnnipeg -\u003c---'t' The G.T.P. track through the Park, Interlaken, Japer Park",
         "The Western Moîne Wdonthly they lit up the sflow and ïce Tpeake -wlth gof t rainbow hues! Ail visitors to the shrine of Robson do not have suchl uck, for the highegt peaks are usually en- slroud-2d with clouds or mist; hence we had good reason for congratulating our- selves. Mr. iBell-Spith, the eminent Canadian artist Mr. Jackeon of Toronto, Mr. Wilson anNr. Topfey of Ottawa, ail artists of re.pute and familiar with inountain sceflery, were visitors to the mountain whilst we were there, in pur- j5uit of their professional work, and al declared that grander sights than Mount ilobson favored us with eould not bc conceived. Their artistic senseswere in- toxicated -with enjoyment, and I think we -were ail affected by the 6ame inspira- tin.It was truly grand, and we will have something to talk about for a long time to corne. From Mt. Robson, our itinerary took us across Central British Columbia by the Grand Trunk Pacifie, and here the writer received the surprise of a lifetime. Hav- ing been under the impression that thex new rail route to the Pacifie ran throughi a mountainous country for the entire dis- tance fromi Western Alberta to Prince * Rupert, judge of my astonishrnent to find on crossing the 1{ockies that the moun- tains gradually recede until thcy entirely * disappear for a distance of three hundred miles, and give way to an extensive basin whose chef characteristies are river val- leys and plateaux, principally timbered, and exceedingly fertile-a country beau tiful in its present state of nature that will bc ininitely m'ore beautiful whcn it Mdunta in, whvlieli overlooka the rail wav at this point. '- A four mile ride over a ptty bridie path up the mountain aide brings the sight-seer close 'ap to and directly below the glacier, f rom which two foaming cascades faîl a dis- tance of a thousand feet sheer into a boulder strewn'moraine, which is skirt- ed by magnificent forest growths, and \u003clown which the water leaps and rushies to tuie calm and beautiful Lake Kathilyn ncstling at the base of the mountain five thousand feot below the glacial bcd in wvhich the waters -were originally cradled. A second trail leads around fo thie opposite side of the mountain, where there are some overhanging glac- iers and( a serica of -pretty lakes which teem with trout, as ail lakes and streams do in Central British Columbia. This district is in a minerai beit ajid mines are being opened up, frequent blasting reports testifying to activity in thiis liue of enterprise. Lake Kath- lyn bas some fame for its wonderful reflections. It mirrors the surrounding mnountains and forests with remarkable realism, photojraphs taken over its surface show ing perfect double pictures. With its interesting seenie attractions, good roadways, flshing, grouse ffhooting, and deer hunting. Lake Kathlyn is' des- tined to find a place on the itinerary of tourista, though it is one only of many localities on the Grand Trunk Pacifie that possesses magnetie lures for t\u0026e pleasure seeker. 'Continuing our journey towards the sea, we made a stop at New ilazleton, NORMAL SIGHT NOW POSSIBLE WIT90OUT EYE-GLASSES Because your eyes are i any way affected, it no longer means.that you must look forward to wearing glasses for the balance of your life. For it has been conclusively proven that eye-weaknesses are primarily caused by a lack of blood circulation ini the oye, and when the normal circulation la restored the oye rapidly regains its accustomned strength and clearness of vision. The most emimnent oye specialists are agreod'that even in so serious a condition as catract of the eye an increase in blood circulation la most benoficial. It la now possible to safely give the oyos just tho massage (or oxercise) which tho noed to brmng them back to a normal, he.thy condition of natural- strengfth, and L method ham been sucSful in restorinK. normal evesight ta, thousands and making them absoutelY independent of eye-glaume. It dow nfot matter what the trouble with your eyes may be; for old-sight, far-siht, near-ight, astigmatiam, andl ever. more seimous eye troubles, ha;ve yielded to this gentie massage, which.i extremely simnple, entirely -ode, and takes but a féýw minutes of \"aol ay. If you wifl write to thé. Ideul Masserr Co., Room 257, 440 SpadinA avenue, Toronto, you will reoeive free onreuest a ve-ry enigtening booklet on \"The Eyes Their Cmr, Their 1%, Thedr Cure,'J which in scentiflo treatise on. the eyes, and givees\"full details about this Nature treatment and its results. AU y ou need to do la-to aek for the book and mneftiop haMontr1y. this in The Western A1oue There are fewpoie Who conaki that eye-laesadto 'heir ppearanob surely tiyadta no unes cwuort, if you peer not te ea he Wtu have acmlseti lua fulyandprax Pyramid Lake, Jasper Park has been reclaimed by the agriculturist and the home buildor. From the suma- mit of the Rockies the railxvay follows the Fraser River to Prince George, then the Nechako to Fort Fraser, thon tîhe Endako; ïext through the Bulkeley Val- ley to Hazleton, whence it skirts the mountainous shores of the Skeena to the tivle water at Prince Rupert. AIl theso rh-ors and valloys wvith intervoning làkes are very beautiful, and are in- tensely attractive features of a route that is replote wffitÉ interest throughout its entire distance. Urban and agri- cixtural settlemonts are springilg up al mlong the line, and one would judge by flie optimism and enthusiasm of the sttiors, will ýsoon ho ýcontributing large- ly to the productive wealth of tlhe coun- liry. Among these now places may ho mnxtioned Willowv River, Prince George, Stxart, Fort Fraser, Endako, Van\u003cler- Iloof, Burî-is Lake, Jarrett Lake, Smithî- ers, Nýev Hazleton and Terrace. As\u003e 8 e baul to rel-Ii on construction trains for transportation we bàd opportuiies1to viit several of the farm scttlernients, and I wexe favorably impressed wi ti W l'at we sa\\%. The settiers did a p 1Y lrofitable business witlî theix' ]a\u003culîxe-e during construction, but now tluiit tîhe market is no longer av-ai!a\u0026îl aegetting into live s 9ild 'r i nixed farxîinlg \u0026 a- p 1ll a, iiineans iwill allow. ];lit tlîis s a i Mvliatter With Wllie.'L ,h 4 a 1,i not iflt(xded to dea!, .0we( W il in to the affairs of otir lioliiil xx WP a pleasant Sta v ut lke l\\ iflîl-viln i ixls vst of Snifflers. and x l l il ip to the glacier 0o1u lIdunuî ,Bay ini the charming Bulkley Valley, near the junction of the streami of that naine with the Skeena. Our purpose in visit- ing this place was to soe the \"'Bulkley, Gates,\" a natural wall of rock which at one time extelided across the gorge in which the river flows, but through which tho waters have brokon a passage, leav- ing onîy sections of -the wall jutting out froffiithor ide. Thiis wall',roôks as tlîouglm it had been constructed by bu- man hands, and it is a fact that some people believe a yarn.that it was built by Indians years ago in order to cross the river. It is likely a rock dykoe of harder substance th in the prevailing rock on eitlîer sidle, wluîch in some mani- uer was interposed duriug the cataclysmi tlîat fofiued the mîountains. At any rate it is one of those odd freaks of nature tjat provoke more than passing interest. For miles the railway hugs thxe Bulkley, and the traveller is treateil to un axray of seenery that embraes alinost every aspect of ltxdsape-it is a continuOus noving picture with 5ome- tlîîng new ,ahuiost every instant to a -' rest attention and evoke delight. A shiort stroîl froxn New Ilazleton brixxg-s oiue to the Indian village of Awiligate, wlih~as Ithe meeting rplace betiveeim thxe coast and( interior natives in the lu- 4li\u003cxxx days, a sort of nettral groîxnxl froin %w!Iijéli ieither side ý%as peiîitteul t\u003cî ci - te-r thxe tei-ritox-v ;f thei otiex. iir -is qtiite a poplationxi Iit ig iii iIi-I liLa t ion, %witlî the ('atixol ie clinrircîiii wli eli services are lîeld every inorxiiii x. afternoon and e-eiiung. 'lle lxxxiii of thu reserve appears ýte ho siitalule for griculture; but there lias beeii but littlu. JOHi1ALLAN' o1 W[STERN HOME 'MONIIILY AND W[[KLY [R[[ PRESS AND PRAIRIE FARMER BOTH FOR ONE YEAR FOR TeWeekly Free Press lias for many years enjoyed an unique -position as ýan Agricultural Newspaper. It gives ail the news of the world while particular attention is paid to the grain markets including the very latest quotations. Western Home Monthly, Winnipeg CGentlemen, EncIose\u003ct find $ 1.25 for which send me The Western Home Monthly and Weekly Free Press for one year. Yours truly, .. . .. .. . . . . . . . .. . .. . . . .. .. . . . -.. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ' I -J i.' '9 ly have food. once borin. soft i hid- makes sénd for a 1 then Adresa ANY Ont. m-Sk LY NS rge r- id a-",
         "The Western Home monthly e'.people doubt that the ladions.are btter off under the -new agate of affaire. How- ever, they secure salmon and fruit in effimrdance, 'which * they dry in large quantities fer winter use, and perhaps conider theMsejlves well off. Some of the men flnd enuployment in various ways, andiisually..are in possession of good coin of the realmn with which to buy clothlhng, luxuries and non-essentials. The village ie picturesquely situated near 'bhe brink of a river canyon, which diere epreadis out into a large semi-cir- cuar Ibain three huxndred fret deep. Along ledges of the cliffs Indiana fish with -hooks fastened into long poles by rans of a thong, the baft of the bocks freeing theraselves like a whaler's bar- C on wen Iamon ie ts\u003eken. Various baket ei*e are ale mployed to cap- iture the\" flèh as they attempt te breast the falle and are forced back by the rushing water. It ià marvellous the number of llsh which are caught ever'.y day.by these primitive methode. DuX- ing the fishing season the odour of Vhe aalmon roes whieh pervades the vicinity, of the drying houseis is not to be com- MUrwIi 'LL AND. YeEAst 1IN E£W.GIUTCQLTrD. TO)RONTO ,ONT efotat cultivationi, a few smaill bar fields and garden patches being the onÏy visual testimony of conditions in this hUe of advancemen't. The romance of the old d\" e bas departed, and many r red to that of the Amnerican Beauty. heére are two examples of bridge engi- neering. here that excite wonder and ad- miration, one a single apan suspension bridge which bas been thrown across the gorge at its highest point. Iti* .P- proximately thbree hundred feet 'alJethe water, and as.ma'ny feet long. It is car- ri\u00261 by. heavy wire câbles guspended f rom concrete towers et each end. This bridgenwasbuit under government aus- pies i n nue!tion with colonizaition-roe.d work. The other bridge is at a mueh lower elevation, and much shorter. It is a crude affair built by Indians with telegraph 'wire and poles, -but it, has been ini use many years, and is stili doing duty for foot passengers. This bridge is an cxam¶ple of the Indians' ingenuity, and is an objeet of mu'êh curiosity to visitors. The village oemetery, -whieh haie a greater population than the village, is interesting because of the quaintlittle bouses 'of 'iaryi'ng designs. erected over tie graves., There'are inany of these simple mausoleums, soute moss grown and dees.ying, end others trim and fresh- ly painted and conxtining marble tomb- Athabaska River Bridge, Jasper Park rThis Handsome Davenport FE L To'READERS of THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLYt The Davenport is covered in best quality Leatherette and as a comfort- able sofa is a band- some addition to any room. In a moment, however, it can be transform- ed into a full sized bed as the following illustration shows. Owing to their two- f old utility, there is a very big demnand just now for davenports and many dealers are 7 asking quite h i g h * prices for these useful ~ ~ I.pecesý-of furniture. ever, 0am~ our way of purchasing a whole shipment at a cut rate and accordingly we are able to offer our ders the handsome davenport (as illustrated above) in return for only NINE NEW SUS PTIONS to The Western Home Monthly. FOR ANY FURTHER PARTICULARS ADDRESS WESTERN HOME MONTHLY WINjt4PEG MANITOBA atones 'inecribed with the namne and vir- tues of -the deceased-a fashion adoptedi -£rom the whiteman'a cemeteries at 'the eoast cities. .In the vicin-ity of New Ilazietoù there ià cunsidçrable *pining qctivity, and ithere is every promise of an important mining centre being, establisie. l, every shop and office -window rich, looking apecimens of silver and copper ore, au' bearing a good percentage ' of gold are displayed. These are labelled witb the namnes of the, daims from iwpich tbey were 'taken, and îrom the number of mnimes one mnuet conclude that a good deal of territory has been staked. The Rocher de Boule, or Mountain of Vhsý dlipig Stone, wh.iebis a well-nown geo- raphical objeet, forme a -massive back- gund to New Hazleton village. High upon its aide a mine is being deveroped on a considerable scale, and an aerial -tramway, seven mile s long, isa being bufit to carry the ore to,'the railway. rhe no'ney being expended in these develop- *ment'works indicates àu assurance on the part of the operating com.pany Vbat they -have a good thing. A short distance west of New Hazle. ton the railway strikes the iSkeena River, whicb is crossed on a fine steel bridge ini siglit of old Hazleton, the head of navi- gation on the Skeena fromn tidewater. Indian villages wiVh the usuaL- display of 'totem poles and house-covered graveg, and more or less squalor, are now f re- quently passed, and give an added touch of interest to, the splendid scenery. of the noble river, flowing througli its con'fining adamant walls and receîving occasionally turbulent streams from snow and ice-clad mouniaýn-peaks 'wh.ich adorn the'land- scape, One of the Indien villages, known familiarly as the \"1{oly City,\" looke like an eastern village. The houses are coin- modious and trim, and there is an air of prosper.ity seen in no other native settle- meut. This is an old mission village, 'and its founder is sa-id to have ruled with a strong 'hand', and succeeded in instillin progressive notions into bhis uncuitured fiock. At Kitwanga, situeted at the junction. of the 6keena and Kitwancool rivers, on a flat of oon6iderable extent, we found some very old. and. fine examples of totem pole carving, and did nort f ail to securq pictures of, théni for the pictorial. record of our trip. Jlung up besidts the chief's totem was a carved image of that func- tionary's reeenitly deceased daughter. Pa- ternal affection among the natives, thoughb. bth deep and lasting, does not, we are told, often find expression in this strange way. The survey for the railway rait through thie cexnetery at this place, and When the grader» began unearthing bodies, the Iiidiarns stopped the work un- til a settiement had been effected ai the rate of f rom. $5 to $150 aooording to the age and social or official. standing of the deceased. The Indians of Central British Columbia are noted çfor their bighly coin- mercialized proclivities, and this is ons evidence thereof. 'They are ever keen to do one a service, but a bargain must be strack first, even though the offer of ser- vice couses froin them. If one wants tý take a. photograph there xnust be some re,- iýurn, and a copy of the 'picture wvill prob- a'bly be demanded. Settlers are finding their -way into the district, and we saw some very good grain and '- -getable crops in thie Kitwancool valley. Our last stop 'before reaching Prince Rupert was Terrace, the trading, centre of the Lakelse and Kitsungalumn valleys. iWe -,were ail greatly interested here t'h the fruit growing experiments of the en- terprising settiers, who are sure 'that they have found the garden spot of this section of the province. We visited sev- eral young Çrchards just beginning to bear, where we saw convincing evidence of 'the suital$lity of the soil and climate for all the hardier v-arie-ties of tree fruits. There were also ail the standard varieties of berrnes bearing prolifically while the -fruit was of large size and excellent flavor. These beautiful vallcys con- stiltute flie largrest area of arable land in the' Prince Rupert district, and will probaly becorne the market garden and summaer, resort for that young city. There is a pretty lake and sulpinir springs in the Lakelse valley, and'also a lakc in the Kitsungaluin valley. Both vallevs extend to arins of the sea, and the warmn air of the ocean lias a mod-ifY- ing eflect on the inland temaperatures both summner and winter, so thýt \\,3ýtl a 'T",
         "The western Home Mont hi y rich productive soil and a long frostless summrer ail manner of grains, vegetables, and hiardy fruits can be successfully cul- tivated. lt is estimated that 'there are now about three hundred settiers in the two valleys. These settiers 'are real liomemakers and not land grabbing apeculators. ,Ouir atay in Prince Rupert was in the mids oTwar times, the presece of sol- diers and à warship bringing home to us our close personal interes' in the great sanguinary confiict on Euro'pean soil. In sayingi our eo- l-byes, we al ex- pressed the hope tlhat our outing next year 'would not bce rarred by.thouglîts of sueli a terrible calamity, and that we couldsee more of the beauties of Brit- ish Columbia's newly opened up wondér- ]and, and see them more leisurely anid more thoroughly. Know your own coun- try first la good advice, ahd those who would know ..omething of thut part oï' the Dominion now made accessible hy the construction of the Grand Trunk Pacifie Eshould not fail to arroige a summer's outing along the line as'soon as possible. A party of congenial friends can make the trip with greater pleasure than goilg it alone. The Next -Great Question Writden for The Western Home Monthly by Nofmuan F. Black, M.A., D. Paed, îegna nd vir- - Ldoptec1 at 'the CL there r, and ýortant in looking \u003ere, ail Ad are ith the h they Lber of a good 1 The \u003ef the wn geo- back- High veroped aerial ig bulit The .evelop- Son the it they Hazie.' LRiver, lidge in 4 navi. ewater. display graves, )w f re- touch ofi the \u003enfiing ionally ice-clad land- known ike like re com- i air of settie- village, ad with .stilling ultured unction rers, on Sfound 1 totem securq record chief's t fune- er. Pa- îatives, *es not, in this rnailway iplace, arthing )rk un- ai the to the of the British y Coni- is one Seen to lust be of ser- Intetoý )me ne- [I pnob- fanding re saw e crops Prince centre ralleys. lene thi bhe en- that of this ed sev- ing to vidence -limate fruits. Lrieties le the ýcellent S Con- e land id will en and r City. ulpitir d' also Botil a, aiid iodify- -atures 1gti a and the purchase of agricultural imple- monts; and somothing about the manage- ment of the affaire of a rural municipality? In such a country as ours it le imperative that the school should se m* e upnthe mind et our eilidron and youth the treasonablo and contemptible nature of ail forme of political corruption that when thoy grow to maturity thoy wiil rendon sucli abuses impossible. In short, it should ho the second great aimi of the people's echools te train up, net merely by indirect means however valuablè theso may b., but by direct means also, an enllghtenod citizen body equipped for self geverament in the province in which they dwell. Thon. surely can be ne dispute about this. If my. readers have -agreed. with me se far, we mày lay down the pninciple that when our course of studies i5 revised the double core of the curriculum wiil be training üli agriculture and citizensbip. Evon in the toaching ýf other subjects sucli as aithmotic, googrnphy, hlstery, and the like, the basic chanacter of those twe tundaaental departmentý muet net be fergetton. Even litoraturo, the, moet important cultural subject of them al will become immessurably more vital when taught as anether means of inter- preting té the pupil hie own enviroamoent and rendoning hie relation ta it more intelligent.* Most and penhape ail of the prosent subjocte of study should rotain a place in the new curriculum, but much useless dead wood will have ta be trimmed away from thoni. This will open up spaco not only for such tepics as agriculture snd citizenship, but fer much more efficient training along other hunes as woll, netably.1 the. arts of home making snd home keep ing, and handwork wth or without tools., Thero le onougli time wastod now in the more or less unskilful toaching of a course of studios unsuitable ta our conditions than weuld be required for the preper teaching et mucli additional work, of essential and unquestienablo importance. Half-trained teachers and many otheri people unfamiliar with the subject stillt tbink that sucli studies as I bave beeni speaking ot require a prohibitive ex-i pensive equipment. Educatienal experts,1 however, know veny well that it le quite practicablo te teach theso branches with excellent effeet evon lu the ordinnry rural schools. Our prairie school systemes reqjuine prompt snd energetie mensures et ne onm net only as regards the course et studies. In this regard I ami speakiag particularly et my own province, Saskatchewan, but much that I have te say wiil have an application in Manitoba and Alberta as well. It 'le becoming noteriously more and more dificuit te indue. our meet success- fui and best equipped teachens te become and remain inspectons. Ia Saskatchewan I think there are only two membens of the inspecterai staff that belonged to it when I nesigned trom it six years age. No cls et phblic servants is more gneviously over- wonkod, yet everybody knows that the supervision et our rural sehools le meet discouragingiy unsatistactony-. Inspect- ons muet becomo supeintendeats ne- sponsible ton tho efficiency et the schools over which they oxerciseo oversikht. These should net be more than about sixty in numben tor anyonc superintend- cnt, se that instead et making' flyin ' visits once on twice in twe years, holiewil b ,e able te cail at each school as often as the inter- ets et that part ieular school nequ ire. The best possible init idi preparatiïon '',hould. be required of newly app9inted superin- THE WONDERF'UL MIS SION OF THE INTERNÂL BATHS- By GJa. PEROIVAL, MD. Do you know that over three hun- dred thousand -Americans are at the. present time seeking freedom froni emaîl, as weIl as serious aliments, by the practice of Internai Bathing? Do you know that hosts of enlightened physicians ail over- the country, as wel as osteopathe, physical culturiste, .etc., etc., are recommending and, recognizing this practice as the most likely way new kaown to secure and preserve perfect health? There are the beet of logical rea8ons for this practioe and these opinions, and these reasons will be very interesting ta, everyene. In the firet place, every physician realizes and agrees that 95 pfer cent. ef human illnesses le caused directly or in- directly by accumulated waete in the colon; this le bound to accumulate, be- cause we of to-day neither eat the kindof food non take the amount ;of exercise which Nature demande in order that se may thoroughly eliminate the waete un- alded. That's the reseon when yen are ili the\u003e physician always gives yau seme- thing te noemove this accumulation ef waste,, before commencing ta treat your specifie trouble. 1It's ten te one that ne specifle troubtP would have developed if thene wone ne accumulation et waste in the colon- And that's the reason that the fameus Professer« Metchnikoff, one et the world's grentest scientiste, bas boldly sud specifi-' cally etatod tint if our colons were taken awny. m infancy the. length of aur lives would ho increased te pnobably 150 years. You eee, this waste *e extremeljc poisonous, aud as tho blood ffloweI throllk the wnlls et tho colon it absorbe te pon and carnies thom through the. eirultion-that's what causes Auto- intoxication, with ail its perniciously enervating and*woakening results. These pull dewn our powers et resîstance and rendor us subject te almostanuy sonieus compinint which may bo provalent et the. time-and the worst tenture et it is that thero are tew of us who know when we are Auto-intoxicated. But you neve'r can be Auto-intoxicated if you peniodically use the proper kind et an Internai Bath-that is sure. It le Nnture's own relief and corrector - juet warm water wbich used in tie igt way, cleanses the. colon thoneughly ite ontire length sud makes and keeps it sweet, dlean and pure as Nature demande it shail b. for the entire syetem ta work properly. You undoubtedly know, fnom your own personal expenience, how duil and. unfit to worTc or think properly, bilioua- nes s and many other apparently simple troubles make you feel. And yov~ prc\u003eb-. ably know, too, that these irregularities, ail directly traceable to accumulated waste, make you reaily sick if permîtte4 to continue., You a\"âoprobàbly know thàt the èold- faioned method of druggng for these complainte le at best only, partiaily effective; the doses,'must be increased if continued, and fmnally they cee to, be effective at ail. It ie true that more druge are probabl used for this than ail other human D combined, which smlygctorv ho w. univ eral th trou b e c accumulated waete really i.-ut thIýI le not a doubt- that drus rebe *eç~ as Internal Bathimg a eoeigb known-. For it le not possible teo oeioveunt!Q you igve haod the experierice yourseli what a wonderful 'brace an IntEt= Bath reaily le; taken at niht, yen a\u0026Wai in the morning with afee*nOfetlighttn and buoyancy thatcannot b'aemacUnt for-yen are aboolutely dlean, Ierythý le working mi perfect accord, your appet le better, your brain is olearer, andy4 feel full of vim and confidence, for I day's dutiee. There ie notbing new about int\"nÀ Baths exoept the way of àdmùinltei*- them. Some years ago Dr. Chse\u0026 A. Tyrreil of New York waz so miracUlouabr benefited by faithfully using the. metho' then i vogue that lie made Intoexi Baths hieý special study, and iînp\",leI materially in adminiktering tbi. Bbîqolt in getting the resuit deulred. This perfected Bath ho called t4e «\"J. B. L. Cascade,\" and it le tthe one which7 has so 9uickly popularized and recom- mended îtself that hundredsofe thouoande are to-day using it. .Dr. Tyrreâ,in hi is practice and re. searches, discovered many, unique snd interesting facts in conineotion with tii subject; these he lhan coileoted i a util book, \"The. What, the Why, the Way of Internal Bathing,\" whlch wiil b. seà free on requet if you address Chas. A. Tynrel,ý M.D., Room 254, 280 Colae street, Toronto, and mention havin read this in The. Western orne Monthl. This book telle us facts that we neve knew about ourselves before, and there le ne doubt that everybne whe has an interest in bis or ber own physical well-. 'belng or that of the family, wiil b. very greatÏy instructed and enlightened by reading this carefully prepared and scientIfcally correct little bok. A LL over Ameraja there le sweepig A a movement t he aim of which le te make better worth living the 1f e of the muss of the people, the special means to this end heing to reform and revitalize- the people'fs echois. Probably neyer since the time of Horace Mann and Eger- ton Ryersen, seventy years ago, has any educational problemn of suchi a chanacter been the obi ect of such general and serious reflection on the part of such a proportion of the more intelligent element of the citizen body at large. The man or woman not interested in this matten le out of step with the times. During the coming autumn and winter, expecially in Saskatchewan, but in other Western Provinces as well, there le every indication that the regeneration of the elementary ichools, particularly mi rural, districts, wiil be the tople o upreme poplar.i- teret, next ta, the war itsel. n the great campaign of discussion already well stanted the editars and rendors of The Western Home Montbly may doubtlesa ho reied.upon to do their share. Let us commence by frankly receg- nizing that our echools even as thoy are, have done and are âoing an immense amount of good. The t act remains, how- ovor, that -the noed of sweeping reform les evident to anyone who cares ta consider the mattor. A course of study and a system of ad- ministration and supervision might be an excellent one in densely populatod manu- tacturing community with a purely native citizen body, for exampfle, and yet be very ineffective in an agriculture commumity peopled by immigrants from oevery corner et the wold. ,A wise school system wiHl be ose based Won the needs and conditions '- of the 'state or province that le ta, be senved. This le a proposition se self- evidently true that it neede only ta ho stated and it wiil be endorsed by any intelligent penson. Neventholess this tnuth le conspicuously ignorod in our western school laws and courses of studies. The time le new ripe for the correction of this errer. It willI not be correctod, howeven, unless the people speak up and ln unmistakeable fa3'hion. The central industry of the prairie dwellens le and must remain agriculture. Upon it depends net nione the prospenity of the country districts but the prosperity of the villages, towns and cities as well. The publie welf are demande that the ever- whelminV( majeity of our most intelligent ani best educated boys and girls should be so trained as gladly te choose a lite urnon the fanm. Even those of our young f olk who may elect to be townsfolk must, in a cemmunity liko ours, bc given a reasonablo opportunity to leara what in- telligrent farming really moans. Agri- culture, 'thenefore, should have a central and fundamental place in the people's schools. At presont that sehool is ex- ceptional in which agricultural study is nnything more than a farce or, at best, a STUe issue. Our schools are aise deplorahly defective as a means for direct training in the rights, duties and customs of citizenship in a British democracy. _It is important that an ordinary prairie boy should know something ot the duties of the Secretary of State for for-eiga af airs; sornething about the Bull of Rights; some- fliing about the enigin and methods et the liii)erial parliament, and so forth. 18slit 1-t perhaps even' more important that the (1rnentary school should render him f 0niliar with the duties of a weed in- s'ctor on medical health officer; some- Àýing about djur laws regarding lien notes -Ilà",
         "Tue Western Home Mont hi y Purity Quality Flavor BAKER'S COCOA Possesses Ml Three It is absolutely pure, conformmg toallPureFood Laws. It is of highquality, being made from choice cocoa bean~ ~dk fuliy blended. lu flav~ir is delj- clous, because it is anade without the use cf cheanicals, ~ by a strictly me- chanical procesa that peafectlyj\u003ercservcs the ap- ~~ixigNATURAL flavor of MADE IN CANADA BY lalter Baker \u0026 Go. Limtted Il F~tabUsbeJ 1780 I ~ Mouireai, Camails Dorchushr, Mua. J] Every Woman Her~Own * Beauty Doctor We bave uecured a collection cf twen- ty practical formulas, gleaned from the world's beat beauty speciallats; ail oaa * b. prepared at home at a 10w coat: Cou Cresu, 7aoe B1.ach Zair E. Lotion, Emnoww, Vomie le IUIIAa\u003c Xal* ailE. ~aza4ruff AmDooCm, Zuat ~sva~opw auj ~ Otb.ru1 Complete cet cf twenty formulas wlth fuil directioflu. mailed promptly on recelpt et ena doflar anE. ~v. *tampu. Many la4les rnake considerable money by preparing in quantities and selling te frienda and acquaintances; others copy formulas and seli for one dollar eacb; several have started beauty ~ar- lors. -Lady canvassers can make t own goods, and save the money they pay merchants. Write your fui! ad- dresa plain and your order wlll b. promptly ~iled. Address Caadima Necipe PubUuMn5 Ca., 236 Ou~étte Ave., Windsor, Ont. JAPAN ROSE BUSHES *Eke Womiev of tise Wowld. Rose Bushe, with roses on them in S week. from the time tue seed was planted. It ~ flot .eem pOaBible but we Guav.mlee it tobeso~~~zill DLOOM EVERY S Wint.r or Suminer, and when 8 years oid WIU bave SorS hundred roses on saab bush. WIII grow in the house e iota. w.il as in the ground an summer. Doues Ail 1k. Veut Arouni. Package of seed with 4irsetioo. and our~zantee by mail 10 cia, JapamSes Co.Boz slkConn. tendent. and pro~sion should be made for such subsequent special study as would graduaily transform the inspecterai body into a corps of highly efficient edu- cation~.1 experts, ~o ~hom the general supervision of oui, whole system of education may safely be entrusted. In many directions the authority of these important officiais should be increased. As ha. already been said in the public presa sud elsewhere, if we maI~e our 1fr çpectors men of weîght it will not be 50 liard to induce m~n of weight to become and remarn inspectors. Until a more effective form of supervision is inaugur- ated it i. uselesa to expeet our rural echools to give adequate returns for the public money we expend upon thein. 0f course there are n~any hundred ex- cellent rural trustees and hundreds of thorougbly efficient rural soheoiboarda lu Saskatchewan. Neverthel~ss nobody who is farniiar with rural condî~ions n~ te be told that at present the local busi- ness management of a very large pro- portion cf our public achools i. diagrace- fully bad. The moat intelligent trustees are often the people meet discouraged. They will be the firat te endorse reason- able. proposais. of refotm. I have deait personally, in my officiai capacity as inspecter, with numerous cases of mis- appropriation of echool f unda, secret com- missions and other f orms of gralt in the purchase of achool supplies, petty tyranny and injustice in the treatment of teachers, abuse and negleet of achool property and groas indifference towards the education of the people's childr on the part of trustees and other schooi officers. In other cases I have seen echool districts victiniized by unscrupulous teachers and the trustees standing help- lessiy incapable of safe guarding the rights of t~e peeple. The intereets of our rural districts require that seme system of management be devised te take the place of our present. method. The 4istrsct echool board lias already been abolished iii some twenty-eight states of the American Republic and lu varions parts of the British Empire. We tee muat try ~rouping several rural achools unddr a smgle board and bringmg them under proper supervision. The normal schools muat be included within the scope of the projected referma and adapted to the conditions existing in the province they serve. I do net understand why the ~armers have net spoken up long ago, insistng that lu these institutions greater attention should be given te preparation for teaching in ungraded acheols. Again, lu approxi- mateiy haif the achools of Saskatchewan, children enter upon their studies unable te speak Engiish; any English-speaking teacher-in-training could easily be equipped te meet this situation much more effectively than it is usually met by \"fereigh-speaking\" teachers, but the equipment is net given them. Partly because they are underataif cd, but for oliher causes ~lso, our normal seheois as yet are f ailing, in many other important regftr(1S as wdll, te tu-n eut the kind of teac'wrs that the conditions of this province require. I have given prorpinence te rural and elcmcntary achools and their needs, be- causc these are the most important edu- ~,ational institutions in the ceuntry, from the point of view ef the people at large, - pcrhaîis net even excepting the university and agricultural collegc. The secondary achool system requires everhaullng as well. Especialiy is it necessary that rural high schools be created in - which amid an agricuitural environmcnt, the boys ai~d girls of the farm may sec ure a secondary education in every respect equal (o that given in aur cities. By consolidation, by \"perambulating schools\" (school bouses on wheeis), or by bearding sehools a free and efficient education must ie brought witbin the reach of cvcry chilcisin Saskatchewan. It can be donc, and it will be (lone if the people speak the' word. The liresent. comiiulsary attendance law is pract icallv a dead letter in-so-far as rnost r~-al dis- tricts are ConCCrfle(l and it nuist be re- placcd by somet hing better. Somet bing must he donc te make the rural sebool fulfil more eflcctively its functions as use natural social centre of the rural cons- munit~. And a hundred other rnattea-s of vtpl înterest t~ tise p~opie's sehools tire crying aloud f or attention. To many of these matters Hon. Walter Scott premier -and ~minister of education for ~askatchewan, personally cailed at- tention in a very notable speech during the last session of the legisiative assembly. Mr. Scott peinted eut that in a new province where se many ~ressrng prob- lema cf administration and rcform d9- valve upon the government, it had been necessary te exercise choice as te what. matters should be treated of at once and what others should be poetponed. Hith- erte it had been necessary te include among the latter any general revision of the achool system but its turu had now came. The premier, supported by the leader of the opposition, calied for a province..wide discussion of educati9nal affaira and suggested that, ah sean as the people shewed that they desired it, a special session of the legisiature miglit be devoted te the regeneration of the peeple's achools. No nipre important announcement was ever made lu a Canadian Legisiative Assembly. The firat te respond ta the overtures of the Minister of Education were naturally the teachers of the province. Already they have laid before him memoriais con- taining suggestions ai a highly important character, and it is expected that the matter ef educational reform will be the ehief tepic at sanie twa dozen educationai conventions this fail. A provincial Citi- zen's Committee for the Promotion ai Educational Referm bas been organized a1e~ig the same limes as the \"Banish the Bar\" association, Rev. W. P. Reekie, ai W~uyburn, having taken the initiative lu this matter. Prominent grain growers and membera of the Home - Maker's Clubs are taking the matter up. At lesat one ai the leading religieus denominatiens ai the province, through its department of social service, is already issuing for cir- culation in ail its congregatiena a pam- phlet dealing with the movement and other denouiinations will doubtless promptly foilow suit. Numerous special editeriais are appearing every week in the news- papers of the province, many of which wsilthis winter conduet special depart- ments for the discussion of the impreve- ment of our schools. The correspondence columns ai The Western Home Monthly should contain letters on this subject in every Issue. Such is \"The Next Great Question,\" Reader, you have a duty in relation te it What are you going te do about it? Arc you going to do it right away? After ail the departures suggested are net particuiarly rasiical. Consolida- tion bas already been tried in most of t-be states of the union and in Mani- toba, while the programme ef studies bas been given a practical turn in aI- moat every civilized .iand. The trouble la te do amy practical w-ork worth wlsile lu the elementary sehool. Agricultuial courses lu secondary sehools are pos- sible, but scientific agricultuî-e in srnail rural sehools is eut ef the qucatton. Rational native study, school-gardening, seed-testing and a few other activities eau be encouraged. These shouid be carried ou iii every sehool. Mr. ii3iack's other point witiî refes-ence ta the ts-e~t- ment ai the non-English bas pax-ticultr value. Tise sooner we send Canadian teachers jute tbe non-English settie- inents the better for ail concerned. Nor is tliere much ta be learned b-v a coin- petent teaciser if aise is placed in cite of these sehools. Tise great succeas et - the teaciiers ~vho corne ont of tbe uer- mal sebools in deaiing with tise poiy- giot population of titis citv, shows that- their t s-aining for the work bas not - been paitogetîser negiected. Tise best point in Mr. Biack's article is his plea for ,better rural s~ihools. Evea tise small district school can be vasti-ç- im- ps-oved, and tise peripatetie \"sebool on w-heeis\" is bettes- Iban nothiuig foi- tue outîvisso distrj-ts -Etl. - h - - N.B'.-Tise abpve ai-t icie by i~Ir. Blaek deservea special attention. For Skin Euvptions CONSTI PATIO N CAN BE CURED. Thers Us Noithlng T. Equal MiIIiurm's Luxa - Livor Pilla For This Purpeso. Mra. A. Cum.ming, Manchester, Ont., writes: \"I have been troubied with constipation for over five years, and feel it my duty ta let you known that your Milburn's Laxa-Liver Pilla have cured me. I only used three vials, and I can faithfully say that they have saved me f rom a large doctor bih.\" Milburn's Laxa-Liver Puis jegulate the flow ai bile te act preperi~k. on the bowels, and thus keep them regular. Irregular bowels are the main cause of constipatiOn. The price of Milburn's Laxa-Liver Pilla is 25c. per vial or 5 vials for 51.00, at ail dealers or maiied direct on receipt ai price by The T. Milburn Ce., Limited, Tarante, Ont. RESTORE YOUR HAIR 10 YOUTHFUL COLOUR Loi me Send Ysu My Fr.. Proof That Groy Hali Can b. Restorsi to Maturai Colour and B.auty No Dyes ou Othr Haranful Method. Resuits in Four Days. At 27 I was prematurely grey-and a failure because I looked qld. To-day at 35 I have no trace of grey haie and I look younger than I did eight years ago. I restored my awn grey haie ta its natural color and beauty of youtls and arn a living example that grey hairs need no longer exiat. No dangerous- dyes, ~tains or other forma of haie paint are necessary ta keep your haie young. OlJ and greii a~ ~7 ioun~ and hemnj a~ 85 Let sue send you free fou information that wili enable you to re toi e your OWfl hair to youthful color so that you need neyer have a grey hair agaili, no mater what your age or the cause of your greyla~ss, or how long you have been grey or how many things have faîied. My free offer is open to nien and wurnen alike for a few days longer. Send nu money. Just write me to-day giving your name and address plainly, stating svhether (Mr, Mrs. or Miss) and enclose two cent stamp for return postage and I wili send you juil particulars that will enahie you to restore the natural color of youth to yout liair, making it soft, natural and easiI~ managed. Write to-day. Address, Mrs. Mary K. ('i ~man, Suite 380 D, Banigan Bidg., i ,RT k ANewAidto Hdme Dressmaking The perfeeted dress-form---adj ustable in evcry way-ncck, bust, hîps, ~vaist-each part indeprndent. And now cornes the perfecting detail-coilapsible. HALL-EORCHERT Collapsible Dress-Form Ultimately you will own a Hall-Ber- ci cri-il-e pertect dress-form. Order nos nnd du your 0w-n drcssmaking. Drcssmaking i\\lado j II~f O Ok E as-. - a valuablo book L home dressmaking sent 1W free oi¶'reOuest. Write to-day. 51 HALL-BORCHERT DREIS EU FORMCO.ofCanadaLi~d., Dcpt. A, 149 Adelaide St. West, Torc,-*i~, Ont. Put two tablespoonfuis of Epsom salt~s into a cup cf boiiing water iet it stand until dissoi~-ed, then appiv te tbe face, ictting it dry on. doing it as often as possible uzîtil tbe eruptions di'~a~îpear. Saluas. 50w Vout 5,, ~uaooIs.s",
         "September Duck Shooting Days Writtcn for The Western Home Monthly. 13y Bonnycastle Dale. r, Ont., dwith and feel at yeur e cured d 1 can .ved me regulate ,on the regular. mause of ta-Liver ýr $1.00, receipt ,imuited, LOUR lot That d t. ly'2 Wethod. a failure 1 have no er than I own grey Of youthý Lairs need es, mSainls ýessary te \"Quack!\" cailed Fritz, as a big black duck tore aiong past, iLteok three bar- rels te stop it and the.peor tbing dived the instant iL struck -the water. Fritz had reloaded and flred and kilied iL the moment iL rcappeared-wonderful, here is a bird that lacks fond sometimes be- cause iL does net know hew te dive, yet the instant it is weuhded down iL gees. In a lifetime's study 1 have neyer seen a Black Duck (dusky mallard) dive-from the time iL quits diving as la down covered youngster, until itlai woundcd. The fligbt becaxue fairly good as lear giTS oniy 243 days 'more until jduck shdoting,\" yawncd Fritz, as he looked out on the snow scene whicb lay spread about the Island of the Bcavei' in midlake on the morning of Janugry lst, 1915. Day aftcr day, each with its duties well donc, he bas deductcd a day, from the score until 242 are ail cbeckcd off. To-morrow!! is The Day! wben ail tbe devotees of this field sport slave from morn tii! dcwy eve te get a fair bag te take horne to leving mother, faithful wif e or The Girl, neyer mmnd, it may be your own sister or someone else's sister ?- don't tell. \"Wbarkl wback!\" from Fritz's. ca- nec. \"Wback! W'hiack! Whack! from \"Did you get it ?\" 1 cailed across tbe dark drowncd lands te, the lad. \"You bet! Say!I ain't they tbick 1- \"Just after two, better try te sleep,\" and I snugglcd *down undcr the netting, in rny canoe. Hew interminable the nigbt scemcd. Great frogs \"more- rummcd\" ail over the marsb, rnuskrats ran p'ast over the bog legs and plunged in witb a soeern splash, a black anake, 1h pursuit of young \"croakers,\" slitb- crcd ever the dcwy rnarsh bay on the bog beside us, wrens and rcd-wings twittercd sicepiiy in the bushes, raiy a grebe crackled but its harsh iaugh or a stately bitteru \"boorned,\" or a migty heron. croakcd, and above it ail, and tbrough it ail, buzzed tbe myriad mosquitos and, I mnust con fesa it, Fritz's beavy snoring (he says it's bestly pn- fair my writing ail the stories te yen and tclling about bis fauits, ho says you ought te hear me snore, don't yen believe him). \"Bang-boorn.boorn! \"-tbis made us sit up like two Jack-in-boxes-some fool had fired the frst shot of the sea- son-time 3 a.rn. and pitch dark. Alil the birds and animais ail over the dark brooding marsb complained drowsily about the unusuai noise, even tbe fishes on the surface over a square mile about us spiasbed their protest noisily. 'Tump! tuinp !\"-I hear paddle strokes, set in lightiy and drawn eut carefully, nevertheless I hear tbcm-someonc is sneaking threugh the thin wild rice hoping te find this bay unoccupid-I'll save bim some paddling, so0 I flasbcd my torch; Fritz did likewise ana we both heard the caneeist sneaking off siicntly. Now the first faint grey appearsr ii the east and tbe watcbful oid black ducks begin to call \"Quack, quack.\" \"Quack\" go the neisy females, \"Quack» answers the more sulent maies. Then we bear an early wood duck scuttie and \"squeal\" and a pair cf littie sawbilis (hooded mergansers) dart by overhead, from ail over the great wild rice bcds cornes the sound, cf bcaviiy flapping wings and leaping splasbing wild dueks, tbe flight is on and it is yet tee dark to se- bang! bang! sings the black pewder Indians. Ping! ping! answer the white men's guns-Bing-bing-bing-bing! rat- ties the pump gun of eue' cf the Ojib- way guides and a' perfect stream of fire leapa eut ie the dark night (or early merning). \"Ping\" gocs Fritz's single barrel across the tiny bay and, ne resultant splasb foiiows. I promptly bore two nice boles in the atmosphere mv self and bear the Iow caeklceof the lad wvhen \"wback, spiash!\" ensues. Se v.e hoth determined not te mmnd the other fools but te wait fer better liglit. A perfect volleying sounds ail over the ten mile long river, marslî and rice bcd, streaks of fire like Roman Candiesi sputter everywhere and the birds fly wildly. \"Splasb\"ý-right into the open Water, between the lad and 1, flops a Wood duck, it's quite safe as we dan, nt kili it on the water wvhile iL swims hetween us even if wc w'anted te. 1 -ve the lad grasp his gun, I raise mine. kiok a paddie te make a racket, the biîd jumps and botb guns roar. IL wil n(,%er' be proven whe kilied that duck, picked it later in the day and a Es'gle'4pelct had passcd right threugh it, entrance and exit of the same size, of course the lad dlaims it, some people are' se selfishî I rcaily feel in my bones 1 kilied t'hat duck =Yjself. 4 '~ -\u003c 7 4 dayiight carne and we dropped a few birds and xissed many more. Now the $waiiows poured out, the- migration southward,% of these birds had been resting in the marshes and fully a mil- lion werc a-wing ail over the shoting grounds, whirling and circling and dip- ping, one would neyer think he could pick out a dûck in this weaving mass, yet the eye does instantly, and hardiy a bird passed unsaluted. It was easy te tell the amateur and the city would-be-sport, thcy fired at «ery tbing witlân range, and far eut of it too, missing ail the ducks and ocý casionally kiiling a peor gull or bittern or heron-ali guns sheuld ho liccnsed,ý any iman slaughtcring non-game birds sLould lose bis paper and his shooting. Our friends the Indians, i their bay, .23 had kep up\u003e a regular fuaflade, now the began te paddle out, se we tee picked up theý very few decoys we use and started off for camp, jupig ueks oi4t of many a ]ikely cover-this isg ex- cellent sport and. good prkctiee. On the way ini Fritz picked up a poor aged Golden-eye and placed it on t he bow of bis canoe, the bird, a \"left over\" from the Spri ' Migration was 80 old that it sat gcontentedly there and had Its picture '\"took.\"1 On a neighboringe island Borne beaver were feeding on t he poplar-trees, out- ting tbcm dewn with excellent success -but even beaver are foolcdl!-ase.' the tree in the illustration, it fel inlànd instcad of into the water, a grapevine made ail the wise little beasta calcula-' tions fail and-they will have te cut It ail up and dragit te the water if they .1 The Wester'n *Iome tif ont hly I appy ai 35 Ltion that i hair to nver have your age how long y ,'thîngs Ste mlent inger. ay givitig statiii, close twO will send e you tO deasilh' rs. Mary in Bldg., bic in --each 's the Order ng. luable g sent \u003e-day. INSU .2a1 Chka«O --A Anl Outdoor Persona And EpeiaySociier Apprecie éT he Waltham iltay Watch \"Deoign Recg2d Tids, pencliciwrsot watck lias ;te own armor plate wlucli protects andi partially covero the crysot'al It ;o very substantal and hlas a solici back case wtli two bezels rencler;ng t weather proof. Many gallant C anaclian soiliers arc now wear;ng this watck. ,Aek to sec it at your jewelers. It is suppliec ;n 27 Jewel grade at $12. andi 15 Jewel grade at $15. We can aloo now Bupply wist watclieo (full-open face style) witk luminous Jials and hlinds. \\Vt1 these watclies yrou can easily reaci the time ;n pitcii ctarknessi FOR NURSES. Ve are offerùig a opec;al nurses dbwatch, witk an'extra large seconds da1,an advantage every nurse wiii recognize. Our fre booklet woulct iuteret you. Please oenxl for it. Waltham' Watck Company Canada Life Blclg., St. James St., Montreal AM",
         "f The western The Victor-Victrola ranks as a Master Instrument of the art of, imparting musical knowledge, a great aid in the musical education of your children, with resuits most satisfactory to you, for it enables you to enjoqy a repertoire emibracing the whole of musical art We carry Victrolas in ail styles and prices. Write. to-day for Catalqgue. MASON \u0026 RISCH LIMITED 302 PORTAGE AVENUE, WINNIPEG When writing advcrtisers please mention The Westc! r. Home Monthly. WiIIiami Shsving Cmam. Par/the bristies of * -~ your shaving brush, squeeze a littie of thlis creami on it and apply to the face. There you.have».it- a quick, abundant lather that will not. smart or dry. If your skin is tender or your beard tough, or both, Williams\" Shaving i Cream will give you lastingsatisfaction. squattedt along the shores, hidden in the rushes, killed enougli wild fowl with blunt-lieaded arrews te supply eaeli their ewn family's stewpot. The entire possessions of a family was the bark and skin tent, the bircli-bark canoe, some deerskin clothes and cevers, a few eartlienware pots -and bowls, a knife, an axe, some boue implements, a few flshing and hunting utensils and for the leaders a flintlock -with these rude tools they took plenteously of the fish and game and fur. Wliat a contrast this camp offers. Canvas tents, mod- ern pump guns, civilized (uncomfort- able) clothing, artificial liglit, break- fast foods (looks like' doîl stuffing but tastes ail riglit) highheeled shoes and, abeve the wailing of a brownskinned kiddie in a neigliboring tent, soared and squealed a tinxly gramaphone in the elassical notes of \"We won't go home until m-o-r-n-i-n-g (scrgecli-sereech) WVe won't go home 'til m-o-r-n-i-n-g, We won't-go home untile m-o-r-u- i-ni-g (screech),, 'Tii daylight d-o-t-li appear\" screech! sereecli! sereecli). But we went home at once nevertheless. want\\tefor this.winter's food, remeni- ber, preservatien of our birds and ani- mals is a good thing for thera and for us-not for thirty-five years has a beaver been seen as f ar south in On- tario as Rice Lake, but tihey were, pre- served for ten years-so see the resuits. Now, while we in this temperate zone are enjoying lig'ht and heat in these September days, the wild ducks which breed far north are losing both light and heat-remember one point, no steamship lias penetrated se far into the northern ice channels but they found the ducks stili streaming north- wvards overhead to some, stili, north- ern, breeding greund. One strange resuit of this dreadful war-all the game birds have ail left the vicinity of the batie zones and re- treated into neutral territory, or at least to untrenched territory, but the song -birds stili trili their matins where the dead lie thickest and the cannons thunder and rifle crack ail the day and j night long. We who cannot go, by ra son of age, other most important du- ties, or incapacity, MUST DO OUR SHIARE, remember, every naine of a Canadian whom we read has (lied, is wounded, or is missing or' a prisoner, 'bore that fate for YOU AND I, and we wil have to give ail we eau spare, do ç%ithout ail luxuries, send every abie-bodied manAihing to go, as, un- less we defeat our desperate enemy, it iit perchance evilly happen that this fair land of ours wiIl see the scenes of heartrending desolation of the homes and firesides of wrecked B'elgium, northern France, poor little Serbia and war-rent Poland. Sill it is needful, having doue our share to help our Empire, that life should flow healthily along in this great Canada of ours-so come with me after sunset to the Camps of the Ojibways, wliere the wild rice gatherers are tent- ing. From the dark rice beds the great Sugar Maple Island rose like some fabled monster inte the gloomy sky, the twin camp fires on the lonely point its baleful eyes-Fritz says if those were its eyes it was no Cyclops, as lie counted twenty lires, you see the lad allows nothing for poetic license, no- thing for tdie author to speculate upon -anyhow we paddled along the dark waterways of the rice beds, jumping many a wild duck and mudhen, bitten and heron, rail and. shorebird, these rose withj alarming quack or plaintive cry and sped off ahcad, once we went \"ker-slap\" into a submerged log with a bump wliich nade our teetli chatter. Ahead lay a bizarre scene, tlie white tents under thedark trees flickering ini and out as t'fie camp fires glowed or paled, tlie dark figures of the natives seated about them. quavering out the song in the native tongue. \"Umba o nesli ken nin je chog, Kuk ba kee zhig suh uli ne keen; M'a be nun ke te m\"hkze win,, Kuli ge zhaib dush nali te brin doon.\" \"Awake my seul and with the Sun, Tlîy daily course of duty run; Shake off duli sloth and early rise, To pay thy morning sacrifice.\" 'Twere better to sing theMoin Ilvinn at suîîset than sing no livnin at 1.l.Iow peaceful it ail is, if sonew'hat grloony-whe ecau look at these quiet civilized tribes, this d'ark September iiighit, and flot give them great credit for the sons who are battlingr in the trenclies tbis ýverv hiour, thcy volun- tered illingly and many more would( have gone ]lad.thie conditions not becut sosevreV1. \"Ah! alitalivalil cheemahu (Ilullo, eanoe!) called lan (1]( trapper friend andi 1 ue answered (Fritz tried it in the Ojib- w-ay andl 0ne of the youuig guides told IiiiiiCcriii m -a w fot allowed te ho spoken ini Caiiada, and Fritz wvas sulky l'or an lioiir a ft er\\\\ards) . 'l'ie rie bar- %' esters are to ii) lY ,o tlievpa~s tie limie trollijun' oi- uiakSMolngi and ,Iioot- in- ilncks aMdid inavoeanid gribe too, an(l anY otlir li\u0026 edible bird, for tliveeare iaîîv kiudis,.111(l t lis Il nins ilany -11lîîîgrv bllie.. ri dit is not w.astefiul to ki1i for tbielpot. Onîe ld maîi. rnkle anid bleared liv a-oe. tohl Fritz o f te tlic , L ing hlere whcen lie w-. i lad, inocf t1îc boys fli1adl eveii handled! a nz1 e~«fr, they mxade tàeir owNv boWs and arrows and, In Full Figliting Armujur Sergt. W. H. Welch, 1O6th Winnipeg Light Infantry, wbio has been through niuch fighting in France An AI-Canadian Câmpany for ACtive, Service A imovement bas been started te raise a al-Canadian Company yte Ot Regiinent, ýWinnipeg Liglit ]nfantry. Siuice the announicenent in the press a large number ef prospective recruits have corne forward witlh a view to offer- iing tîteir services. The erganizers intend getting the namnes of AIi-Canadians w'ho wvis1î te offer themselves, and wvhen a sufficient numiber have been secured, the Company -%ill be offered the -next bat- talion organized ini Winnipeg. iEvery ueginent on active service lias a large percentage niative-boru, but it is feit that au Ail-Canadian Company mill bave the effeet of a, greater niumiber offi-ring tleir ,;ervices te the En~IrIYle- T]îat famnous organization, the North End Aticetie Association~ of Winniipeg.l lias promnised te i-aise a platoon, and the organizers would like to hear from anm clubs or, individuals throughout the wes t -who are qualifled to join this eoinpanv. Address ail communications te the Adjutant, iO6th Regiment, Winnipeg- Ligiit Infa-try. Four other forms of the samap good quality: Holder.Top .Sha'v4ng Stick Hinged.Cover Shavin-g Stick Shaving Powder Shaving Liquid(in bofttl.) A minlalum mfal Package of ans of the above uni for fi\u003eurc.noian atampa. Mdnua The J. B. Willams Co. Dept. A. Glantoubury, Conn. U. S. A. cý",
         "The Western Home Mtonti4Iy The Womali's Quiet -Hour- By E. Cora Hind. It is a great pleasure te announce that Lillian Laurie has been appointed to a place on the' Advisory Board of the M4aniteba Agricutural College, the first womaa in Canada to be Another.Step se placed, and at tluè Onward moment the writer can- not recail any woman ia the U-nited States in a sirilar position. Lillian Laurie has the extension work of the colege very much at heart, and sIte will stand strongly for increased activi- tics alonk this line as well as being adinirably fitted to specially represent the needs of the wovmen students on the board. It is nlt x*cessary te affirm that ,sie believes in equality of opportunity educationally for men and women, site is advecatiag daily by- speech and pen. Ilerself a coilege graduate, she will bring to that phase of the question, training and experience, 8he is a warm advocate of the retura of the coliege te the f \u003cid of the University, from which it ehould neyer have been separated. We iaay look for mny good things f rom titis appointrnent. Now a word as to the new Minister of Agriculture, Hlonorable Valentine Winkler. 1 want to repeat, as nearly as possible what 1 heard hlm say the other day, in answer to a Minister question as to bis attitude on Winkler extended opportunities for women at the Agiultural Coliegey, it was te tItis effect: \"I have bclîeved and advocated the right, of threshed out withi a good many wolneu. They are not given as eaitirely tie writer's exclusive ideas, but rather 'what she lias gathered f rom many sources. All classes ini the Agricultural Coliege should be 6pen to any wemau who wishes te take a full agricultural course; DMam Lillian Latrie thiat there should be absoluteiy ne dis- tinction of sex in the matter of the agricultural education; and any woman who wishes to do so, should be able te take the full five-year course and gradu- ate as a B.S.A. In doing this she should not be mnade te feel that shé is au out- sider or a sort of speckied hen, but she should he able to take it in exactly the same way that the nmen would do. This state of affairs can only be achieved byi the vcry cordial 'support and encourage- ment of the principal of the College, and the backing of the minis'er whieh we are now sure of. Perhaps it would not be out of place to state -%hyý I dwell at such length on this -ph 'ase. Frorn,. time to time there have been wonien, Cana- dian born, who have wished to take titis course, and have not been able to do so, and a number of inquiries have frotu time te time corne fromn the Old Country f rom women who had from £250 to £500 or £600 to invest andf who wished to go on land, but did not wish to risk their aIl without first having s\u003emo practical knowlcdge of farming in Can- ada, Iu additionte being able te take the full agricultûral course, womea who cone -in for the dornestie science sectioin should have their work arraaged, so that they can avaii theinselves Dairy and fulyof the training in dairy Poultry and poultry keeping, and whilb-I would not go'so far as to say that they shouid be compelled to take these classes, I think that the necessity of doing sô should be stroagly urged upon them. nient of classes and training for inten- sive agriculture on smaîl areas, say a ten or twenty acre farm. At present there is practically no provi- Intensive sion for instruction of this Farming 'kind, while there is a con- stant and growing need of just such information. Classes along this line would bie found extremely at- tractive to both women and men, and would, . arn sure, bie a factor in draw- ing a number -of istudents from the city to the Coilege with the ultimate view of goîng on smaîl holdings of their own. hin eheamineend ofnthe collegeecourne I hm-in heendahoufdte c lecurei 1stabisk hefr aoulmeawhecre h dc et ursfe fr wi ectuwre nthe c o Homeryoung chitrenhe nursinof Soeio prparaiodnsfomteringan Seti imrpai sborecte iT shor cu se i nr sg jhch s uTesort thure Agicuuraing -,lleu asyeartaonlat ~the Ariewasa eepeaer to ayofs ,iito tiaîgan weyekneso mhng of ust nedo b gt e onry womeithnregardh teof atectyundryhomen îurrsegardh anxiaenty antdeome hom infor a'tit sor thcoen te ream e inmore pticahotlouetrainng a pitifinits înatns trnin ars iti e oinmes itere il beFromnersad Ito thnk that it wis thbcison of th andr1 uothiir College ste ssionlfthe pprutsfo tItis kin tof trining the pfrutreshoe thkinerftht criin tgthefituraeshoe matter, hat cmwe nay do te promoh proser t o te mpr ovince, it eah progrs rsperity oftepoic e et er- mmcd by tane hometht arl e detin i mnd ythe ol hoes illarmae iome ofd the fteore h irls keththomes attend the college of to-day. ,Nex!t month 1 hope to say something about the extension work Extension aiready started, and aluo Work about how it eau be enlarged and improved. PUR1TY FtLOUR. wmr dMd ma etur MDmd. oBe. Bak Covu\u003e -FAOr hesel ihe !lthEy S 1Mc lary' s P yforthmUsele i.HEAfelTheRav I. lion. Valentine Winkler, Minister o1 Agrici4Zur women te vote for over tweaty years, and 1 believe the women of Manitobi bave a right te do anything in connec- tien with classes at the Agricultural Coilege which they can do, and any work looking te greater opportuflities for them, will receive my cordial sup- p)ort as minister. \"'That is good flews, but there is motre te corne. Tlie littie, speech ,was repeated by the -writer te a pronm- inent business mnan of the Nvest, and lic said: \"If Val. Winkier said that it is a., good ns donc. I have knowýn hlm for twenty-five years, and there is ne iman iii Manitoba to-day witli a fluer sense of honor or one who more nearly conies til) te that oid descriptiont of an htonorable itan, 'he who sweareth te Itis own hurt iiij( changeth net,' you ean bauk on i nkler.\" Is that ntot the best of news 9 I lere are soute of the ihiiiugs icwe *linld 'hiave in conuection -witiî Hie \\-rieultural Colege. and aioîtg t1iis liltO \\îvould be very glad of coimelit.s front my readers as to liîo What We neariy these i(leas mneet Should Have with'their approval. Duir- îungtg hie S5ýttttt(r, wîlie tra'. cliiig in the couuitry, tlîey have ht-ci Yeu may burn ceal or wood-yeu nmay want te heat one rôoot or ten roems-yeu may hère asmalheuse ora bi house- Rememnber, there is a paritcuar mcàary Resterinude for P râpéialrequdremnt8. nmClrys Very ,Hot Blast la surely a wonderful Hleater. The ,u Consundflg Attachnient means atepthee criixnnefoy aur ointe rad o live e 9, hate e in frem yourcei, instead of einga -a big saving ini fuel. The Ground Joint Doors used on McCiary's Very Hoet Blast makes this Heater gastight. Lined throughout with McClary's Standard Heavy Fire- brick Lining. Last longr-throws a greater ~ and steadier heat. Using a McClary's Famous Base Burner You arise in the morning-yeur house cezy and '~CARMi~\u003e warm-tu.rn a f ew drafts-put your tea kettie \\ LODONON1 on the pot hole at the back-in a few minutes you are ready for breakfast. Isn't it nice? Operating a McClary -Famous Base Burner la simply a questiôn of giving it a f ew minutes attention twice a day-putting in a scuttie of coal in the morning and evening. The Speclal Flue Systemn in Meclary's Fameus Base Burner Steve carnies the heat from the firepot down the entire depth of the steve-acwress the bottoma on one side- returning on the opposite side-thefl Up j Very the back before entering the Smoke Hot Blast - Pipe. Think of the warm floors and 4 Made in three the amount of heat thrown out in your 4 sizeshouse. The Double Heating Attach- ___________________ment allows a bot air pipe to be' taken off tlhe top te heat adjoinin* roomns or upstairs. This la a splendid idea and is supplied with ail McClary 0 Base Elurners.j McClary's Famous Base Burners can be supplied with guaranteed good baking ovens and two large pot holes. Then the best part of al: They are soeâesy on coal. There are many more things to tel you about this Ueater, but space will not pecrmit, so we want you te write and let us send you a special bookiet and the name of your ncarest MeIClary dealer. Fill out the Coupon today and send for particulari and prices. McClary'S Winnipeg' Calgary Saskatoonl Edmonton Vancouver London, Ont. Toronto Montreal Hfam ilton St. John, N.B. - - . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . w - - . McCLARY'S, WINNIPEG Dpt. WxH. Sire of Rouge.. . . . . . . . . . . . . Numnber of Rooms ........... N aine .. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Address . .......................... Dealer's Nam @e ...................... t. t I*. il in the tl with y eaeh e entire he bark cane, e,, a few i knifc, a few for the se rude the fish contrast s, med- momfort- break- fng but )es and, skinned Lred and in the r-n-i-n-g -n-g, o-r-u- screech! rtheless. g Light figting Activôe t' raiso e lOth infantry. press a reruits t offer- m- iteud ans whlo w1en a red, tite iext bat- ce as a ut it 15 ay will iunber El ire. ? \\ortit 'inniea' and the rom amy he west onpanv. te the Vinnipeg-",
         "'Y -\u003e The Western Home Mon thly The Young Woman and .Her Problem 'Pennl Richmnond Hamilton. '«SHE\" DOES\"' LIRE bMEN. Receitly, a letter bias corne to my des fromn a young w'voman w-ho criticizes n for mny higli regard of mien and i ambition for girls to become home-mal ers. The writer states that she bas bie a nurse for four years and thinks si knows a little about the \"innter char nels\" of wome's lives. Slie says sbe ahs spent thirteen nîouthis in a ýWoman1 h9spital, and believes marriage is a fail ure. l'le letteî' bitterlv citicizes Peai -lilihnond I laiîniltonl for encouragin girls to love loie-maki ý and blai the nmen for ail tl. - sins and iniseries o humanity. I wish the readers of titi page w'vould bellp me answer this youný wvornan. Since the wonld began, the tw, sexes have -%valked 1 ind in baud il courage and in eowNvrdice, lu service an( iu selflshiness. For say vhat we xiii, th, ebb and flow of virtue-and of vice la thil wNorld is human-not masculine or feni inine. If vonng wornen grow Up with a pas sion for Virtue, Courage, Learning Politeness and S vmpatlix1-ren will se( clearer, step biglier, feel braver and lov( more siieerelv. I1iýsked one. of ille best nurses in Winý inipcg bler opinion. Site bas speut nman Tears in bospitals bes;i :e several yearý nursing in pivate homnes; mnuch of li private xork bas been in rural commun- ities. Iler reply xas: \"I think tIse qana- diani home life is beanitiful. 1J]have beeî iu few unha.ppy bornes. M3uch misery in homes miight bie avoitled if girls wvît înarry were better prepared in the art of home-making, and xvere less selfilb.\"1 bave nsked otlier experienccd nurses- on1e of xvhom blas nuirsed flfteen years in private homes. Site su iiithe writer xvas i taken. 1 flnd the general opiniumn i that thq-, average Caîîadian home i peacefulj'and bappy. 1 wish t o state to tbe -writer that 1 very mucîsel adîttire the unrnarried wvomami -%ho, for rea souis of lier own, bias re- mnained single and is doing fine service f4 l iniiitx%. We flud thein amougr oui business woinen, our teacliers, and in varions otber hunes of -w'ork, iurlching tbe sweet older sister ia tbe home. The xnajority of them miotlier hunmanity in a way thait the pliîxaical motîser does not au(l rail not. As a ride tbey are -less selfislît tian w-mu-iotlers are. \\Ve could nuot get alon- xith lit tbem, aud -e respect, admuire alil love titei. M'ben 1 naie mcdny tw%ýo lit the girls I w-auj cd to naline titeýn after two ideal ivoiniiwho arc -woinîen (f big idleas and sîilendid aceni)lsih'tt.TliieY are mmiedafter tw o uMna -iadxviiieil ne a business oýmanuandi one a teaclier. 1 truist titis w-il s;It isf N\"the wr tertiat I1la pfiw-e in ]il-%-hli-rt for fVie ina-îii-id umianl. I xvîslî to nie. tion a bit of niv o-wn exjîerie'mce xith girls. S'-cores of gils bauve tu; nme of their desirvs, anid I finît dtep duwn lunflic heart of nî'arl 'v eVery onie the ilesire for a lhume. Tiiring thie past feu Yiars alit on01e litiisanii girls have passi-il in amni ont as ineliîlîrs of tuie girls' club xviiichL «11a11nsolftili e o11-1 to raIl \"inie,\" andîl Iiaiix' of t hem have sil tarrieciland -l w r ie m abôut 1tiiîir hllppv hiuînelife. G irls n-itemefront l1part s of (Ciîiuîda.andI tlic pulse of lv\u003c inspira tioni t llîs qin fhîcir letters. Tiien, foo, filie girl wit h tue broken heart 5\u003c11)5ont in -sil sei- teiices thie canse of lier ui-s1rt-ss 'a fuîl-ýî- ian fr-ienil. )lder \"ycîîîg wîti eii''as -t i.hve tîî]d mne oufanî,î inîgloniehi- Il(l\"; -hfle-V ecaniot sutt . Ail t1liis lii- I Lt 1 iit 'td t ia :;t i(liiianduîtul k ii s \u003caiiîî4.~.\\l.-uîvbahules lIî l tlir 1îte toutif t i illthti il '\u003c of îsil\" l,î -. tit nl f~iliiu i le i-tijuî i IicI iuit lit, w itýtiî't tplit ieniisi tele 1al.1lt.lf ait i i t li i t f i uti- Ill:]e i -; ut iutuî-itd n ii hy n i- atImiîea d 'i prospective bride. This womianlias made a uonderful success of lier life work, and is one, whose namne is respeeted and admired in Western Canadian house- liolds. This iý what she said: \"'-%y dear girl, the greatest blessing' that cau corne into the life of a woman le the love of a good man.\" With tfiese experiences in the study of girlhood, have 1 not good reason to exaît bome-makingy? What is the opinion of our readers? COMMERCIALIZING HAPPY MEMORIES. An HIaviland, of îew York, bas crcated a profession tbat is yielding her a fortune. Shie is know'n as the perfume -Jady-the only xvoman in the world wlmo creates and individualizes perfurnes. To ier studio coune womien of rank-societxy women, actresses, professional womnen- to have lier brin-g out for them in fragrance-individuality. She perfumes And the sceiîts froin nature% fiçwer land shielbas created in artificial per- fumes. IEFINED BY HOLY EMOTIONS. Thiere is the countenance of bate and the countenance of love, the clear, frank' eye and the drooping, sly eye, the strong, determined chin, and the weak, wavering chin--the young face and the old face. Then tliere are sincere smiles and. counterfeit smiles; kind words and lies; ail these inake up the female sex. Is it any Nvouder thiat girls are mysterious? Behind smniles, and beautif ni dresses, and tactful decorum, are often tragedies -hidden from humanity-draperies of diplomacv. We think we know an acquaintance. buit w-e don't. The dictionary of personality is too complex for niost people to uîîd(erstand-anid so some girls helieve they can venture and deceive and venture and deceive again. But baflan life can not go on long defy- ing honest nature. Dissipation writes horrible tales on form and feature; white the dlean life, the pure idea, and the honest effort develop into fine fem- inine fascination. Remarkabie Photograph Made During Vist of General Kitchener and General Joffre ta the Front Line Trenches Where They Inspected the.New Guns, Amuxunition and Shelis Used by the Allies. In tlis picinie we see the inspection party composcd cof Cencr-al Kitchener (with cane, alinost at foot of stei)s), General Joffre just behind breastwox ks in uipper riglît hand of micture (secoînd from extreme right), M. IMillerand tlue Frentch \\Var ~Ifinister (in civiliani clotiies carryiîlg canie, coming don-n the sieps). 'lliey are Tikig their mway to the entrance cf one of i e conîrnunicating avenues connccting w-ith the firont line trenctues wiuere they later cmerged in the dayliglut ut St. Michiels, Lorraine, thirty miles from N'ancy, opposite Metz. .emtire blouses andîlsuites, site also per. 1fit îîîîs tliiitrets, isiiig difflei t p( iilmns f \u003cifiereiît pînys astrnlge Profession th'-iielfrointlier -lov'e for 'Mie oid- f.isli id(( gai-ten of lier giri-hiood. Thiis i lîoxv it camie about. Site loved fluxvers a nd coutd uot findidnl perfuines the fiaiaieof thic m-al flon-er, so site Stuîhîed (-eiiistrv andi ieciledtlo iput the scî-ît of rt-ai jiiuw-v- iliito jîcufumles. With fliral oeus site cuttibli itianmd cliniinteil miitiilte-. \u003chiiate setises discox-ered flic se-ut of the ruail'rose or violet. Tihis w-as lier lI'fgiiiîîmiig. To-îiav sheo hi happy iii a pîrofitatble professiont. Jeannette Ncrtuii sax s site matie lise of titi'limppu- lir'miior-y i lier gi-liood. Wia t w-as thue lappv umt'nomx'? lli(wunsof Miss N'orton: \"'It was ami oli fasiiioneid gardenm, inaluv, inia ty years oid. Graîmdimîotiers and givat granîliothers andi grea j. grea t gmandinotlitti-s liaî l panteti thoirt»ti, tiof Ili-acimîts. andi lilieus o? tlie valic.v, ai ptuttsies and leiuits. tlivir rose i- iîtlic. j livir (ciiatis villes, ami.l ie wiî.Sn cit jusinitie. and leicearith lididalii-t'-- fri-tit-ltin its iuosuliu. Su lnoicicîlwt1n.a i1-f. 'rSit1Ti-hiifo-iIl id -a Ml' vcf-titi-- x uiiv t li-t-livad l-tiivemiml v melotnts W-i-e slip -Im j tfo Sllw tt-miis VTe bit.rlui w\\.l ili -tif t-utttuijl tlifite, mandtlliad fik n- î'u t-lis tif llrlule violet s iniifi, dul-ii. \\ul. c tt'litthe girl wiio i- !o\\or-t.. i'11 - te i titi1o1Y-seemijs 1 i-u-liuai'. or s e.or taiflt\\ -or tri Il:-. aii'- fm'uit-te\u003cff~itst I~ ~~ ~~i - u îiî t il)ltaî(' xvteiiu In a meurt, rear ten ement behiind a smïali saluon at No. 492 Secondt avenue, iNi-w York, lix-es -Mrs. Bella (3ooke, xvlo for ftfty long yi'ars liats Nemi ati iii-alid. Dtming this tfie site lias carrieti ün a xvork of t-iitrity thtat lias mnatie lier name hlesscd ant belovu-t in miles of crowded teuneuts about lier. Site is an Eîmglish xvoman witht a xliohcsomîîe, gî'ucrous face, rcfiued anud sxt'(-tetl(d bu- h oiy emotions. thîis New Xoi-,tenemutint imissionary. Milliomaires andulfiteir xives and daugh- tî'rs 'aeo reueo lier bedsiîie to sec bowr lurgcily andti ow' uobl-g life cami be ived iii spiti' of puuu t and povcrt.y. Bishiops amud clel-guineniîave sat bv hli'r bedside for inspir-ationî. 'Tue i-t of great heuievolent int ifuifuons have xisited lier ho catch flic iiiilse o? lie'r brave spirit. Sometiimes- as mîtut v as ilittee tlousand poor persons hiavec hem fed or' clothied or shieltered flîmo-iigh lier u'îilanre in a year. iurs. Cooe litas luien am i ivalit inlabcd for fift- ears. ;utîtîlusiteb'guu bier mis- .Stoîary %xvoutk .11tt 1('s aul alune. ln spite oti1-lie ntuesuîand pain she fcuk in and itu~utilw orku'd for ber ('ltldm-eii. S '-0 -uîiîtetutti as uj1'c S- -mtrtitut tai\u003e1e utiil: vdtIlukeeplieur rltuiltht-iu ti l a tlit tii' fau-tuje pour. tii- it'itlt't t '''uit - it. I w ik.tt'l lu i ~ ~ ~ ~ ~~~wr it ti u' ut ýt ~tI i tlît-. time on lier work developed'into wont derful power. Above lier bed is pi motto: \"Kept by the power of God.\"1 THE SOURCE 0F POWER. In bis survey of the biographies of a thousand erninent British men an(! women, Mr. Ilavelock Ellis tells us that tliose who use their ininds the most live the longesi. Many of these people, in- cluding Mr. Gladstone, were exception- ally frail in early life. More than 20 per cent, were \"notably of feeble constitu- tion,\" yct among thema were some of the longest lived. A liealthy, active mnd- earnest study and determined ambition to achieve, aid wonderfully in resisting physical weakness. Hard study develop4 the mind and renews the body. 1%aux- times 1 have seen wage-earning girls waste their miental and phiysical energies over traslîy books. Three years ago a sixteen year old girl, who received cus- tomers in the waiting room of a tailor's shop, earned four dollars a week. Three years ago I watchied ber devour a silly story during the slack periods. Last week I saw ber in another store. '*he is still earrîing fourdollarsa week. Whio is to blame? Three years and no advanceinent! She who stands stili munst become weaker. Three years hence she will probably be earning less th~an fouir dollars a week, or, perbaps, eaN inefi- cient wife in a poorly rianaged hofl . Earnest study is the price of eN ry good achievement. If yon give only haîf your mind to what vou are doing, it -will cost you twice as mýucl labor. Tt la bY doing things that we acquire power. Do not be content with the knowledge sufficient for the present need; seek additional knowledge and store it away for the emergency reserve. Try to fix, firmly in your mind what you would lîke to do; keep your mind on splendid ideals, and you will fiad youirself scizing th.e opportunities that are nccessary for the fulfilîment of your ambition. Vic- tory-what is it? To make your job a real part of your if e; To feel that by its force You grow andl rise; To know that Victory cornes tbrougli honest strife; That happy labor is itself a prize. Then looking back, you'Il know -hy right is right; Nor feel false pride since -rou bave played some part. A HINT. ,ome girls mrnistake gentlemanly courtesy for personal admiration. Thiere are many mea who are born gentlemen and m-ho treat ever-one wi th cour-tes-r. and it sometimes happens that girls employed by sueli men become extrernel 'v embarrassing to their managers. Do flot think that hecause your manager is courteons to yon that he is la love wlt]î vou, for I bave knoxvn of girls losing taceir position for jus-t his reaso There is no place in business fo¶ nti- ment. SPIRITUAL CHEMICALS. Tlhe priceless jewels' of human society understand the deep secrets cf tbe soul. lîruethey tliemselves bave suffered. They are' able to endure trials without' losing bappiness. Carlyle points ont the fact that we wouuhd ne-rer bave bail Shakespeare if Shï espeare's soul bil neyer experienced pain. A girl came Io me hast month and said: 'What's tbe -use? I can't get a job. It's just my fate to liave to stand tuie kuocks of the xvonhd. Frm going to gi-re up.\" Discouragement drives girls wbo 'have ao faith in God and thernacîves to the tievil. On the otim-er biand discouragemeut lifts grls w-ho have faith in God andl thiiemselves tb flpaveiilx lbeiglits. Titere, i larmion- lu the sound of their voiceL that mnakes one feel wlieu in their prcs- ece fliat one bas gained mental anti spirituial powýer. \"ITe that dweileth ila me and I in lti. hiigethi forth mmîch fruit.\"y \"As sonie rare perfuime lu a -vase of? day Perx-adi1s if witls a fragrance not its ow'n. qu, w lien Thout dwelhest in a -morfal spi1. AIl llcaýven's mown swcetness aeemns- arouini it throxvn.\" fiA - -.- - -- ~it-ii",
         "\"t 1. jý' ý The WesterniHome M onthi y rIto %voit Ro.\" ies of a en and 1us that nost livé ople, in- ception- n 20 per te Of thle imbition resisting develop4 ,Maux' ng girls energies s ago a Vel eus- tailor's Three a siv Last ';IIe is and no iii nlust nce site an four Sinefri- 0I\\e. f eýIpry nlv haif ýit xvill t is bY ver. owledge 1; seek t away to fix iwould ;pIendid sizing ary for Vie- These Special Catalogues tmn X after any you wanit. address and send to us.. are noxv ready. Puit Sign your naine and Modern Homes and BiMIding Gasoline Engines Materials pianos and Organs Sewing Machines Groceries Invalid Chairs oprting Goods Wallpapers. Name .................................... PotOffie ................................ Province ................................... 6-eT EATON CIMITED WINNIPEd M CANADA GET HISCATALOUES WJLLAIDYO Through Them 'Yu Are« Assuredl of MACHINESelection, Quality, Value and Servire CATALOGU E EATON Catalogues are a medium of service thirough whicli people in Western Canada niay secure selection, quality and value The new EATON Sewing in their Mail Order purchiases. 'iMachine Catalogue is now These are vital factors in these tiines of curbed prod .uction, read. Itshoud bejy ~uncertain qualities and hiigh prices. every home. S.o should onie of the Ail the more reason w]iy EATON Catalogues should bc in Machines it fea tures. Contains ail evcry home in Western Canada-in your home, too. Thicir con- kinds of information about Machines, ~stant use in ail your buying wilI greatly reducc your cost of their working parts, how they shouki livi1ng.0 be operated, what they will accomplisil If ypu haven 't our Pall and Winter General Catalogue, write Sand what they cost. Invaluable to ail for it. Sent free on request to any address' in Western Canadaï Swhether you have a Machine or rnerely Sintend to get one some day. Don't buY without this Bookiet. Write for a f rc G Scopy today. O SDO YOU WANT ANY 0F THESE EATON CATALOGUES? f your 0ow and hrougli v 'why 1 have mnir Thi e t lemen uresy. girh remel v Do flot ger is witi' losing . ý nti- ;oietv c sol.l ffered. ithout ut th(, had I ad i and a job. id tuie ig to have o the ýmet 1 and herr pt.es- ami m %ë '~ 4 4 t' t'. -",
         "Mhe Western Hlome mon thly Business ColIlege -WINNIPEG '- MAN. 11,airtt NO W es-n th*e world. Learn it at the Success. thse largest, strougeet and most reliable Business School. -It han ten branches in ton Canadian citiees-trains more Btuent thn al cmDeitoscombined -HOLDS CRAMPIONSHI TYPE- WRITING. RECORD 0F CANADA- nimbez of the Business Educators' As- ue\u003cfItion-secures the beet pstos usgeexpert teachers--gives irnd'iviOdue.l Iarction in Bookkeeping, Higher Ac- counting, Arithmetic, English, Shorthand Typewriting, Penmanship Uasoline and Steam e or cal]'o F.G. Garbutt President D. F. Forguson Principal CANCER R. D. Evansa, diacoverer of the fainous Evans' Can- cer Cure, de- sires ail who sufer with Cancer to write to hlm. The treat- ment cures external or internai Cancer. R- D. EVAN S D-clo Write for Catalogue W. HAWKINS, Principal IMIZPE DON'T STAY FAT To -ovethat ADIPO, a pnnoa.t, harmtbes Obemit1 Treatoont, vu of the body, w. send a 50c.. BOX FREE M toayone who la tom fat. Adipo requirea noeecoo rdi- onool habit. U ~ oinA.thrn. X.~: idriey an d lisai trooblenith.tnnofign con-- with \u003c)beity* improVo aynuro Wit. ttoedoY for tho i FRýE 50c. BOX ad iloatWnd bu k. \u0026ddrese. ADIP O., 2319 ssAmiICn tlg NwYuk EQE VioIi,7 OUtfit 20 p g. j-, n GATES MFG CG. nWOMAI AN» WOMAN. This* awful war finds woman dloser te, public affaire tissu she lias ever been before. nW»men prove what is lu thcm ini timea of crises. It 'i then you iearn whas tey eau do. t!-day niany of theigi are doing meule work. They are working iu munition factories, they are learning to drive automobiles for service; they are forming theinselves into home guards. One hundrcd young women in Winnipeg are learning to bc chauffeuré, and expect te go, te the old country te offer their services. A women's rifle company is doing a-plendid training ini Winnipeg, and expect to have one thousand womeu in their organization by the bcginninig of winter. The most promising feature le the fact that the first women of the land are taking the lead in offering their services. In England thcy stand aide by iide with ail classes lu the munition factories; in ministcring te the hielpiess and the suffcring. They are ready to work, to- build, to' guard., te figlit, to serve in any place whcre msecdcd. This crises is devel- «ïping weman's understanàding, and mak- ing lier wise in counsel. The opinion of A scene at the Frenchi where ahe ie not wanted. I've seen 1h'K t -go Ôut of their way .,to Mavoid eleyTL.Kn eeWhy? She ie not sympathetie.e y She je intellectual. She lias finished aý' The Keeley remedis are best known ini course in college but she iB not edu- their applicatio n to inebripty. There have cated. been hundreds of thousands of people who We often wonder why mn devote have taken the treatinent and it lias been theinselves to girls, with littie lcarrnngin and shun the highly intellectual. Men successful andL continuous administra- admire and love girls who are gentie, tion for more than thirty-five years. The tactful, understanding, warm-harted- ICeeley Institute system hlas been extended in other words they admire w9manly so that there is now one or more Keeley girls. If the college, girl ie womanly Insiue anaî vr tt nti lier influence with men isu markedn but without the elements of sympathy she Union, besicles two in Canada and one ini canirot compete sueccssfully with the Engiand. The tume requlred to effect a girl who la sympat'hetic. A woman's cure of tliegiquor addiction la four weeks, highest mission and fate are linkedd there ls n o cnfinemet. We look with the mi§sion and fate of m .ndcemn Whatever putslier out of touch . wt after patients carefully in, order to see that men ie deplorable. If a girls coîlege they take their medicine with the utmost course alleinates lier froin the interests regularity and indulge in no1 misconduct, of men, it le to be regrettel bust this la managed in such a manner as The riglit minded girl takes te col- 'not to irritate or annoy tlie patient. Liquor lege higli ideals and cornes away with is not eut off abruptly, but its use is con- etili higlier one. tinued ni uhtmashepints So mucli for the girl who can go ta ni ul ie steptetl college, but I -have a word for those able to get along comfortabiy-with'out it; who cannot go to college.-. I know lier usually patients vo1untaxily give up the t- . - . our remedies are tonie in their effects, the In ddiionto thie treatment for drunk.- ennes, her isalso a tobacco cure and a neursthniaremedy. If a person wlio is addicted to tobacco dme not inhale to- bacco smoke or does not use snuiff, good results can be obtained by the use of home remedies; snuff takers, however, and smoke inlialers should go to a Keeley Institute for treatinent; these addictions Learning Iow to Throw 14and Grenades. gunnery school during a moment when the pujnUls are learning how to throw hand grenades 'thouglîtful and efficie¶'t women is soug'lit and considered by mien. Mrs. Pankhurst lias spoken from the ane platform with Lloyd-George. Wornen of intelligence and serious purpose inspire thoughitful îsen fired witli a great purpose. Our homes are centres of patriotism, and tihe tide of patriotisrn relling tlîroughi our Britisi Empire is clear and pure. This is a great spiritual confliet as well as. a iaterial struggie. Sonie one lias trutlîfu]iy said: \"War bias foinid the soul of Britain and lifted it to thse stars.\" SCHOOL IDEALS A gi rl slsould ]lave enougli sense to se order lier present thiat it w-ilI con- sist 'ently iead into and beautify lier future., Vill your college course do ibhis for you? Coliege is a prep)aration not au end. If a girl who goes te col- lege longs for future issefuinessa and ivide sympathies, if ber home life is narrow, suie is jnistified in lier ambition for a college education. If people say, \"'How Iovcly Janie la!\" not \"llow muchl Jane knows!\" lier college, course lias been wisely guided. It is m'isdlom not knowledge that inakes a wonhan's per- sonality pow-erfui. 1Plans a broadl, iovely future for yourself along, definite lines, and remiember ilat suiv stnudv that robis you. of being wvonsssly anti1 6m pathetic (w-ill -wcak-ess 3our popu-1 larity-with 'U en and Wotilen. I1smet an unmnarried wonian not 'long ago- cailous, and eold hiesrtedl. She told nie ase like peti tOwih\\io sire, barastjc- tliat ase did lot botiier lierself abott otiser peopie's troubn- - if Mrs. ,lonvss is dead, she's deani, t t's ai. S 1 e( nîoesn't bel ieve uinw ai îiw in. clttioll. L b ave sean lier- piislî lier wayje te p1aueiî in many a loneiy corner in the West-' in store, in office, at home on the prairie and in domestie service. Ta coliege after ail one of the vital ques- tions of girllsood i If you cannot go to college, ding to the idea. Hlave you honged, for learning? Learn fren tise Solhool of Life. Learn a lesson in pa- tience every morning; thlere are les- sons te learn in every bit of work vou undertake. Shakespeare, Keats, Words- worth, Plato, Michael Angelo, Rapliael, St. Paul, David and scores of otiier great teachers are ready te inatruet you. A few cents wvill purchase great lessons from .tiien on sorrow, jov, love, tolerance, wsork, beauty and truth. You disappointed, girls after ail niay become welI educated. Ambition Nvili find its geod and auy lesson. tliat de- velops in you tIie soul of sympatsy aud the spirit of usefulness is a college, ideal. I have seeri girls' natures gi:ow and broaden, anti biossom la doingr just tise conimon, wýell-known work w'iich se many of us do to-day for a living. Of.all sciîooia te îvlich a girl miglit be sent te learil.tise great lessons of life, tîsere la flot 011e se good as the st-iool of the wvorld. Ilere by lut inate exper- ience, ase nay learsi te uuderstand mnuy natur-es, nmaliv conitions; and ieet constant] v littile eiiereteies te cail out lies-r fuîe shse uiav lean the great lesretis of ]if(,iin al its. llasea, uts higlier lrnlt yial t-larity and love. In tise landling of l)ossibiliise the poor girl lias as good a t-llatst--ias tise rieli girl. Wiieni a girl otite lt-a rs tiseI few greatt, siîipirlîrtripesu i sytnpatliv anid g'tr-.t f ta eioiigh te lîve a istoanl, llpf1iL. per fui life, neonatter wlics-e tliat life is east. axe- serious and no0 delay- should be pJer- mitted in obtaining relief. Our neurotine la adapted te ordinary cases of neurastlienia or nervousness and good results always follow froni its use. We do flot recommcnd it where the ner- vous debility is extreme or in cases where the patient's mentality la affected; for a case, however, wliere a nerve tonie would be beneficial, we have no0 hesitation ln recommending our reniedies; therc is nothing la any of thein which would be injurious te the most delicate constitution. 'Correspondence confidential. Treatment adrninistered privately. Address:- Tho- Keeley Institute, Dept. H,, 676 Jessie Ave., Winnipeg. IBRIGHTEST LUGHT THE WONDER LAMP, A solid. brasa lemp uFsug a mandte of greet Gives 100 c.p- n. light six hours for one cent., frem eornmou Kerosene. No arnôke, no smell, safeeand simple. Dîvide your * light bill by six. Price-Wonder E -ara. ,5 c(xmne3 5 mne 300 Agents Wanted iu eacli distrtct. write UNITED MANUFACTURERS Gait Building Winnipeg jton, wid nd lut wateh. gsunta - GTE5NQ.O.DpL4410 ihia th( cnt me Of cat ofl fou the Lea one lies San clai f ai tivt bro gra. rool quil late abo con: heu, thai lest Spe( and shoi leWi T best bac] plar Dal Slov arr Yeai dise( lflg. four Year ul) t i - - ni'",
         "The Western Home tifont hiy Prom the valley of the Red River to 'the foot of the Rocky Mountains stretches an erea of country which, thirty years ago, was as littie known, to the wold at large, 80 the remote parts of China are to-day. To the world at large it was a barren, un- hoepitable waste, the greater part desig- nated on our maps treelesa, arîd desert. It is true some travellers brought back tonies that seemed to point to some vari- ations from the generai classification gen- erally accepted. These atonies came from enthusiasts and were accepted with so * much sait that the whole mass was unfit for humai' assimilation. By degrees spots wonm diseovered where the general desig- nation of desert was palpably inappropri- ate, but when sucli plaes wcre looked up on the map, they appearcd as mere specks ini the wide expanse geenerlzed. Though few of those who came to iJpy ont the land had ever set foot in the commonwealth of ,Missouri. it took a lot of showing to make them believe there was a country here fit to live in. mont known in hiere have eople who lihas been Iminiistra- ars. The extended re Keeley be in the nd one ini ) effect a ur weeks, We look o se0 that ie utmost sconduct, aanner as t. Liquor se is con- ?atient is ithout it; e up the day. As fects, the xl. )r drunk- ire and a )n who is nhale to- uif, good - of home rer, and i Keeley Mdictions 1 be výer- ordinary mness and its use. the ner- ies where ,d; for a lec woul ;ation in there is vould be ;titution. .-eatment s: -The- 6 Jessie demned by some authorities but it lias the advantage of gettmng a crop the first year and the ýecond crop without mucli work-. However, in some localities with a good top soul that is shailow it would not do, as the seed wouJd be laid in subsoil and woul flot grow. With a friable, sharp loam of good depthi success lias been attaincd by simply breaking rather dee p say four inches, and putting on discs and harnows tiil the sod is thoroughly pulverized. The advocates of this gystem dlaim that breaking and back- setting sucli land involves loss of too much soil moisture, but by 4lisclag, harrowing and packing at once tbjlý moisture is held. It is, however, - impaeticable with a heavy, strong sod. When a crop lias been drilled in, fre- quent harnowings,» especially after ramn, hold moisture and kil sprouting weeds. This should, continue tili growing crop is covering the groui'd well. Strange.as it may seem, mucli the same general principles of cultivation apply ia the cases of very diverse qualities of soil. The reason la that good tilth, conservation of moisture and weed killing are as necer- isary in one soil as anothor and rainfali is liglit ovor ail the country. The same de- gree of good tilth, or otlier requisites are not attainod in a stiff, dlay soil with the same power on la the same time ais with a friable soil that pulverizos easily. In tho handling of stubble land mucli ad- vance has been mado in the last fow years. Discing after the crop la cut is a good plan, for the process buries weed seeds, which start growing at once. These are killod by frost beforef .they ripen a second crop and f al or soing plowing turns over a dlean slce. Some good farmers have a dise foilowing the binder continuously with splendid resuits. 'When fail plowîng, or in plowlag stubble la the spning, a gang plow with a light dise hanrow attached does very good work la fining dowi' lumps that would otherwise dry ont quickly. In calculating the power necessary to perforin any of the different portions of the work on the lands of the Canadian North- West provinces, it is pretty certain that somo land will take as mucli powcr as would be needcd anywhore. In other places but a minimum is sufficient. Four 1,400 pound horses wiil be kept warm with a 14 in. breaker in some soils, while lan others two lighter horses will doyen thte same ground la a day. Though the above rules of cultivation hold good--genenally, anyone going into thie south part of Aliberta, which lias been tcrntc( semi-anid tiil of late years, should observe the system of neighbors and pro- cure a copy of the reports of the dry farn- ing conventions. Mueh of Soîîthern Alberta is irigated and extensive systems have been instituted for distrihuting water, but in the same localities faîl whcat was raise4l by dry farrning methods and cap- turcd 'first pnize at the groat exhibition at S ou- lC ltiva tion in th e, W est By E. Hughes Western Canada's Lea ding Taxidermist Send us y ou r Gaine Birds to Mount. Wholeqale a n d Retail Dealers in Indian C Ur i 0s, Garne Heads, lk Tusks, and Live Wild Animais. A full line of taxi- -dermnit's supplies. We buy alinis of Rare Birds and Mammals Write for Puice Lisis. B. W. DARBEY 237 Main St. Wlnhilpeg Official Taxuiermist T'o JIî,,fba (ernment RE E FineCamea ad coeoplteot. FRE fE selng2 Large CoIorOd A rt \u0026R.hioa ie to., or 2Okg. GATES MOVB. CO.. Ofet. 341.* CH;=AB Storm ad RliiiProi The Accru i antern in invalual ~Ci~ r, ers,rs. Rail riând Men SldirsFarmers and ou*oîcersevery- where. The Acorn Lantera in an efficient, sae, reli-* able, powerful and economîcal light, abso- lutelycstorin proof andý will \u003eurn anywhere and inany plsition. Simpie in construc.o andin operition. E \" y ta fight and etlnguiî.:. Cen be taken apart ina'a few secondsaJifneceaury.. .Equipped with auto-* matie tp cleaner, which prevents clogging. Riods one quart gaso-' ine nnd hurna 15 houri o oeafilling. Agents Waiited. Write for termns andterritory United Manufacturers Galt Building Winnipeg When writing advertisers pleawe mTention The Western Horne Monthly. i.'.. 11111 N Nll:IIIIlIiI.i'ii iaii1 1 il 11 Iliiiýl'iiiliiiiiiiiiiiiiillilllilli il lliiio iiiiii!lim n ll!l:ii EAdvice from McRean Bros. to t ei -Farmers and Merchants of Western Canada Spot çîhêat at Fort William and Port Arthur dur.ihg the last,4ew. %veeks lias been selling up around the 'dolar mark for 1 Northerni, and - these prices and even higlier are likely to be xnaintained throughout z October and November. Thiere nover -%as such an acute position ini -%vhe.at and wvheat products in the United States. The visible supply of -wheat and flour there at the present time is the. lowest on record and. m they will need ncarly every bushel of their hiard spring wheat for' mixng with thé soft winter wheat\" for milling purposes, and this means that Western 'Canada will have' to fi11 the hai~d spring wheat requirerpents of Europe 'for mixing purposes for ahl this season. It will take the United States flour mils grinding at é full capacity several înonths to 611l the sales already made.and get e stocks back near normal conditions, as their'stocks are now riglit down ie to the boards. The deterioration througli exoessive raina in the winter- iv-ieat states is, ive understand, considerably larger than reported, and M. iv ce aim thiere iS 1no reason whatever for farmers here sacrificing their M wheat at ridiculously low prices, and every bushel of our wheat should be sold at flot less thai' $1.00 per buAio1 in store Fort William or Port Arthur ba.sis 1 Nortlîern, and we may easily get higlier than tItis before , the close of navigation. We are satisfied that every bushel of our wheat that can be got to Fort William a.nd Port Arthur before naviga. CE tion closes ivill be badly wanted and we advise all farmorsi not te sel a biishel of 'wheat at traek prioes as there ilil -Ilkely be big preminina paid for spot wheat up to the close «'navigation. The fariner. who have been selling at track prices up to this date have been losers of f rom 5c. to 1Oc.per bushiel, and wo urge them not to sell a bushel until the grain is unloaded at Fort William or Port Arthur. We have figured in tItis out carefully for years and find the ohly profitable way is for farmers to sell their grain after it la unloaded, neyer at track prices. Wo dlaim that lc. per bushel is sufficient forb'andling grain, therefore _ dIo not give awvay 5c. or 10c. per bushel by selling at track prices. You cannot alTord it. Don't get ocared that prices will, go to pieces sill at - once because we have a big crop. Every bushel will be badly wanted. Oats and barley will also ho in good demand and prioes are likely to go hi-lier. WVe have nothing more to say about flaxseed. Hlold it back in the i granaries. You will get big prices for it-considerably over $2.00. We are grain commission inerchants and would appreciate. a thare of your canlot consignients. If you have your car loaded and it la on the C.P.U. or G.T.P., bill it to Fort William, and if on the C.N.R, to Port Arthur, and ivrite on your shipping bill \"Advi.se McBean Bros. *r - Winnipeg, Man.,\" so ive can check up the inspection and weighing when the car arrives, which insures the grain being graded as higli as it wil stand. We make big advancee againat carlots of grain, and when the grain is sold and ive have the outturns, settlement is made promptly. This usually means a big convenience to the ishipper.i MoBEAN BROSR GRAIN EXCHANGE - WINNIPEG, MAN. - Sept. 24, 1915. By Reliable PIow 3h ar O1M saE1SaIE ýGUAI#- Ajik «-TEm TO v 01919 I- 730T SATIPAOTzoN 12in.82.OO each 151n.SU.IO eauh l3inP$.SOeach lOn.2.ioeich 14in4.$SUeach lin.lU.Ileuoh Order froin this sdvertlsement and save tirne. Give nul\u003eer stamped on back of old shore. WALLACE-MéCORMACK \u0026CO.68UDR'X\u003e~G It took a long time to show people that there were different kinds of soil and differ- ent dlimates la this great area. As cli- mates and soils varied, so have the pursuits of the settiers. Towarcls the Rocky Mountains, where winters were mild and cattle could get a living outside for most of the year, stock-raising or ranching was followed almost entirely. Wheat raising belonged to Manitoba, the Red River vailey, where the soil is a heavy, black dlay loam but, going west, One encounters ail admixtures from the heaviest dlay to gravels, even to drifting sand. As a rule, as elsewhcere, the more clayey soils last the longest under bad farming mcthods and thcy necd more mo- tive Powver in cultivation. 1 For general rules, the land should be broken as shallow as possible when the grass has made a good stant, thus dividing root and crown so that the 'sôd will die as quicklY as possible. A month to six wceks later backsctting, or plowing the same land about double the depth after breaking, Commences. Broken landis the btter for being rollcd or packed after breaking s0 that th1w least possible môisture may be lost and the sod rotted with all possible speod. Diseing should follow backsetting and harrowing be done la the faîl. This should inake a model seed bod for the fol- lowing s-Pring. The concensus of opinion among thei best a!, liorities favors the broaking and backseit ing system for nearly alsoils. A1 Plan fo'I')wed un Dakota and practised byi DakotM, who come to this country, is to1 ~10w 1 ýqp in breaking the sod, dise wcll,( Cirrow mýd sow a crop of flax the first( .Year. 'Ilie second year the stubhle isi 'is : i owed and soeded without plowý-2 ing. third year tho land is plowed(l four !ie deep, and not until the fifthf Ye'ar t iI\u003c ori .nal top of the soti brouightr UI to j!!, airf-gain. This systota is con-t DER p1 Id bras, le-ing a of great [y. c hours Scent., ýornIon e. No ýOsineil, simple. you r by six. Wonder 25o 300 ~Vanted listnet. tipeg uet mmi reh 441 Vhiegi Tommy Atkins Salvages Contents of Ruined Farm Rouie. British soidiers removing stores from a damgaed farm bouse in the north of France",
         "The Western Home M ont hi y OLASSIFIEO PAGE FOR THE PEOPLE'S WANTS id youwitt buy or.snlanything in the lime of -Poulitry, Farm PropryFr Kaclaeyor ifyouant HeIp or Employment,' remember that the Classified admbmtlment colums of The Western Home Monthly are always ready to help yoju accompliUl your object. Cost 3c. word, minimum 50c. Cash with orier. IIELP WANTrED WANTED--Salesman to sel Dirk's Red Mite Killer ta general stores, druggista, and grocers. Also agents for smrnl ever town and village.ý Marshal \u0026 Marshaîl,eNiagara Falls, Canada. TF. WANTED-RelIable parties ta do Machine Knitting for un at home. $7 ta $10 'ger week asaily earued. i Wool, etc., furnished free. Distance no indrance. For ful particulars address: Thé Canadian Wholesale Dlstributing Ca.. Orillia, Ont. TJ. WB WILL PAY YOU $120 ta distributie religious literatuj'. in your communty. Sixty days work. Experience not required. Man or wowan. Oppartunity for promotion. 'Spare time may bc used. International Bible Press, 182 Spadina Ave-,, Torqnto. 10 WANT\u0026D-Persons ta grow musroonis for _08 durlng thie fait and winter months. Waste apace in celtars, barns or outhouses can be made yield from $20 ta $30 per week. For fuil particulars and illustrated bookiet apply Montreal Supply Company, Montreai, Can- \u0026da. 10 B3USINESS CHANCES YOUNG MEN-Get Canadian Government Jobs. Bioig pay, steady work. November ex- aiiains throughout Canada. Write im- mediately for free sample questions. Franktin Institute, Dept. C 177, Rochester, N.Y. 10 Br YOUR OWN MASTER-Stop wage elavery 1 Formulas and instructions for manu- factsring six big sellers and 100 business opportunities, sent for 10 cents. Write to-day. L. Bottomtey \u0026 Co., Box 5, Lashburn, Sask. THIS MANITOBA COMPANY çill pay yau ten per cent as reguiarty as yppr bank pays you three. Figures for the past two and a halfyears Witi prove this ta you. if desired, shares may bc purchased.on aur çznall payment p an. Let me mail you particulars. B. Martin, 612, Mclntyre lock, Win nipeg. 10 FRUIT AND FARM ,\"NDS WANTED ta hear from owner of good farmn or unimproved land for sale. R. G. List, Minneapolis. 12 WANTED-To hear direct from aowner of rood farm 6r ranch for sale. C .C. Bucking- ham, Houston, Texas. 10 WANTED ta hear from owner of good farm or unimproved land for sale. H. L. Downing, 109 Palace Bldk., Minneapolis, Mino. 12 FARMS WANTED-We 'have direct buyers. Don't pay commissions. Write describing property, naming iowest price. We help buyers locate desirable property Free. Am- enican Investment Association, 26 Palace Bldg., Minneapolis, Minn. 12 WE HAVE FARMS AND FRUIT ]Ranches for sale in every State of the United States and Canada, also good business propo- sitions everywhere. Our Bulletin free on request. United Sales Agency, 36 Andrus Building, Minneapolis, Mnn. 14 AGENTS WANTED $5 PRIVATE CHRISTMAS GREETING card sainple book free. Representatives already moking Oive to ten dollars daity. Bradiey-Garretson, Brantford, Ontario. 10 AUTOMOBILES, TRUCKS, M 0 T 0 R Boats, Gas Tractors, and Gasoline Engiues of every description, equipped with new mnade-in- Canada Lesgass dgvice, give three to Oive adi- ditional miles per galion, enables Fords and ail other cars to creelp along at less thian Oive miles an hour on high gear; installed by anyone in ten minutes; outlastsany gasoline engine and requires no adjusiing; sells for $100 on positive snoney-back guarantee; agents profit nearly 200 per ccent; exclusive territory given, enabling enîpînment of suit- agents; energetie man eau niake $100 weekly. First time this device offered in Caniadai your territory bas neyer beeu wo ked. Write at once for speciai offer. Norili .\\nxcrieail Mantifacturing Co., 976 Somerset Blliiiing. Winnipeg, Man. 10 MOTION PICTURE PLUYS WRIT MOVINO PICTIURE PLAYS $50 esejT.»Ail or spare time. Nocoesxl ece cf,nr Det is free., Atlas Puhl)islix' Co~3Cincinnati, Ohlio. T. F. POULTRY ANIF EGGS FOR SALE POULTRY AND EGGS FOR SALE- EXPRESS PAID - Barred Rotk.i, taying strain. Egg $2.00 per setting, detivered free. BalmossiegFarm'rs, Hafford, Saskatchewan. 10 FOR SALE 1000 ENVELOPES, letterheads, billheads, cards or tags $1.50. McCreery's Printery, Chatham, Ont. 12 BILLIARD TABLES-For farm homes, ýportable and stationary. The game of kings. $50.00 up, easy terms. J. D. Clark Billiard Co., Winnipeg. T.F. HARNESS-The \"Square Deal\" Brand. Soid direct ta users. No agents. Send for my Catalogue B, showing 30 styles. Thos. McKnight, Wýinnipeg, Canada. T.F. DOBELL COAL FOR STEAM AND DOMESTIC USE-Direct from mine to, con- sumer $2.00 per ton at Tofild. Orders shippe day received. Dobell Coal Co., Tofield, Alberta. 13 REGALIA TEA-Delicious and refreshing, reai value for money. Blended and packed in the Old Country. I wiil send 5 lbs., carrnage paid, to your post office for $2.25. G. S. Owen, Prince Albert, Saskatchewan. 10 M ISCELLAN EOUS DR. JANET E. FERGUSON, 290 Portage Ave., Winnipeg. Free consultation regarding your ailment. Correspondence invited. Nervous diseases, Goitre, Rheumnatism, Infant- ile Paralysis successfuiiy treated. T.F. SONG POEMS WANTED for publication. Experience unnecessary. Send us your Verses or melodies to-day or write for instructive boôklet-it's free.' Marks-Goldsmith Co., Dept. 67, Washington, DC. T.F. SPEED'S \"OLD COUNTRY\" NEWS AGENCY-Any newspaper, periodical, maga- zine or other publication you may desire, detivered to your home. Country orders arranged. List on application. IR. Speed, -369 Atlantic Ave., Winnipeg. 10 BABY'- LONG CLOTHES SETS-50 dhinty articles $550 sent direct return mail, carniage paid. Eyerything necessary, every outfit warranted new and comptete, lists free, detivery guaranteed or monc y returned. Mrs. Franks, 175 Alfred St., Nottingham, England. 15 BRLOADEINÂXE HAIR FOOD Grows hair like magie. Witi not dye but vourishies the color glands to naturat action. Directions for use on jar. Mail order price $1.00, postpaid. Broadenaxe Co., 29 Stobart Block, Winnipeg. (Mrs. M. Ferguson.) Estabiished 9 years. T.F. FREE FOR SIX MONTHS-My special offer to introduce my magazine \"Investing for Profit.\" It is worth $10 a copy to anyone who lias been getting poorer îvhile the ri',h, richer. It deionstrates the Real (arning powcer of money, and shows how anyone, no matter liow poor, can acquire riches. 7- vesting for Profit is thc only progressive Ononcial journal publishcd. It shows IIW $100 grows to $2,200. W'rite now and lilI send it six trnonths free. H. L. Barber, 471 28 W., Jackson flivd., Chicago. 10 ONE HOJYR A DAY-ort even less gvcn to study under our guidance wili fit you for a better position. We tcachi you by mail: Commercial course (bookkeeping, arithmetic, penmlanship, business correspondence, corn- merciat lawY, shorthand and typevriting, speciai Engiish, elcmcntary art, mechanicai draw'ing, architecturai drawing, electricai course, engineering (stationary, traction, .gasoline, , marine, locomnotive, automobile), nmatriculation, civil service, nind and nieniory training, teachers' exauinations, or aniy silh- ject. Ask for what yoto need,. Canadian Correspondence Coll ege, Limited, Dept. W.1131., Toronto, Canada. 10 STAMPS FOR SALE 1STAMPS-Package free to collectors for 2 cents postage: al-.o offer Iiindi cd differcut fox i41 stamps, catalogue, hinges; fi.-c cents W'e buiy stamips. Marks Stamrp Co., Toroiuxo. T.F. PATENIS AND LEGAL FETHERSTONHAUGH \u0026 CO., Patent S5,1icit s. Tlue nid eqtahlisli ed l ! ii11. Ilcad i'nîîe In aI 1t:înk Builing, Tormnna. and 5 I xSt., O-ttawa, and other prinicip.-l cifies. 1 T. F. Biings, Montana, - lu the fgU of 190W. Yields there reacli 40 buahels per acr without water. It is only witbin very re- cent years thgt this section of the country bas demanstrae itsabillty togrowcçreais at àll and, id, the la nommand the highest price of an yigatedlandtin the country, as purely fsrmag land. Much injur a been doueby the over- weenlng a±lbîtion 4to have a Larg crop. There la moXa money ln 100 acres of crop perfectly ti d han in 200 on the get-in- al-o-alwpn. The man wbo la w*ser than his neigbbors wiil kecp stock from the start and feed more grain than hie sella; thus making it possible ta have bis yiclds of grain as large ten or twenty yearablence as now. -The aid tales of inexhauâtible fertility are the veriest bosh ever invented. There neyer was such land anywhere, but gen- erally wbere there has been a series of owners, cinging ta that insane idea, the martgagar bas hacl ta rustle ta realize the amount of bis daim. Wben a dry year, came ta the early settiers and crops were short, failowing was resorted ta witb much improvement. Theni it became popular. Land was cheap and some men found there was less rush ln work by failowing land one year and grow- ing grain the next, keeping hall the land unproductive. Such a tblng la tao costly ta-day and it would only defertheevilday of exbausted land. Fallowing is good for weed kllng and, with frequent harrowing much moisture la saved; land should not Le plowed twice in a ses-son if it can be avoided. Humus and intrates are wasted by such work. When land becomes weedy, a good dise- ing. of the stubble in the f ail, plawig in spring, eultivating and harrawmng ta kil weeds till lst June wiil be fine preparation for a crop of barley. This can Le cut -and the land plowed Again before weeds have gane ta seed . With a cultivator and barrows weeds eaui be killed again and the land will be found dlean again. If rape Le sown broadcast about lst September it wiil smotber -weeds, and either pravide fal pasturage for stock or make plant food for next year's crop. Ilape eosts about $1.00 per acre for seed and is wel worth sowlng any time from lot May tlil lst September if land la going ta otherwiae be idie for seven or eight weeks. In the Province of Saskatchewan to-day la -tgjxseen the most g1gantic and re- marseless carnival of Soil robbery of modern times. The uext generatian wifl curse the farmers 6f ta-day for the abject idiocies bring perpetrated lu the name of farming. It seems that every nation and every age must bave ite day of roffilgate waste that la anly checked whcn Sire want stares the people in the face. Iu Sas- katchewan a warnýing voice la hooted and Jeered. The waning yields of ail Amern- ca' s wheat fields bas no terrors for the \"big-field\" and \"wbeat-wbeat-wheat\" craze. The bad state of the beef market and the atrociaus handling of cattie by the railways in transit and at terminal points bas done much ta agggravate matters; but beef prices must improve for the agitation against these abuses bas aroused an agi- tation that wiil enforce radical changes for the better. Park and muttonare bigb, thie former f ar passing ail records. This year the best wheat, oats, barley sud flax will Le sold for more money iu the stockyards than at the elevator and the land bene- fitted thereby. Denmark buys grain iu the markets where ours la sold and Denmark is a country of very amail farms, yet Danish butter passes aur doors and reaches mar- kets beyond, where it outelasses ours. Can it Le possible that there la not same- thing radically wrong? Traction Cultivation This subjeet is engrossiug the attention of the progressive farmner to-day; for the great strides in effective implements and mot i\\e power compel the admiration of all w-ha can c0m1rehend their magnitude, and the influence they wiil have on agi- cuitutre. Four short years ago the whole business was a gamble and regarded as a fad by many. The engines werc, cumbersome and shook themselves towards the scrap heap w-hile draw'ing haif a load. The Lit thes were home-made makeshifts, many of themn marvels of ing-enuiity but impossi- blie of general application. The impie- ment s followed in skirnîî sbing order and the officer in comnmand wvas compelled to \"hit\" and \"dresa\" them with great fre.. quency to keep them ail facing \"front.\" - To-day engines are lighter, stronger, more durable, faster and mor7éecoxiamical. They turu more quickly and are far hand- xer. The plows are lu a frame that is a marvel of rigidlty on the forward mave.. ment and the iwllv-4idual is under marvel. loua contrai of the operator. The following statement of cost of breaking two thousand acres of land, crop- ping with flax, threshing and hauling ta elevatar, shows wbat cau Le done under good management an~d favorable condi- tions and serves as a guide ta passibilities in tbas direction: Cost of Breaking Labor .............. $1,443 .00 Oil,.............. 1,298.00 Board ............. 333.00 Sharpenlng plows.. . 233. 00 -____$ 3,307.00 Cost of Seeding. Seed' ............81,750.00 011 ............... 182.00 Labdri.............130.00 Board............. 30.00 - ~Cost of Cutting. 2020 Labor...........$S 528.00 Oil............... 229.00 Board ............. 144.00 8-____$ 901.00 Cast of Tbreshing. Labor and Team Wark ..........$2,545.00 011 ............... 367.00 Board.............. 473.00 Ilorse Feed .........110.00 $ 3,4Q5. 00 Cost of Haullng. - Labor...........$S284.00 011 ............... 146.00 -S 430.00 thubrtirewis or..360 Incientais.........5600.0 Incidetals ....... 500-0 860.00 Total..............11,085.00 The samne autflt broke one thousand acres more the same season. The cost of tbis work la not ineluded lu the statement. The total yield was 32,000- bu. of flax, which brought $48,000 at the elevator. Kerosene coat 13c. per gallon and gasoline 17c. These pricea are below the price of ail sud gasoline lu this country but the ail la a law grade ou which some engmnes, it la claimed, do excellent work. Wth such facilities for doing culi- vation and ail work in bandlilg a crop at such a price, surely no excuse remâins for insufficient tillage or sloppy work in raising flax or wheat. Co-operatian lu au autfit, as for thresb- ing, would Le most advsntageous in the way of getting wark doue econamicallY; anud the barse, which is not superseded, by any means, yet, will be leas frequéntly cailed upon, minus bide and hair, ta L1'each bis devated siats on aur geutly undulsting landscape. His lot bas often been a bard ane, whien big drap returna enabled bis own- er ta replace him witbout fluancial jolt when Le died. Relieved of the worst of the work bis usefuiness will Le rather enhanced. in grateful remembrauce of bis more un- fortunate brathers, wbo have passed into oblivion by the sacrificial route, may bis presenit master make his lot a little easiel' and give the reý:pect past devotion bag r i c b ly e a m e d . -m e a s b n This co-operation sehemebsbe successfully carried out lu Texas and else- where. Experienced engineers are eni- ployed, firat-clasa blacksmitb's camp witb the outfit ta repair machinery and sharpen shares; and every department la handled on the most up-to-date business methads. 'Private\" Jobn Allen says that au aid darky preaý'ièYin Mississippi was recently approached by a deacon in the chureb, wbo desired ta gain the reverend gentie- man's consent ta his daugbter's marriage witb bim. the deacan. \"I doan' kçnow 'bout dis,\"1 said tbe preacher, dubiously. \"You ain't steh s yaung man, deacon. I ain't shore dat you klu support mab chile!\" 1 The deacan Lridled. \"Dere won't Le no trouble 'bout dat, sab!\" bec asserted, warmly. \"I kin support ber ail right!\" The minister reflected -for a moment. \"Ras yau cher seen my Chlae cat?\" le finally asked. \"I bas, sah!\" came fromn the suitor. \"But, sah!\" exclaimed the aId preachery impressively, \"bam yau cher seen ber est when nobody was a-watcbing ber?\" roj noi ne' Mo be .1 a l'VI 1\u003c wit] rooi paM twin retui me 3 men, prop geti Win, Se Ln thosn seats as Cil the 1 artie retai mnin damr and show ia.st, înidd y'OUII The onIt en\\\"\" hait Var. fi * t 4 r",
         "The Western Home Mon thly * 3a Lady Fairy Frock Written for The Western Home Montbly by W. R. Gilbert A\"demanded Sir Rger An- nesly, \"your godfatber?\" \" You are, sir.\" \"H1ave I ever done anything for yau?\"I 'You gaveA a silver mug, 1 believe,\" replied the young man. 'Well, I'm going to do'somnething for you.now-I'm going to eend yau to the memide for two weeks. It'll cost yau nothing, and save the expense of a nervoutreakdown.\" The boy, lie was littie more, lifted hie tfrd white face, \"You are very kmnd, meest kind but -\" \"Stufi!\" blusbed Sir Roger. \"'Stuif, I'm proud oýf my. son-I suppose 1 casi be proud of yoy.i I like! Hleaven knows I amn asliamd enougli of my own son., I've heard lots of people .talking about y our articles in the 'Post'-They ail say Vou'Il make a great naine for yourself. Your room is booked at the Grand H-otel.\" \"le it-er-swel?\" \"lIt'e solid and coinfortable, and the food - w excellent-excellent!\" eaid Sir Roger with empliasis. \"I liave engaged two rooms, I suppose your dress suit isn't i pawn?\"Y proud clear cur, curve oý moutli and clin- elie was the acmc of good taste. and she 'cliallenged instant attention. \"We cal liher Lady Fairy Frock liere\" volunteercd a 'young man next ta Roger. \"Isn't she ascrcam?\" \"Very attractive,\" Roger answercd nonclialantly. 1 She belonged to a type, a clase to which lie was a stranger. Shle aeemed to draw lier cbarm from th~e sunny side of life, where one dreamcd and-did no work. He was on tlie ahady side, the aide where men jostled ecd other, filled witli fierce endeavor, the lust of battie, wliere men liad great visions, did great deeds, made hideous failures, and ênt under; their ways lay far apart. e Oncêkor twice ber cye met Roger's- she made one or two attempte to draw liim into general conversation but lie refused to be drawn; their ways lay fax apart. After lunch she disappearcd. Rie watched lier go, out of the tai] of is eyc, and then lic went and sat on the beach, revelling in tlie sea and the liot sun. lie told himself lie was liungry, it was the sea air,.fHe wasn't liungry a bit, he neyer botherei about afternoopi tea, but :L great f re. ;\"front.\" r, stronger, ecoilomieal. re far hand- ie that is a ward move- der marvel. of cost of land, crop- hauling to done under able candi- possibilities -$3,307.00 2,092.00 901.00 $3,495.00 -S 430.00 -$ 860.00 .$811,085.00 ie thouaand The cost of .e atatement. bu. of flax, he elevator. and gasoline the price of y buit the oil engines, it ia doing culti- ng a crop at remâins for )rk in raising s for thresh- meous in the onomic lY; perseded, by i frequènt1l y i'mdulating been a hard d)ed bis own- -ial joit when t of the work ýr enhanced. uis more un- passed into ite, n2ay hie b littie casier [evation hag lias been ,cas and else- ýrs are cm- s camp with and sharpen t is handled ess methods. that an old was reccfltlY the cliurcb, ýrend gentie- ,r's marn1age \" said the ain't sicli a t shiore dat ire won't be he asserted, ail right!\" a moment. Lac eat?\" he Llie suitor. )Id preachery seen ber cst g her?\" \"No,\" said the young man, eyes twinklng, \" You sec IVve bccn doing jolly well lately.\" \"You've been ovcrworking,\" sharply returncd bis godfatier. \"Tlie doctor told me you liad been doing tlie work of tiree men., What you want is proper food at proper hours, ozone and rcst-and you'll get it at the Grand; it faces tic sc-\"ý \"You'rc awfully good, sir,\" said Roger Winch,and so the matter was scttlèd. So ioger Winch, pale, keen, tired, Roger Winchi witli hie grave sedate face hu is brilliant masterful eyes, found himscif a week later at lunch at tic Grand; those keen, critical cyes \"rnlacing\" the visitons one by one as tlicy took their seats. Miss Arford wae firet, a spinster known as \"Výinegar,\" Colonel Mallot ana family, tic Rennet girls with their prctty aunt- artless silly littie things, a fat widow wlio rctained a good complexion and matri- moônial hopes, two young men with dawnng appreciation of tic Rennet g is, and a Înretty taste in soeks-whicb they siowej, and there were others. He placed them ail, and then came two, last (dI, ta enter the big dining room, am(Ii îeýe he could'not place-6nc was ITI(rl -tadand fat and tlie other was9 :Ol2 lid ost undeniably distinguished- The -s of evcry man in the room rested oflh, ý'%ith pIasure -xen the four stolid --ii-and1 those of every woman with en V'' SI ore a dress of plain white serge, In- rIiiisitely eut and on lier red-brown bait '1f (, at a chic angle a white Dolly har. 'r bd elow this came' her creamy ' e, vclvcty honcst lrow'n ecthe lie told himsclf the doctor liad told him to fced up; but in lis lieart heékncev that lie came back for the pîcasure of Eccing Lady Fairy Frock. Tea was served in tlie cool green lounge and slie was there, and lie could'see the red glory of lier liair. She worc a simple white muslil frock-was it simple?--or was it the most subtle thing lie lad ever scen a woman in? As be entercd slie was saying: \"Then you will try my Gcaring and Gloom? I will give you a personal recommenO'ation to tlieir mercy. Yes, 1 get ail my lathes therc-and my liats!\" And the widow was saying-: \"Do yci really think they can turn mc out as tlic3 do you?\" And the soft gay voice said, \"I am surë tliey could.\" Sic looked up sliarply as Rager ýen- tered, and he saw sometbing flash into lier eyes and away again, something tliat lad nothing to do with the briglit and carelcs side of life. That cvening tlie aid Colonel took lier witb bis meck littie wife to a military reception. Slie wore a cloud-blue gown, and out of it rose the mystic sweetness of her arma and neck. A littlc buzz of ad- miration surged round lier a8shae waited in the hall for lier escort's car. \"You look too, ducky for anything, s3aid ane of the little Rennet girls, in'a burs of spantaneous worship. \"There's a letter for yau, sir,\" whispr\"i one ofitlie waiters at Roger's elbaw. He took it from tlie salven. It was9 the aceeptance of bis flrst novel liv a well-known publisher, who made him a flattering offer PAGES FIROM OUR BRIDE'S BOOK A PRETTY RECORD OF THE WEDDING CEREMONY AND HAPPY RONBYMOON DAYS We issue ths book especizlly for those who have Just ibeen married, p' and wish to keep, in an attractive way, a bni histary of their wedding and honeynioon experience. But it is flot aione to themn that it ia of interest. One gentleman, to wham we had given ane in our store, came in the day foiiowing and said: \"We've been married twclve ycars; but. do you know, my wife and 1 had just as joliy a dîne iast cvening as we ever had, filling in the pages of the littie book you gave me, It's al there naw, the record oi our whole trip, and n'y wife bas it ail bced up in ribbons and put away so our littie girl a have it when ahe grava Up.\" Wauld it please you? We_ will send you a copy of this book at once and free cf charge, except for a two-tent stanlp ta caver postage, if yau wyul aend us yaur name and addres.- D. R. -DINGWALL Limited JEWELLERS and PORTAGE AVE ,SILVERSMITHS WINNIPEG, Man. rhe Monarch Wingold Steel Ra\u0026nge THE ÉINQE WnTOw ilAFAULTI iacvn le onstme. IÊM' MW monarch of \u0026IL mm sl om. 15\u003e1!!M oL T aWuâsJiworked outuV«w7 ment hbla eeiombtasdla ILEAM b. bul.dina afi lb.àdrtni L ifrUrWingaid te mae1 the ANCR 1« o ntm ldurable tbho ocon. PT h\u0026 venlent, the iado nl TOMM mavuappearace, and the ot 08econamml in thelb.oonsmp- lion of fuel £niu Ut I\u0026M U.rasageon 8END alu FOR Sol prd e FREE m\u0026os CATALOQ Igue pelid\" ud e et OiT Stéed Range..Mx el i Hol«. liise . en\"\" Ctmmu, sumo \".- I4aidorSoItCeeI boardl. ASSONor Wood -C9. S. covifI.fua ished free with each range. Polished top requires na bWakleading. ]FIEEBOX is wei-proportioned. It has aur three-piece fire-back. Equipp.d wth Dupiez Grates whieh are uscd for eithen lbard on soit coal or wood. O'ýENIl PEEWCTLY SQUARE anid ha@ ,emovable inside yack. A Puafet »akso. size 20x20 inches. TE EEVEE8IBL COPPENREIEEVOIA fits either right or left end of range. Cap«- city, 12 galons. 13HIBCLOSET lbas full nickied drop pattern door whieh drape fanvard when opened form. ing a.wide sheif. Shipping weight, 5751lbs. -8c os it 4â- 76 Extra heavy smnoih nickle tr-mings, complote mith aven thermameter. WUNGOLB STOVE CO., I MI.NNMARIE 6 0110 HNOME FOR CHRISTMA.. - On aeeount of the velrs limited trasîs-AtIantic steamaships in ser- vce, you should take an early opportunity of nsaking full oerange- mients for yotir trip wjth a Grand Truîik Pacifie Railway Agent, wbo 33 (an ticket you via anv route to port of embarkation, and over any \u003eteamship line hiaving a passenger service. Enquire as to rates, route~s, reservatinns, etc., f rom amy e Grand Trunk Pacifie Agent. Cit PHoNE\"M.2826, Union Depot.I IlIl Il IlI I I il Ii 11 il Ili 11111 1! Il Il Il Il Il I l iIl Il Il Il Il IF11IIi i'IU iliilIIIIIIIIIIIlIUtlII ..,, f ,'~' 'I I In the Trenches of the. French in the. Argonne.e A group of Frencli soidiens weaing their new helmnets, 1h aonc oi the buliet-proof trenches in the Argonne.",
         "Sv/~ The Westerik Home -Monthi y *Hakdsome Russian Stole Made of lus- trous black Mani churian Wolf. A durabilty a n d warmth, with long silky hafr-iooks much more ex- pensive than price would indicàte. Trhe collar i:; extra wid., measuring about 8 inches. deep in àhe back. finisbed at each end with a bead, two. paws and a Est'd arn full bushy tail. Est'd.Lined with good Xý4lity gauýnteed Satin. A truly remark- ,able fur vaine. 'Postage pald .....................5J Extra large Pillow MuEf of fine, fustrous -Manchurian Wolf to match. Mnff is made over a soft, warm bcd and is lined with * good quality Satin, Measnres 'about 18 inches in width. Hfas pretty shirred Satin ends. Black only.,\u00269 Postage pad ........... Spedal price for above set. )Postage pid ................. ......5 Write fer Catalogue Te-day te Dept. A WC PAY POSTAGE OR EXPRESS rm^jtoz$. TO YOUR TOWN. 452 MAIN STREET WINNIPEG 1«I'm goini to cali at Goaring and Gloom's, and order a loak and dres to- morrow,\" cried the widow decisively. *Mother ha promised that I shall have n£ýy.comiffgout dross from them,\" voiùn- teered the eider Miss Ronnot. i Roger Iooked up. In the cyes of Lady Fairy Frock ho saw a vague subtie triumph, a sense of something accom-' plished, a satisfaction emallor, but of the sanie kind as the triumph wbich blazed in bis own over the acceptance of his novel. He could not understand it. It didn't belong to the sunny easy side of if e at ail.. The next moment, a whirl of blue and wine color, the hint of a smile fiung at i1m, and she. was gone. Ho wont to bis own room. Somehow bp feit elated, gloriously glad of bis luck. Ho was glad of that fleeting amile. H1e met her next morning, swimming at the baths. 11cr magnificent hair was côiied round ber small head, she wore a black* satin bathing dress long black stockings, and absurd, deligltful lace-up bathing boots., She swam well; while he was a master of the art. They walked bàck to breakfast together. \"And what do you do with yourself?\" sbe demanded ii ber j olhy friendly way. \"I work,\" he said. \"I'm a poor and struggling novelist, and you\"-his eyes were very kind-\" you play in the sunshine and enjoy 1 f e-as you were meant to \"I1 wonder why you tbink that?\" He glaicod at ber long bine $'lanket coat, ber expen;ive littie bine bat. lier eyes followcd and read bis. \"Ob, 1 sec,\" she said, and lauglied a quick odid little laugh -Tbat afternoon be asked ber to go Io tea with him on the Parade. lie biad long ago found that the fat litt le lady,, h accompanied Lady Fairy Frock, wliser companion and. friend, so bl ised both. -Tbe companion wvas going outf fo f va, so Lady Fairy Frock and he bad f ea :ilone, and of course to bim she looked hx'!ilv. After dinnor he spent the evening alInn' calling himself ail kinds of fools for heinga fool in love. 1\"11cr shocs alone,\" be groused miis- Do* MOT OVERLOOK SPECIAL REIIICED. RATES1 TO THE PANAMA PACIFIO EXPOSITIONS There îýc only two more xnonths in whicl t- special concessions are - available.. \"The trip of the century\" is viait he Grand Trunk Pacifie combined railway and boat route. The unsurpassed \"Yellowhead P ass\" - through the Rocky Mountains at their bét-\"Mount Robson' (13,700 feet), Mount Geikde, etc., follow- cd by the\u0026ivonderful scenic \"Fraser\" and \"Skeena\" rivers. Also a 700 mile ocean voyýge ini palatial steaemers (meals and berth included.) PARLOR OBSERVATION -CARS THROUGH THE MOUNTAINS Leave Winnipeg 6 p.m ............... Sun., Tues., Frid. Arrive Jasper (Park), 8.50 a.m...Tues., Thurs., Sun. Arrive Mount Robson 9.55 a. mi. ...... Tues., Thurs., Sun. Arrive Prince Rupert 6.15 p.mn ......... Wýd., Frid., Mon. Through Sleepers, Diners, Coache s. Ail electric lighted. Tourist 2 car f rom Winnipeg every Tuesday and fromn Edmonton every Wednes- day. Rates, reservotions, bookiets, tickets, etc., irom any Grand - Truk Pacfic Aency PHoNE,-M.5378, 260 Portage Avenue. - CityOffcesPHoNE-M.2826, Union Depot. erably, \"would swahlow up my income.\" A littie exaggerated, this perbeps. -The Colonel and family having departed a rici American widow and ber daughter camne in their place. Tbe next day at dinner, the mother sat next to Rortr. \"Please tell,\" she commanded almost at once, \"1who is that girl over tbere in the red gown. Sbe's just tbe choicést, dinkiest sight I've bappened on.\" \".Her nainé la Miss Florence West, but eeyne %call lier 'Lady Fairy Frock' '«And I uess she la some, l'Il get bier dressmake snamne, if I bust up in thej attemptt!\" One day Ronger spent on the cliffs witb urlittle beroine, an absurdly happy di6y, juat fiHled witb talk, long silences, charged witb mutual understanding. They bad huncb at tbe ittle hotel, at one of tbe littie white tables, watching tbe cioud sbadows gliding over tbeehils, and tbey a ed back in the evening, and in the oo_ gen hounge she tnrned to bim. \"It bas been sucli a pheasant day.\" \"It bas been great for me,\" be answered sincerely. \"It seems tonas if--\" Hia. eyes feil on lier dress, blue skirt, blue suede sboes and bine silk jersey. \"It bas been deligbtful,\" hoe said in quite another tone, \"Thank you a tbousand times,\" and so eft her. Lady Fairy Frock hooked at ber little suede shoes, at bier blue skirt and bier lips -quivered. Poor Roger, ho was sick of the seaside, and yet hoe did not want to leave. Ho knew it was joily for a young novelist to ýiae love to a girl who dressed like a fairy princess; and y et it was the maddçst sweotest, dearest foily lho bad over known. If only hoe might take his princess in bis arma and lift ber-ont of this luxury, to share life witb bim, to wrap bier in the finm warmi consciouness of bis love, that she migbt nover miss the sof t feel of the. silks and satins, to be-jewel ber with such tenderness and caro, that sho migbt nover miss -the jewèls that bad been hors Theae. were bis dreams. But hoe know that if e was not liko dreams. Ho took bier to see the old Castie, and in contrast, the caretakor's ittie cottage. She lovod the latter. \"I could bo so happy in a little place like tbat,\" she criod softly. \"The Castle would be more suitablo for you,\" lho told lber. She looked at him, and bier face sud denhy grew white. \"Oh, you don't understand!\" she said voemontly, \"you don't nnderstand.\" Tbat nigbt she hardly spoke to iim at dinnor. Sbe wore a pale green satin dress, wbicb seomod to onhance the sad-. ness in ber oyes. He would bave gven ail lie possessNl to be allowed to kiss tbat sadness from tbem, but he looked at ber gown and bardencd himself, wondering wbat it had cost. The next morning, a radiant morning of turquoisa and gold, Lady Fairy Frock and companion came in late to breakfast. There was a btter for ber in a business envelope and be saw her glance at it, read it, go very whito, smile an odd twited amile, band it to bier companion, and leave the table. A minute after sho passed the window, going in the direction of the clitTs. Hl, rose and folowed lier. There were very few people about, lie followed bier at a distance. By and by she stopped abruptly, flung bersolf down on the short grass, staring down at thesea. Ho went and sat down beside ber. \"«I hope I didn't scare you,\" be said anxiously. \"You seemcd worried, and I came to ask if you wouldn't spend another day up bore and let the wind blow your worries away.\" \" You are vcry good, but I'm afraid 1 'can't. I bave to pack.\" \" Are you going home?\" \"Oh, no, back to the-the-the sbop. 1 haven't any home or peoplIe.\" \" The sbop?\" There was an odd thrill of relief, or was it actual gladness in bis voice. \"WMhy yes. You sec in a sort of walking advertisemcnt for Cearing and C oom. They pay us to stay at biotels and d oarding bouses, and, .(,neomen d iLem ais dressmakers. It was allIoom's ideas. Ile thougbt it wouuld bring the firîn lots of t rade-people tbey eotiikn't 1',t iinth(, ordinarv way. I use\u003c1 fo Le in flci i 1owvrooms,'' Fhe ent on, ''lait f bey iale nie the ofTer and packed mie off with The Sacrifice (The folhowing Unes appear in the London Spetator, to the xnemory of d'A.B.V.,\" by \"R.V.,\" probably a sister.) III bow my heail, O brother, brother, brother, But xnay not grudge you thaf were Ail to me. Sliould any one lament wlien this our mother Mourns for so many sons on land and * sea? Cod of the love that makes two lives as one Give also strength to sec that England's will ho done. 1 Let it ho donc, yea, down to the hast tittie, Up to the fulness of ail sacrifice. Our dcad fcared this alone-to give too little. Thon shall the living murmur at the price? The hiands withdrawn fromn ours to grasp the plow Would sufrer only if the furrow faltered Know, feliow.inourners-be our cross too grievous That one Nvho sealed our symbol with His blood Vouebsafes the vision that shall nover ]cave us; Those humble crosses in Élie Flanders inud. And tbinl( there restsa al-halloxvOd in each grave A life given freeiy for the world Hie died to save. And, far ahcad, dirn tramping genera- t ions, WTho neyer felt and cannot guess oUr pain, -Thougli history count nothing less tlian nations, And faine forget whe.e grass lias growNv agan- Shial yet romnembér that the world is free It.is enough, for this is immortality.\" \"Corné home an' lek 'super wid me, Flanrigan,\" said 9;-. Branniigan to his companion. \"Shure,\" replied the eornpan- îon, \"it's past yer supper time, 10w; yer wife'll ho mad as a hatter.\" \"Tbat's jit it,\" replied Brannigan; \"she can't bl, the two of us.\" t c I c c t t c i c c f s' a lot of their now rnodols to wear--of course Miss Willow-my chaperone-and mysoîf bave bad a lovehy time, but the firm isn't satisfiod with the resuits. It isn't my fauit. I've worked bard enougb, but many of the pehwo said they woubd go to Geejng and Gloom, went back on me, and _\u003ey \"And so? \" be d \"anded rapturoushy. 'insorry 1in akFay. You 500 people thougbt I was ' \"By Jove, theydid,\" bie aughed ex- 'ltat'y*.1\" I did. I didn't dare-the por nove ist and the fairy frock princess. Dear, dare I now? Could you possibhlr bear not to bave ail those bovely frocks?' Her eyes wero wet, but near bis own; bier lips wero quivering but invitingly near bis own. 14Silhy boy,\" sho wbispered. \"If al the dresses bad beon mine, and a tbousand more too, 1- 1-\"1 \"ýSihly girl!',' Oh, the blessed, bbcssed relief,. \"Silly things. Silhy things,\" shrieked the sca gulis, whccling and curving, snowy and silver against the turquoise sea bcbow. \"Sibly things! Silly things!\" New Manager for Doherty Pianos. Mr. Roland C. Willis, wli'o lias boon thle Dolerty Piano Co.'s ropresentativo in Ontario for the past five years. bas been transferrod to Winnipeg. Mr. Wiilis lias been made manager of the Winnipegr br,.nch with Manitoba and Saskatehiewaa' torritory under bis supervision, and as ho bas been in the piano business since boyhood, lie is thîoroughly familiar with bis task, and can bo reiied upon as on1e of the most capable of local managers. Our readers are invited to get ac- quainted with Mr. Willis, and wc have pleasiire in introducing him to theni in thîs -Way. An Appetite \"Wrell, my man,\"' said the visiting physi. cian of a Dublin Infirmnary to a patient, \"how (Io you feel this morning?\" iiPurty, weli, sur,\"w-as the rcply. \"That's rigbt. I hope you like the place?\" \"Indeed and I do suir!\" said the man. \"There's only wan thing wrong' in this establishment, and that is 1 only get as mueh mate as wud feed a /iarw \"'Oh, vou are getting your ap- Petite, are ýo? said the doctor. \"Thon F'il order an egg to be sent up to you.\"1 \"Arrah, (octor,\" rejoinod the patient, ilwouild '-ou Le so kind as tb tell thim at tbe srame limie to sin(l me nip the in that laid iC?\"",
         "The 1114Stern Home Tifonthly. Boy! Boy!1 Buffaloes -out on the Plains. Written for The Western Home Monthly by J. D. A. Evans. FSl ms la are itains \u003elow - a 700 Durist 2 Bdnes- rand enue. 'ar in the inemory of r a sister.) r, larother, thaf were n this our mn land and nakes two t Englan\u003cl's to the last j6 yOY! Boy! Buffaloes out 011 the .B plainsl1\" 1 Sucli were words heard by the factor, hie clerk, and sundry custonrers in the store at Fort Garry, on an October ni6rning in the long, long ago. The st tement buffalo were on the plains emanated from an Indian, to whom the information hoed been given by two men just arrived from the Assiniboiue in the vicinity of Portage la Prairie. In a few-, minutes the meaning of the Indians words was made clear; men were rush- lng to the river bank and rear of the store, to make preparations for the chase. It ma~y be remarked the expression \"'Boy!\" is always adopted by an Indian, that aborigine speaking to any white man, ivhether priest or prelate, million- aire or mendicant. On a Sunday afteiýoon in March Iast, the writcr was walking along the road- way on the eastern side of Red River toward St. Norbert. From the churcl? of that village on the picturesque siopes of La Salle, came the sound of a bell, ah! as in years ago when scattered populace along Red River's strenm were callcd together to worship after the fashion of their foreparents. In a Mani- toba of passed years, many 'èhapters of historical recor~d have been chronicled-at St. Norbert, wherein to-day street car f rom Winnipeg rushes along, Red River cart and dog train forgotten in the abyss of years. At a cottage in proximity to the main thoroughfare from Norwood, through St. Vital to St. Norbert, dwelle a man now at the threshold of that journey into distant unknown, inevitable terminus of human if e. During the afternoon, the writer liad conversed with severoel resi- dents of the localities. Indeed, at this date, the twehtieth day o! Mardi a cer- tain intense interest was the prevailing topic of conversation. At St. Norbert was presumed to be existent, a huge deposit of coal oul, boring operations for which would be inaugurated the moru- ing following. Excitement was terse, mnrvellous developments anticipated; visions of ivealth and golden dreams apparently were haunting the residents of the riverside. But at one humble cottage into which the writer was invited, an aged occupant arose from his couch, and with old- fashioned Red River hospitality, ex- tendcd a welcome. Upon a wal~ of the rooni into which the visitor ws shered, was hanging a musket of somewhat curions description. The butt of this weapon woes éngraven with marks which. in years of early day Manitoba, would be délineatory of the prowess made by the owner of the firearm in the chase for buffalo and moose. \"You appear to be enjoying good health and retain your wonderful age well,\" rema'rked the writer ta lis nonagenarian host, at that moment fil1- ing a pipe. A few years only wilI pass ere this man born on Red River bank, wiil have mnerited entrance into decade necessar-y,,for eligibility into ranks of centenarjanism. \"I try to,\"1 was the reply. 'Teople in Manitoba years ago lived according5 to ways my great grandchild wvas reading to me about a few evenings ago. Whcre is that'paper, my dear ?\" l'le girl walkcd to a shelf, handed the visiter a newspaper containing an article enitled \"Simple life.\" It is safe to assumne sucli method of living formed the cuistoînarv mode in vogue by Maaitoas iiiaiiitants of decades.passed by . The pl'i 'deal condition of the yct remaiînflg nid -time population,,,is corroborative of 1 alwavs led an ouïtdoor life,\" said the üld ian. \"Nowadays every ono r'ides, \\\\u~dto walk.' If people aroIÏIý(1 livre ~Vitto get into Winnipeg,' thev cross' the ri' r and take the street car. We alwa s v li1ýed uniess it xas a very long dis- t;-e,; then we used ponies.\" e At tîîis moment a motor car wh%1izze th le cottage. This happening drew souglit out by the bison for grazing- places. \"Several Indians were in the store getting supplies for - winter, trapping. Father asked if they were going out to hunt, as late ini the Fall many families were usually out of pemmican. The fellows just pickedi up their things, and told the clerk they would return, then hurried off to teepees on the river bank over in St. Boniface to make ready and start out. As they were going out of the store, father told them lie and other men were going, 8o one of the Indiana said, \"Ail riglit, boy, *e go get ready.\" Some men were ll1shig with a net on the river; father yefled to theýu buffalo were out on tfie plainse\u003e and told them to hury up. We, With other men got our poniee, whlch' were hobbléd, on the ground behlnd- the, store, and mounted. e rode along the Portage trail, that in what people eaul Portage avenue now, to Sturgeon Creek,- then turned 1a mile or so north, alterwards keepinq In a westerly direction. I thlnk nine men were with our party; the Indians were some distance behind us.. We rode about FOR THE This handsame Fur t eBo cnain a 34 pues of ilustrations) of beautiful Furs \u0026 Fur Garments We are the largeat cashbayersof Raw FursiluCanada. purf- chashie gdirectfo h rPper. Thls.gveus an unrivilled rt IMunit t select the ver; finest skins ta manufacture rect juta desirable Furs and Fur Garments thus savlng the dlemen s profits sud eabling us, under aur polcy af sellins I;'ro Trapper to Wearer to supply the cholceat Fur Sets snd Garments at marvelously l Ev''lery ltransaction with us is backed by aur thlt es experience in the fur trade. aur paid-up capital aiof 000 and the largest organizatian of its kind an Canada. This la why we can unhesitatingly send out every sarment under the follawiug GUARANTEE * WE GUAIAKTE TO SATISFYr YOU 01 EEFUND TOUE NONET19 Write ta-day for this beautiful Fur Style Book. It will show you how ta save many dollars. RA W FURS We au Zgk prée for Ri» Fun. Wf le for GUNS, We ~ rcan nlidta comfle 11e*W n. r5.al hll - IaIang adWe , a poltok a uplies. g4, a nimal bFo it. fuig akljorm às- E.Caaoo r MAIL ORDER DIPT U 1 FRONT rSTr. EAsT TQRONTO r. fi omn the nonagenaria'n the remark, people werq rushing to t'le cemetery at a suffiiently high rate of speed, \\, ith- out the assrstance of what he made reference to as \"new fanglcd contriv- ances.\" \"That ls a splendid sample of skin,\" remarked the, writer, pointing to a buffalo robe upon the coucli. \"That's a good peit yet,\"I responded the old maen, as lie picked up the skin. \"My father killcd this buffalô at Stony Monntain; the pelt hbas been in our family ever since I can remember. You won't find many skins in these ycars; they ail appear to bie gone.\" \"HçLve you ever chased l4uffalo in the carly days?'\" queried the writer. At this question the old man immediotely ap- peared enthused; perchance a long silenced chord of the- early years had been struck, would now vibrate again. He walked to. a cupboard, produced a tin box containing a bookiet in which was chronicled the date of hie morriage and birthdays of the children. \u0026 \"Yeg. I can tell you of a buffa lo hunt I remember. Only last Sundgy an old man living near St. Andrews was here, and we. were talking about it.\" \"lHow many years ago was thot chase you are speaking of V' asked the writer. \"I arn just going to show you, that is why I have brought this,\" pointing to the hookiet. \"It was before I was mar- ried though several years,*and here'is the date of my wedding, in 1846.\" \"Along with fother I had ridden to the store at Fort Garry. The time of year was October, at least 1 know the crop of potatoes along the river had been picked, and this was generally the time of year we did that -work. We were standing inside the store, and two en who had just got down f rom Lake Manitoba, they Iived at St. Laurent, drove up in a cart. They stood outside talking with an Indien who, ail of a sudden, ran into the- store yelling out, \"Boy! Boy! Buffaloes out on the plain!\" Father asked the Neche where the- animais had been seen. He said they were feeding about thirty-five miles westward from the Fort, d- A momentary interruption occurred' by the wriýer remarking the district alluded to woufll lay between Meadows and Marquette, on the main line to-day of the Canadian Pacifle Railway. The localities mentioned were districts cele- brated for tibundance of grass, which the nonagenarian stated were naturally icrif1ce., to give mur at om ours to ow faltered ollr cr055 ymbol witli shail neyer rie Flanders tl-alowed drd Fie died ing genera- L guess our ng less than grass lias L tle world riortality.' er wid me, igan te his thc eompan- e, nomw; yer \"That s jist an't bl the",
         "The Weitern Homie Monthly a i6nr hoiurs, then- came to a knoll, when we,,dismounted. Two of our .men went te the. top of- this knoll te bave a look out; th- wccn camie back as nothing much coud h udn, for there was a bluff in the way, A few minutes later, the Indàians arrived, told everybody to lay Io*, because if the buffalo caught a glance of 'us, thcy would toar awoey at once. One of the Neches waikcd teward the bluff;, when ho roturncd, he said thousands of buffalo were foeding about a mile away, that thore Would be a geeod shoot and plent--f pemimican. We then mounted the horses to ride toward- the edge of the. bluff. ýAs the Indian had teld us, moat cf the buffaloea were cat- i g grass; some wcre laying down. I suppose. these herds must bav~ corne from the south, perltaps around Rosscau ]River, and were heading for the country between the two lakes, Wi nipeg and Manitoba. As wo waikcd around the bluff, one of the men toid -'us to wSik steady and each pick out an animal and shoot, then niake a great yciiing te clear the her ds away. Our rnuskcts were loadcd with heavy bail; we shet, thon yellcd; the buffalees we had aimed, at iay on the ground kicking, alI the rest cemmenced te run off.ý The plains soemed te be trembiing; the sound tbey mnade was juat like thunder. Wc shot quite a number; one or two cf the men xrnisscd. We skinned the animais and eut off meat; then we camped for tîhe rest of the day and niglit in the bluff,i ex peting more buffalees miglit corne by,] biut they did not. The next merning we1 returncd tg, Fort Garry ond showed tiesi factor the . okins. These werc net in good condition; pelts are se in the cold of winter when they are good for dress- ing, because the hair is long and fluffy at that tilne. We were satisficd; lots of fresh meat was got, and the Indians, lie ourselves, were mighty glad.\" \"Apparentiy, whenever buffalo wero disturbed, these animieis would rush away and continue running xnany miles,\" asked the writer? .\"That was the usual way%. But whcn Indians and oid hunters went eut on a reguiar dbase,. they would kecp fellowing the tracks, it'didn't matter how many miles, until they couid catch up with sorne cf the bord.\" \"Was buffalo .hunting very danger- eus t\" forrned the next question of the writor, who had heard Indians dlaim the sport as fraught with mishaps. \"Indians are Indians, and aiways were. They wore geod, aiways good tat the job,- until they get excited, or were mounted on penies which wer'nt used te tbe work. Such herses as those weuld get badiy frightened the first time, pitch a man off or roil witb bhi No mnan wanted te get oxcited; that was aiways the fault with!yeiiing Neches, and sorne ef the whites tee, after a few ef the buffalees had been shet dewn. 0f course wu wouid yeil ourseives if we wirnted te cIege a herd righlt off se as te get liold cf any wounded enes.\" In a fewv districts adjacent te Win- nipeg, tliere are yet visible on the prairies, old buffalo \"paths.\" As exarn- pics, t1e Iocality of Stony Mouintain; aise viciiiity of iWest Seikiîak, such. runs v Ths ~aefairweatber- ým acle Na t.r Caa do Ra«coýon Sacque ~~4bIpedcarryng pC'epad. If not nom on -arrivai, reti Itour ,expense aad oneycheerfully An «Woelent. fuil length Co\" -for-iig. Made, saish mon'a ne etstyle- bdlY oui igvgade guar- utet of long sevce, material àÏd woekanship. You take no Ïsk i ordering furs through oui mail order department. Ve.ftIIa tt.Satiafy Yom WRITE FOR OUR,,, 1915-16 CATALOGUE Beautifufly moeutmted with 192 auto from living modela otting forth the latent ln fur foohiona for thodoe(tpen'awmo' n oildrena fur. along wth prices. les free. TEADE NO BETER 1 FUES THAN FAIRWEATHERS Faliweatheans.,Limite 299 Portage Avenue TORONTO WINNIPEG MONTRRAL. How to Play the Piano or Organ in One Hour A Detroit milsican lias invented a ncw method bY w1lich any littie y1iild or gror n I)erson can learn t9 play in one lour in thecir own home. Thre/sct ilkse.nt aIs) l'tely free to aniïperson add(res.itg a postal card to A. S. Keller, 969A 'irs.l(oncrete Idg., Detroit, M\\icliga.-Adveiti-emlent. are observable. The writer has noticed sc'veral pathways between Beigen and Rosser.- \"My father said any ordinary buffalo could leap ton (cet if- anything was in the way,\"1 was the verdict of the non-agenarian when asked. concernin,, the staternent a bison was adept at jumpYing. \"The buffalo,\" hie continued, \"which are kept for show nowadays, haven't the wild nature about them, and thcy are very much amalier ini size. I have scen bulI buffaloes which wouJdkweigh a lot over a ton.\" - \"I suppose you have travelled, many miles when out hunting them,\" asked the. visitor. \"Many, many. We would hewr fromn Indiana or.others at the Fort, the ani- nmais were around, perbaps at Lake Manitoba or seme other place. I've scen plonty of them a 'f ew miles from here, down the river at St. Agathe?' \"Plenty of garne in your earlyday, remarked the writc r, who liad gleaned from the oid rman's inteiesting conversa- tion, hie was one of the few rernaining inhabitants of early day. Manitoba, 'willing to converse an' i'*sclose inform- ation concerning old tirnes in4-he colony. .\"Gamne! Pienty of- it.\" He lwlughcd. \"You should have scen what there was when I was a boy. One time I saw a black wolf an Indian caught ini a trap down at the Point.\" Ho was rnaking reference to the locaiity now known es Union Point on the Red River. \"No; I nover saw a black woif since. I've heard trappers say there were only veiy odd, ones. away in the north, and c'-uld not undcrstand how one came to be wandering down this way.\" The conversation turned to mernories of days in old St. Boniface, a. d 'of Bishop Provencher, whom the oid mwn wcll remembers not alone as a spiritual adviscr, rather the fri-nd v-vceryone in the colony, whether adherent of his communion or the contrary. To-day, the prnia thorouglifare in the city of the b 1atif sc edral and ecciesiastical buildings, is namcd oefter Provencher, Pioncer and pathllnAîàr. Neither bas the nonagenarian's mcm- ory forgotten the Rev. Fr. Ritchot, of St. Norbert, hie whose long ycars of work in that riverside village, is per- petuated by the handsome church ereeted by bum. The namne of the municipality in which St. Norbert is situate, is known as Ritchot. \"The bell at the monastery is ýinging, gratndfather,\" said a young weman as she entered the cottage. \"It's just seven o'clock.\" Threugh the stilly air, the sound of the bell was distinctly audible. The oid mnan stood at the door to listen. \"That means the Friars are going to bcd,\" ho remarkcd. \"I gcnerally go about thse sanie time, but 1 don't get up at two o'clock in the rnerning like thev do., Wcre you ever up at the Trappista' place?1\" The writer nodded, m~d inforrned bis host a visit would be paîd by Wým to the inonastical scenes of activity and silence on the fellowing day. Sbaking bands with* his visitor, the nenagdenarian strutted across the reem with the agrility of a man in the forties rather than the wonderful uege of nincty- four years! But, lie is one of the last remaining populace of a Manitoba in years when 1Ipdians camped on the now Main street of Winnipeg, days that neither white mnan or aborigine considered Fort Garry arnd the entire coiony, -%ould ever form augbt but a livelibeod for hunter and trapper. Violin Outflt , r - lor209= unsor ME- 20 vku..pot crdt. 10e. Orer u\u003echoira. D.pt. 641 OmS R~D ROSI TI A Ais go od te' --s, - -~ ~--- la So ea.n, Io put on THERU 18 SATISFACTION INi Martin's New Fibre WALLBOARD S(Made in Can-da) Insist on using it when building that new home or' making alteraoat yr \"r-set buldna. It is mdefrmPige(r woodfibre extrain thickness, thus insuring a sanitary and durable waIl covering.- Martin's Wallboard cazù bc aulied with- out the aid of skilled tredesmcn-so bard to get just when required. Our cireulars in eaeh bundle give you full directions for a1pplying. For sale by tirât class dealers everywhere. *Write us for \u0026amples. John Martin\u003e Paper Co., LimIted WINNIPEG, CANADA De.isty aPleasure Procrastination is the root of al I evil. If you have a decayed tooth you shouldhaveý- it attended to at once. Cal -and see me while in the city. SPECIAL ATTENTION qIVEN TG FARMERS AND THZIR FAMILIES Teeth examined FREE Write for descriptive Booklet and ailvice abour teeth, it is Free for the asking and I want you to have one. Languages spoken-English, French, German, Danish, Norwegian, Swedish, Polish, Russian and Ruthenian. Aj pointmnents miade by mail. Ail wor gar-anteed. Special aperatirg rooni for regulating teeth. I respect- fully solicit your patronage. Dr. Tr. G. MOXNES L.D.S., DDS, DMT Only World Gold Medalist and Diplonia in Canada. 6203,,, Main St. (Entrance Logan Ave.) WINNIPEG. MAN. Craz-y Quilts.- Best Quality. Large Package ......................1O 3 for 25c. 5 25o pkgs. $1.00. Post Pald. MLsaPro.. Satisfied Customers Coast ta Coast. %JOHN HOPKINS P.O. Station Ne. 15, DETROIT MICHIGAN, U.S.A. If you can't pulithe shade up- -orifsomnetime, i twillnotstaydown, the trouble 1sintheroîler. Buy Harts- TheY are used lu overO,OO,Geehomes. 0o tacks are rressaryr. Free: Send forvaluablebook, '1How tO Ct the Best Service front Your tShsdeRollers.\" Inhuyingshaderollers ,always lookcfor thîs signature Stewart artshorilCo. IRIOM, SUADEROLS",
         "Th~ Westein Home -Mront hly, What areYou going to do aùbout it? Written for The Western Home Monthly by Francis J. Piokie ONATHAN.J. .acksoxwas fifty; g~ Ttypicâ.l down euat f almer whoin the .Pneiglibors spoke' f as \"comfortable\" ,ilien cjsçussiflg is financial standing enieaning. there- that Jonathan Q8~ pêrapten thousand cash i the bank along aide the deed of bis one hundred and OWxy acres. Added to this there were the Wmds dozen or 80 head of cattie, horses and mvine. For half a century, Jonathan had seen tIi.suxl riseover the same eld quarter.' He knew evéry rail in the wriggly uold fencer bank account. So, ail this combined, his manner was one graudIy condescending when he struck t he country road and looked once more over primly kept fields- mere patches they were to hlm now. During his short stay of two weekSlie talked often te, Jonathan, with the result that the latter decided to take a trip West. \"I ain'tsespry as 1 used to be,' he ad- mitted a littie grudgingly. \"I1 don't hustie through the chore. quite so fast; and harvesting- leaves me a littie tired, s0 I sorter reekon a holiday'd do me good.\" For two whohladays of traveWlng Jonathan looked out upon endhom ilef of etocked bronie wheat that still ran around two ides of the farm;, lie knew everg maple, birdh and hickory trçeein the ' back' ten acre lot. Fifty years is a long time te spend in one fpot* it tends to make for certain ideas, te wekl a man's thouglits into a -certain groove. Jonathan had read mudli of the West; of the great crops of wheat growu year after year upon the sanie sil, tili e had. corne te p ut the whole west down saa land run by fabricaters and mad men. Now there was Cy Young, for instance Cy had been out West for ten years and wau now operatiug twelve hundred and eighty acre. of wheat. Peter John Cy's brother, told Jonathan many ta2fe of C y's successful grain growing; to ail of WL-hcJonathan listened only hall con- vinced. Certainly a man could net successfily farm two sections of land, always rowing wheat-that is net for long. \"It ain't according te reason, this gowiu wheat year after year,\" Jonathanthd remarked testily ene day mu reply to Peter John's tale of Cy's succeseut West. Se Jonathan traveiled westward with the big breezy Cy. For two wVhole day. aftet, leaving Winnipeg the old man looked out on endie.. Acilds of stooked rain, stretching sway and away to the horizon ibronzed rguaro ht lay mile on mile, anunuchanging -vsta, monotenous repetition of néw eut grain. Yet, despite the sameness of scene, it held the old miiu fasinated by the very stupendousnesq of the crop it por- tended.i Later, at Cy's, lie watched the harvest stacked and still later, hurled, sheaf by sheaf, iitetle steely, gnashing maw that weut endlessly on, rending sud tearmng, sucking into the bowels of the har-vester this golden fruition of boundless acres. Then, when lie lad seen it all, aud the fail grew late, lie teok train for home. And at niglit, aselie rode back across those long Mile., a few weeks before gaudy with endesslues of sheaves, lie saw flarin~ aud red against the niglit a tiousauci monster bonfires, the ligbt of many burning straw stacks, dotted glarings, as Late r, t Cy's, he saw it stacked Then Cy, in the late suxnmer of 1914, wrung a. brief holiday while the grain ripened for the harvester, aud came home. Cy Nvas six f eet two, stout i proportion with the voice of a fog horn and the wind tanneti face ful brother to a harvest mnooui. Ten ycars of the West, of big deals and gigantie operations, had lef t their ixprint upon him; he was breezily Self assured, supremey5tisfied in bis own ego. Time had changed the quiet rural Youth into polished business man. ' was :t Practical farmer on a big scale, to Whoiîi one successful harvest brought more ,cash I-,.han did fifteen years of slaving of the ýplks back home. In 1913 bis grain t' had called for $36,000, 820,000 of li.hhad later found their way ta bis if of some Brobdignagiau army in biv- ouack. Then it was that Jonathan saw as red as the flames that tingd the autumn sky. ci'Why! Why!1 Why?\" The question reiterate(I itself in hi~ brain; ànd then, turning to Cy who was accompanymoz hlm as far as Winnipeg, lie burst forth: \"W\"hv this terrible waste?\" \"W'Vhat waste?\" Cy asked blankly, not' ge~igthe V-rend of thought. gSilently the old man waved bis arm toward the distant horizon where flames leaped higb. Cy wafched 'the flames carelessly a moment, then: \"What eau- you do abeut it?\" . e said, answering question with question. At once Jonathan wuz alive. Backed Tweity-two years of fair« and honest deming st the. back of the mDme H. He W.nemerls 237 GRAIN EXORANGE WINNIEG, HAN matutbIIaho. log* Write for Winearlg' heiplUl hintà 10 grain mllP\u003etS. It will me you MOtI. Mr.Grain Grover: Ship your grain in carload lots, '\u003c-IloWfy IbM \u003e ARDSÔN \u0026 SONS,- Limited\", and secure ail the nlkkl b Will be pleaeed to handie your shipnenta Ô1ï bîighu} ff, ing out your instructions carefully, or whei u fewiI*te net quotations when cam are Ioaded. Caeful Oheekîng\u003e of Gftadb,QI4MU Guuraaiteëd, IfIABBU~U t Our metnô. '«A bout Shipping\" wli be o# vafue' tô fii. 'a be Pleaeed to forward it to you on reqvost. Yours for safetY, rVIoe and tè\"ita James Richa rdson\u0026 Soas, Ltde Grai Eobge, Wlip. rinkaeOe ESTABLISHRD po DONALD MORRISON \u0026 COU GRIN F4COMMISSION.1 GRAIN EXCHANGEy WINNIFPEG We handie Wheat, Osta, Flax and Barley on oommklion, obt Ilabest posil gadsand puces ur work is prompt, accurate sud rlal Let us handie YU hpmet this seasn. Daily or weekly market loUer on application. Refereneea Bank of Toronto, Northern Crown Bank and CommetkI Agences. GRAIN DEALERS TRACK BuvE.S COMfISIeN DRE4LE» ACME GRAIN CO. LIMITËD 804 UNION TRUSTirUILDING, INNIPEOQ CAR LOTS 097 OUR PRICES BEFORE BELLINO Agent# WanW dWhore noW Repwiudn. ToepPiorMMais 9790 * \u003c'Y,, :that oyour Ei pcmo Luring, with- bard ou full where. idted df al 1' you Cal 1 TG and- r the on1e enceh, Al -ating ipect- ES \u003eloma \u0026've.) t.h Hart$- anc\"*e Irour oliers. RS Outfit kïwehoics. CO.na FARMERS1 You will get good satisfaction'and the. but pomsible cash resuits by employing our servicee to look alter and dispose of your carlot shipments of Wheat,ýOatà4 Barley and Flax. Liberal advances against -shipping bil% at 7 per cent Interest. THOMPSON, SONS \u0026 COB- 700 w GRAIN EXCHANOE1, WîNNIPRO",
         "hi'and ~out ~ ~sraw. *A8josthe Mo co the 1. eyae. up lhe ysil\" the gabtg omlgyIuatb Da ttuvuboe juteret ou , omeeher «-UAn uet\u003eàtpuinean'. 8ia IlM M\"y be had in ýw for. *owernqu.ê. s- pring, gl tin A.ooho $2.00 per 1le,for outdôor 50 *r $1.00 RUU9-LîANPand d, C for- EDIS. umant in. Otober, and bury thi trees dur-' ip.r ps~4luearly spr. They 'willd tergrowth neit year. site for iDur fait * Nu-Co -y C.Limited BABEATOON f sak. ,lem -k~for w \"Wtyi bé 1 tothe, ~hewet on~;'«Thetotàl O amInnboeta, pd = ,wn'fo ~thé y104:1, #M1911 zesp.ctively- roi Ior2 tueb.s frak - digweegt tof àtraw in two ho o. Thweght -of whèst, ts,.barley and gaxaversdage - \u0026oiýdii\u003c hotheir..iarious w.ght vean. a te'àf 40; d to thebushe1. -wus 172,48,080 bumhels. Multiply-this *by eightylor twice the averfge we'ight of thegram, and you have the. enormous aMountof 1,378,978,160 pounds of straw. Byone of the. latest proceases, the produet frmten poilnds of straw maices one brick Soi thus waste strawe, devoted Wo brick makmg , would result in more than 137,iilion bics or enough W bûda good sizedacty. U afobhi hetawitskeh M takule prOpi~i .9 hIant tih' thie or acIiiuW ek i Up. Now what are yeu p~lh do about it? -l thfperxé ah fatrTis'he'tWbe'blapied'forbrh Wo hiln under ee«gting coition? Cy ast baelc; lit a cir tie n to the clark, lit re\u0026y w-\"h te bec00a a =1*y, pece b -pece, .oiatbl . Àx uteofriget \"\"*ho,,said èfte*t Iéng-- ueofreflection, \"gelnever thought'o! ,\"the question la stili here, it muât b. answered some day-' \"1What are you going Wo do about'it?\" Advioe for Grain Crowers Winnipeg, Aug. 31,'1915. At a meeting held Wo-day, at which representatives of the farmers' organiza- tions of Western Canada were present, rorPrompt itoturn8, Boit Prices and Pair Tr.atnený MRP TOUR GRAIN TO THE OGILVIE FLOUR MILIS CO., LTD. poRit WILamm or PORT ARTEUR Bond Bilh to The glleFor li o., Ltd., Winnpg. When writing advertimers pease M~ention The Western 'iope Monthly. The straw ot the Western provinces of Alerta and Saskathewan which is annually wasted, would bIng at even halifthe eastern price,ý about $W0,000,000 «Then,\" lie went on befère cy could interrupt:- \"there's low grade alcphol. Now in Ger-,\" he caught himseif to avoid an unpatriotie utterance, adding instead,' \"in Europe they devote straw Wo this purpose. \"Again, there is lumber; good lumber can be made from straw. Too, flax straw, for instance, at a low estimate is worth $10 per .300 pounds for fibre. Over a million and a hall bushels, or, according to our averaging of the whole, 60,000,000 pounds of this straw were wast ed in the two provinces mn one ycar. This alone wouldf have brought $200,000. \"O99r, baled, the entire produet of ail the combined straws, would have brought at even hall the ea9tern price, S30,000,OOO \"How about ail this?\" the matter of prices likely ho be received for the present crop was discussed It was the unanimous opinion of those pres- ent that a heavy movement on the part Sfthe farm ers to seil their grain at the resent time would be almost certain Wo force prices to a lower le'vel, and that if a more leisurely methàd of marketing were followed by the fhrmers in the dis- posai of their gr,' better average price ail round ud bc secured for it. WTile it was recognied that the mat- ter of *ivng advice ofr the selling of grain is a diffcut one, it wa.s thought ad- visable by ail present to make a publie statement advising the farmers of Western Canada, as f ar as- possible, ho store a portion of their grain on 'their farms, and, in this way, spread the marketing sthoe *w il h~arI wy A\" ý7W ub% i Se our Own, Boss Tou do not need outside help when ishipping your grain. Ue thp- G.G.G. Co. Ltd. Take your Bill of Lading to the Bank o.i1it to us and getlira advance, prompt returns and ;courteous attention. Write for prices on Coal, Apples, Flour, etc., in car 1otes. Wnnipeg Manitoba A ~ _ _ lut ./for tbis Wh pi' Oui cr0] (to YOUI Ulm.",
         "r ten monthe, xe quantities . few months, as the preent' riugig priesi e àe more ire; rates for Sever before;1 this oe et with grain Il *11mean ltn~t1 ave. wfl o hbigl df the bankà take, re mght-,ve tOM interests otder tomeet.\u003e nolping tirel By.Alsn'(C aeitieo it into ite own. I ili inaffmuclias if bids, toward a cominnM\u0026d btween einoyer su of ýcoopiatiçl4 nd , that the voluùteei'io m than the preêsed , m hi e« man -in atudyi3 w isk Anil th\u0026 woek l nt,ýoLie be 1asgood iafi we)îuito say,inm ?eplo t farne. t iMme. agreater mntr retun far 441 ~tliPcrop te the farinera cf Western Canada ,, ýthan will othwrwiee obtai and it seçine \",parent that sucli a reult' will be a eézrét benefit toe-every busines itert\u003e in Uic éoutry, and at the saine tixne will imeure* a àtad flow cf grain sufficlent fo fe cneede cf Uic Empire. Morç leiniiely marketingof Our grain bas always been advocated y the leaders cf. the farmners' organizatione, sud we make thie statement at the present £Inie ,for the purpose of directig attention te ;tbie very important matter at a period when our crop le just begliningj to meve. W. believe that if fariners 1ollow Our sgestion hi large numbers that the resuit wIlprove that the scheme le far more peetîicai than any other- that eould. be auggeted te ineure a fair return for Uic- Signed on behaif cf the farmers' organizations: :JAS. SPEAKMAN Pres. United Farmers of Aiberta. P. P. WOOLýBRIDGE, Se'y United Farmers cf Aberta. JOHN MAHARG, Pres. Sask. Grain Grewers' Aas'n. J. B. MUSSELMAN, Se'y Saak. Grain Growers' A'n. Rt. C. R[ENDERSl, Pres. Man. Grain Grewer' Ass'n. R. McKENZIE, Sec'y, Msu. Grain Grcwera' As'n. C. RICE JONES, Pres. Alta. Farmers' Ce\u003e-op. Elevator Co. CH[AS. A. £WNNING, Gén. Manar Sask. Ce-op. Elevator C.o T. A. CRERÀ1L, Pres. Grain Growers' Grain Ce., Ltd. A Merciful Mraz Viitor. \"My geod mnan, you keep your pigs much toc near the lieuse.\" Cottager. \"'That's just what the doc- tor said, mum; but I don't sec how it's a-goin' te hurt 'em.\"-Punch.. c Ïe luo abandone a qt e for tht faarr L ds hie hersvery lohg and gtseJiML of gnawiiÇhunger lo1 before the regill;;à thnit je thàt a lzght su d reeohing Ch wi11 be productve c g 4rèt ssud fi.lbe Worth mmy turnes tpri ansd, the trouble it entaâinmctuig o if the min m~ade ci the rgtsafh con give thie back in lbo.To huatlo, a mfan eut early i th IX 14 .0-n\u0026afr hurried bredafat inaJr $iVe hlmau al start, butwilhebeanmove ikely itoloep uphie Pace ail day tion if hçe it out better equipped sud et a mer mod*tte ~ace.It l e ô btfuL Tnsahg jbtter for bin thé t f ew reste at itevM sh tefipud, lo hie own sake sud thet of',the- horem, in- stead of haing tà otm tea\"me 'wbhe keeping a looketforthe-boss 1 etis no co-operation h ita ysen Un.der the social coundîtone sin i thie country, wliere ti.hdhe pu more or less one of the family, hie uy on the farm can be a.. 9 eple at or otherwise, sud many consideretions shown hlm lie can ireturn by doing such chores that occasionally cal for voluntary me- vice. Harmony je an essential pont.b.. tween the farmer's family and the em- ployees. This latter le productive of a good natured wiflingnies to oblige h the way of doing maiiy odd jobs that turn up while offhandednesesud surlinees only produce the minimum amount cf work, and that not of tihehlghot mark of excellence. Iù regard to work in thcefield, it is wdl for the fariner to explain hie plan of campaign thoroughly at 'the start sund avoid mystery, 80 that the hired mnI will know i which direction ýhie bestj endeavors are to be used. I'h i llli encourage a conscientiousiterest. A1 man kept working, figurativýely speaking,1 in the dark, la a niere machine, and, beingq in the dgrk,14s apt to stumble. The dif-i ference between the enlightened inuasdi fi~ IL ... .... . ............... tRie\" min win k l sam 04 n htweni in hors. ou WoitU qm¶ WOMW W \" in a oodudea on the oeeir h mo kuOw vit ôi gnd 7for tbis remso the mmou kaow ie s seanuoa tcuu. The dioeau k:r acte, , c__ aceriacis, 15 OMM QUIJ two vaiwtes c f nmnge . 4 commom nge15cusd by a. of okcin diéeaseiwcaueed by a,\" ISa coptswbich burrown under MM ntuai Tii. trouble starts, nesa nd u , otbo adong the and the reot o te moue, frcm t O t t the extremities. A close eodmnatod aW*y lime I the. skin will reveal sinai pim$Pl, Mmd b~s b elevations, fellowed by tii fSlormato. e.0it scolie, which if bruelie off show a raw *wre ILavDm surfaocebeneath. eds\" m the bey re. tp, tbeso nt 4@1~ Utii. lk à- ,lijt lre bwnisg resxidt ldfrn eceivedl 5e« Ijt se pres3- ie part Sat tlie 'tain te id that i.rketing te dis- average or it. e mat.- of grain kit ad- Spublie ffestern store a farnin, eketing",
         "r LU ow~ i', *mO Mlm n ýO\u003eil M ALO~OLANDWIdl 3LC àut a2ehohl euaty, obei~sd )mmkngolig b~oeé4hioiigh.pcsve f~use m war, tfi f. à, il,1 i mode battle sit Mute ibm en Wou ent of Europe wou oet of the German 1 apo1eou after the E avç corn e tua biave e cf ru th MOVfIG PICTtU98A»D H!I;OTJIM cial lep in m i- h*~itqtee Yd* es caste fm.vfinurn onceri.nî iIK~ ~~Wandh ronhan 'Ir=s cf Germ o in pwsy w ilI wçi~wiu ~Wtm, an, oor Io pbpj119prnyft tii. re@tapit o~of , Pa' 4 Otounti1. Au a eèrt ~puaepr5iti an lump u=auni s.a.n.t ~qui~to G.mau womée' froiiâ thé Kaiser'. ý,» rWmabegmebsavby that \"the. German ÎR wmen'a ltô7ta mensduly reed #bot tisa tatthe àgef\u0026rm. wide nto eIçIr t4 for womeoine an4e fully a yéar. go u EjI~dlatelyauthé ult cf arthrré wikbs. controvarsylu tha subject, which produced inmeiable létters i thé Tirnes sud tLb. other London papeè. No th. ii.\"w Qr style (which *as sdqpted al\"c i n ce at the outbreak.cf the war, as a cf'economv) lJ, Mireality,, a .fellewl aLe ~pnd Frenchi styles, after t.11. \"«Thé clothing j àr*.«oèlg 'athée.overunint wlin,\"wll do weI~ Iu1SI~1*far asctton good areconcerned Micone tZ an\"''ierstanding with thémGovertnenta '41 u1tifes, befoké thé Government finds itéelf com- yDèeléBSo o eiL that its- measures are flot st at hamt.'There speaka the (lerman systém. The oéniy wonder is that the ruling despotistn hlas tàken the trouble tc use sp many words i Iyine. down Its decrer about',women'à skiitâ, instead of issuing a rgid \"Ver- ,4-.,boten,\" forbidding any but the Üarrowest skirts. Théré was réported i thé newspapers a couple cf weeloe ago tiihe c f a young won who wam Vypno- tlu.d by t1w,. qu cf Sveàg%%he hypnotimer of Trlby, tn a uMYing pioture acrnén, and rem4axed ini a trance ai e the show was over. Tige oa* would appeavto sffld pretty strong proof tbatpe9Ml who are hyne- tuzed-are broughtinito th\u0026t oondWônu r4~y by their owu çaa~ton. Here waa 1nôI yýOtIc0peatr-oti but à* picture, the reprod U d 0 photograpli, the shadow- et a shadow. Tii he:4i o hlas long held the view tuat tiie hypuotie ltae a kind of ernotional pralyuia cf thé wiliich is ionsiderably more thau lf intentioEiII. Cà1aui it 35 that against a person cf aüy real atrençth of character who was cdéterwined not to, b. hypnotxsed,. even a « sper.Svengshi would lie impotent. As for moving pioturea, they are, of course, often extraordinariy sud startingly vivid. Thé Philosopuher lias heard of a young woman whod at a moaving -,piiture show was no deeply moved by the plotting of the villainous character i thé piecé to effeot thé ruin and death of a noble Young- mm that she whispeed quit. loudly, \"Stop hirn. Won't somebody stop hm?\"Wbeeuuan elderly gentleman sitting near eau, (Jetiny. llwil go a.nd*stick my uni- brella tlrough thé acreen, if yeu insist.\"1 Characters on 'thé soreen are frequently applauded; hisses aud otliei'ooun* o f disapproval are alse frequently heard. But tb. stoi . that a bulldog viciously attacked a colle whloh was trotting about on the soreen at a moving pioture show, la one which the Philosopher cannot vouch for. WRAT MME EDUCÀTIONAL «\" FRILLS\" As is usual at this season when the sehool year luasj begun to get weil under way again, lthere is a revival of the discussion of what should be regarded as essential in éducation. .\"Frills\" in' educatýon forin a perpetual subjeot for debaCe. But what are the subjects whiclh are rightly te be regarded as fundamental and not open te the charge in any manner, shape or form of being \"frills\"? The old proverli about the three r's contains the answer which cornes at once to everybodly' s mind when this question is asked. Everybody mnust agrrce that whatever. cise lb tauglit the primary sub.- mna mmneaj the energy emv duction cf a causesmisey. *ye in tlat rnclustry1 luid 'which -detrqysç the po nCY C'~ TuE LUGAOY 0r JOHN LYNQE Rmeet lynobinge ini the United States give evideffl of deplorable conditions ini certain parte of that . ouvm try. $moui f Lii... ynohingsamareterrible mnuiftý-* ti.oa ftbe acial problem with Whieh sver loft id'trudcitizen of the Unite States siit deep ,ens Ô4bis ouumtry'e reSepoi*bility; but ens récntlynhig, whicii took place l Georgia s othn to Q th that problein.Iti tedbcx of the ieading newepapers of the Unie States tha4 orne two thousand persona have been lynched là thaï country during the paut fifteen years, aud that dwin*4 the paet six raenthe thére bas been an increae et i0p*. cent in the lynchings. The gdft or innocence cf, ttli4 , persons lyruched bas nothlni, to do with the fact thet lynching iu lawlessness i itextrerne ferm. .It MeuA\u0026c'W the very foundation cf civilisation. John Lyùcii, ta\u003e Vfrguû*a farmer who'took tho law into his owu hend and frorn whorn the word \"lynch'i dexived, madW himself the executiener of\u003e pian who mor may ot have been guilty of a crimàe which dsr dthe*eal penalty. It does flot matter. Well it la for our own country that there lias neyer been a Caud~.yoig IL~~~~~ -sudnal htntafwo h yo in he i United States are due to lack of respect for the law snd Iack of confidence in the courts., 'MINCIE TRIRUT TO BRITSH ACBIEVXENT A. great English jourifal latély wrote that the British public must not, iby the hero\" deeds of the Britishi army, be led to forget the preponderant part played by the Frenchi on laind. This frankucas*1 must bé mutuaL. If the support of our Britishi alies on land i.s stili limited, it must not bc forgotten that at sea-on \u0026Il the sea-4t is they who have by far the ]eaviest task to tulfil. Prom 4the very firet day cf the war the British fleet gained sudh absoluté control of thp ocean roads and so evident a naval superierity that the public has corne to take this state of thirgse for granted. We must io(t losesiglit of the advan_'\" tage we gain by this uncontested supremacy. Thiéti cannot bc repeated too often; if at the beginnig of the war we were able te complet. the equipment of oiir army. with a rapidity which was not axnon, .h loast of the surprises of the German staff, we owe i to the fleets whiclb rendered us masters of the sea.- - Paris Temps.",
         "ekéeps ýZoop *#to l aud' ?.r(.ctkib . Dealers v deaI.er*camtÏà EnLYQ States give evidomi i parts of that coj\u003e e -terrible iait ~S~oMust IW s pnibliybut cuis It s tatedf'byopué United States tha4 beeulynched in that WBr,. sud that dlli1nt an mereage of 60pe; ý or innocence of t4~ with the fucttht2 ie formn. It mauuc a. John Lyn9h, _é into hie own hx\"'ý Wrio~ e dved,unsdý 'ho i or màyuit Ldsrd the-de.ath eU it is for cgur own îSCmynhing. D=ly in the pet furthe law and. Iy wrote that the hero\" deeds of the,- a prepondera nt part 'his frianknee muet r B3ritish allies on )e forgotten that, at 7'ho have by far the .e very firet dal cf L1iI absolute control a naval euperiority thie state of thirgs, 3ight of the advan--' d eupremacy. Thié. at the beginnig o11 e the equipment of wae not aion. the ian staff, we owe i asters cf the eea.- DRAflCNBS IM h v aq Jýý a a",
         "w OWI' d3ISpOYpI viy ,Mu muet \"'4i S\u0026r t.e uoeed bol# Eýe ore.whlc 'sQr* ýtb 't b o a iMéi r ,.marks cou- 4#f\u003e1 mitto give bb\u003ews .'eu; nta efnc- ~ts~1W~~f-'htoeboyse6em ot lo~i lu dcven thibdIn\"fi gu*,au Iin c uence tbey'blliedl tenoted hm Afte raapteaof *~l r.a\u0026meu, h fualy u ie 'dday l arage 'epn twê lgpet$ufyand began kiekig bhum Wltb bi liO treiiïtlà. .ftor t hohewaa ieft alque, liit :re -. o deure te associate wRb bhis schoilmatp. jei eetcf thus experience was te niake b'hie *ô~~sd riantbropical even at the eariY ag. - 11- - 1 - -r - - 44. , - e liidclw'1\"' siqhàunnat, vr.%ff rol', à ia :etty obut Éian, b t i - p. ~\u003e~$ ,tpi~gt1\"forumy, wrkhaI t ev #ue* #A D A We ail boliove iu bei4g gpuerons ' luiti epooo wi.ibtthe tii. abiitto .g*e-andt thon,,#,«U48nly ao9éK arlf.àe proue t. ao . b~:I \u003eeweat je:oséiamilindollars, I',w#niuI4. tbue andf0.\" moni, wbén \"it-h géainýi:fWhat ardi yêun doin wtte tup\u0026bofd- 4b1.ar wbh1àyou do posensal\" T4it ý.*b wat pre1Opco of .ygUbgman dt\u003eos with a: dollar j#nd 1*11teli ou t.4 States, wb4t hb.would do, witb a million\" 1m$-he 1pos1. gîr4t*oýýM1radoll4ar .it 00 M o esud a ~w\" lcm teRirot7ba yYursoult, Johni ~4~4Wmlq wgsiw»orwwo4 *o ailow ýa.caut of 'is .face %~ t . *.;. bnteatiofrd liim a ammo f teq: gll1k1eas \"if h* ouldý- coneent. MA edp\u003cs. Weeiey. ,eldg\u0026 au.n4 tiitheopeiation walked out\u003e 110t à.4uioay ito tiie stteet wlth the. Money. né saw , abuont pOseg, t. lmmidateIy, after Ieav gt~ ose, an auêtioneer t b 138 be b.u ito .w about to »eUthe. bcd on which a poor man bol) 4ck. wa.. lng Wesey ,uehed In at one, and founi ,c. to ýOid. th*t the, 4ebt wM oily teu guineas. tie at once paid 1bIv.eter tl*arnounti, and reîlafkid, «'I uee why God sent m~e 'Hermitage.,tie. ten guineaâL\" ýSncb instances are delightfui, aùthey are indicative 'of bis character. TICLL -TTUTH. Tell the. truth. Tiiink ouly truthfui thoughts. Bnil . 1f e ou. truthfui idealIs. #- By and by truth wlf b. wnlitteu on your face, seen in the gesture of your haud, iudictçd by the. stride of your stop and reffected iu the.gleam, of your oye. Whieu Generai Lee was lu convereation with one of bie ofcers, in regard to a movement of bis army, a plain farmor's boy overheard, tho gener*al's reniark, thït ho b.d decided to marcb upon Gettysburg instead of Harrisburg. The. boy tolegraphed this fact to Goveruor 'Curtin. A speciai enigine was sent for the boy. \"I would give myright hand,\" said the governor,, \"to kuow if this »boy tells the truth.\" A corporal replied, \"Governor, I know thai boy; it is impossible -for. bin to lie; there is not a drop of false blood In lits veins?' Tu fi fteen minutes the Union foopsi were' marching to Gettysburg, where thev 'Ilicd a victory. Character is power. over uis t4mnn Iuq.wsm.wwm -we u pu v. are Mot liçd.- l t 4irp4e r W wt6,xlo\u0026 ' e o poý.sessed b13the 'Iar \u0026w iotv fr1 Iet it et eMol,¶We h. s9xeýwoue tb dé t'oh.beamiied, bimîxthat Mbpot~~'do sonem ig,\"a#e ssàed a-F,-\" - s . ga whiié. Tequfred, îï6sh longed of .eervfee' tON' ber -Loid. -Àfte1r aeklàif-, itý. au~cict1y $owfe i. cucn f -t ,auch.serviet à* 4 rccivig or eaty sauaie. ~epastor - i, -t' rn ld ,ýouoei as -you do and ,Iiwill aalk4yoer W eaU o a g\u0026\u003eýd aIldy wb *ho uld b. -wm»d4 .eer4d.by the Chritin ocompnlonehip .cf'sue ' a, bright. ygung person eau you 'rê\"and, rktý a\u0026, uâlo - aud au adess ou a -slip of -paper., Tii. yo,àng là«, iooked at the. paper and'exclaimed, \"WMy, thîat il'O' m 0w b .l-omne, and the old lady in my grand ai1 terl\" aud'the pastor said, \"4That is the ieseou'I 'wonld bave, you leami.\" QUALITY lx WORK. Do your wok~ Renember that you Iuveet yeurself in every act. Into evory deed you iert roputation, charactor a d destiny. Everythlng voit do comeos back to you.I n \"to-day\" you will find7al your ycsterdays enthroued. There in, no sucb guarantee of future bappiuess as' the record «of duties well .performodL There in no perfume se sweet as theo fragrance of au approving memory. Te . Senator Chauncey M. Depew sys that a* fariner came Into bie law office iu Peekshili, New York, tho :fret day ho opened.it, 'when he was fresb froin bis admission to the. bar. The fariner asked him a question in regard to the sttlemeut of au lestate. Depew looked' it up aud wlieun the.'fariner came back the next week ho gave 'him a writtoir opinion, for which hoc harged hum, ffve dollars. The. fariner said that, ho would uever succeed if his focs wore no exoritant, and ho gave hum one dollar and seventy-' five cents. That was his beginning. Twenty years afterward a gentleman came to Depew's office in New York and asked blm the saine question. 'Ho answered' it immediately and it was exactly the same' auswer he bad given the old farmer. The interview occupied about an hour, and bis client gave him live buudred dollars. 'rd vsa ha fre tai sh(",
         "TIP W~tepn Home Dctor hal*t pi. they do,,ýu4 tv e'. -PW ~ true averv.mothm w ul mnâ\". Ét' \"b dqooftoeikrom, e. Imat eof the sheetr0a t ýh inge aide of 1the. dor. Bone. frcm ci m inaMdi\u0026Pb,- And now to return toOur ck rOoi. -It muet b. weIl scrubbed with hot water pd arbolic soap once a weol, and the îqri obe wiped over every,'dq with 6 duster dippe4 in the oarl.oho and ter. Evrything used in 'the i~m ut «be kept in it,. and' pot oarried ut the houeeý oe or *clied bY sanyce except the nurse. b A cloth dipped in carbolie should suc ,he put ail over any utenei that hma to te carried throuZh the hS ous1 be \"iptied, and soiné carbolie, used in Ceansing it. The nurse should wash ber own hands often, using hiot wAter, carbolie seap, and a niai-bruah, sud. be Vry particulâr to do thus before taling ber own meale, which she ougt not to have in the ick room. She muet also le carçîul to brugh hler toeth weli and trequently. Il je important for bier to take care of lier own heailh, therefore she must g et ai much freeli air, good food, and reét as pousible. After al freh air and sunlight 'are the best disnfetants, go we must get ai mnuch of them as we cari into the sick room, and it ie very important to remnember that no amount of disinfectants Pan take the place' of perfect cleanliflew. Ingrowing To. Na.-IXeat tallow in a spoon until hot. pour on the granula- tilns. When inflamination subsides pare away nail at sides. 1.. gm% d rive ori I CtiYoü: Atiëwer IýE Wby eh ou Idanlnb..t 4j* That tatemet GiIoue tnwo. if o minoeIt woiild auokly -ffe ta oqw ohoild reoeive youros4eti~W*u m. Sl hROLM\u003eN and w. stand rdy to v. apiano of bhi \u003e lit yior ,30 The Winnipeg Piano Compane,Ç 3»3 cryacomplete asortmi o ci Berlock-ManniU% PINanad Qs and prices maied free on appication. Plasy tesc smn When writing, AdvertiSers' pl0aae mention 'The W.st«b H ngùence Le e'are ' eiid t - ng yoti flnd al D sud' !ord, c f Une go ry. Te fariner rk, the om hie hiin a estate. ie back on, for er Baia rere no evefty- iu New swered answer ceupied iundred",
         "M0*thI~V ~êWa.. 8h. mentai and moral and physical value cf Sut thuila oone prgunient for miing that 1 don't remember te havehar r mucli uaed, and thn a t ii. prettinees -valu- . smne. Do'thi e . c yof r mouti naturafly 4t~h~ ~lo, go ,4 stand ia front cf a aIfr nd Xoithem up iti your finersever sé é and y see if ycur ~Wbetuif d. eb t becomenot onIy ~ 1î~lk 'it'ul for the prettineas value B ~~i -t\" î c\u003ci1 aaire i oit ust in its ,t.~ray gtmup et ofa fae-it 1m ,Y~t. jijuiin w lihit beaves the. face thm oto tue niùet ito Tii. hoiect girl 1k1now la one viiSe i, dçam4mtel, ipostion lias drawn- down the ýcorn\u0026s dE hir . moutii and .viorne \" h\" ,bit i.citiiiii . roiui _g las m arked i -t Io siiop wrikles b.tween lier eyes. In otirdtails' f et aptrn e i lnot paricll b=asdbut without, tiese aisfp~rmena oe Vould be simiply or- dinrib plin.With them se.ia--asI befor. eomarke-tle omeiest girl ,I1 la now ready f'or mailing. 1\"i gue enutaines afuil description 3 vsrîom gn ,and nets a feree tienehuol \u003e 1write for full partulain ' wjusive lni tés m' t %*t, IM purch.ffld frein. usil, M,ù -ve 1entireiy sants-i e, 1May W returned te us wlIb.retun ei KOL, RJFRW \u0026 GO.,\u003e LIutomBV«s 'Write f«ow n new catalogue and apacia smt SEAMAN \u0026 PETERSON NiEW YORK HAIR STORE Kon8lngton Block, WINNIPEG knpw- I.have neodoubt at albut thatthcema- j«fori fpéople more -tioroughly enjcy igat a homcby pleasant face, in whiei te corners cf the. moutli are turned up and ther. are ne frown wrinbes, and wliere tii. sun of mmiles often imes, than at a\" pitetily feauted face, marred by frowný vrinkles sud ah unhappy meuti. '1 Surely a plewasut day in an ordinary boality la more beautiful than a drlzzly main in the beveliest spot on carth. Be don't ho toc aerius--don't think pensivens in pretty er pouhing attrac- tive., They are allowable te some sighu extenit, of course, but ony in suffcien quantity te lilp us apreciat the siniles. There wouldbd o n igli liglits in tlie picture if there wcre ne shadows-we weould net hlaItappreciate aunshine if lier. were ne cloudy daya. 0f course, yeu don'h want te amile al Ptic time, but I don't think tiere la any danger cf that. 1 neyer knew but one girl wlie aiilcd tee mucli, sud I hhink ah, vas teeble-mindcd. Den't ferget tint pretty coloring sud regular feahurca make up cul y two-thfrds' cf beauty--hhese are th~e body sud mind ef beauty. Its seul is expression.. And an attractive expression la net only tint whici reflecta tic animation cf a hvey mid, sud mirrers the awectncss cf a cvely seul, but that whicli often warms sud gladdens us with the, sun- sine et amibes. Infantile'Scurvy Ticre ia a form cf scurvy,, or scerbutus, te whieh lias, been given thc name of \"infantile scorbutus,\" and whicl islathe censequence cf errer in the diel, just as. la scurvy in thie adult, aitheugl iti lanet yet quite clear what tlie error, or perbaps it isbetter ho say, the lack, is. It is more apt te oceur in chldren ted on artificial foodand sudl therefore feund among the rici ather than the peor, aithougli there are cases iu ail classes and witli al formis cf feding, even breata-ted çhldren net being wholly exempt. Oversteriized cow's milk is, thought by msuy physicians te be answerable for a larqe percentage cf thc vidtima, and it is believed that actual and long-continued beling-not simple Pasteurizatin-of the meIkdeprives it of some essential element cf nutrition. A child rnav have se mild a case cf ocurvy tint it escapes notice. It may ,, t 11 lmb rigid or te scream whoe it la adled and. a thua blue lin. may be fondýùpgthe. bord«er thel.. gum\u0026. In~ the seVere Camesthe - dm'tomns auj be uiorwk.d. Th. daoeea, it muwen hand brulaQed-Iom ;if theraaxe any- teeth the. uin avllew ' UP round tlike. usions, an\u003ed if there are 88 et no teetit le um iii b. po and of abluihduootin On. of the. distinctive symptoras of ti dieaidhemorrhage,.aomtimes inthie ferm of noebled but oftener i bleed. ingfrom thieoWor the kidneys. Moet' of these symptomao, espeiafly the boa ffl0 blood, are characteristid of tlis 'disorder, and the. diagnosis of a ca should, there. fore b. easy. WÇ he diagnosia bas once been made, the. cure .ould also be easy, because the, treatmeflt 85 a le. It consisteala-,. most etirly insu immediate changei the. food. timbeen'proved thnt pro- -Pel modified raw freoh cow's milk con. tisthe antiaorLutÏie element needed, whatever that may be. In addition te tbis the. child aiiould take a teaspoonful. Of orange Juice or lemonade every hour or two-througli the day. After a couple of weeoe, beku fruit juice shoubd b. g:iven, but a a mliqntity of orange Juice maybe gven =aiy for a ltime. .11met.mes a 11111e raw beef juice -or barély water may be given i alternation vith them12 , but th ssnot necs i the cases m he .frt juices are taen readily. Druptare nearly useless exoept i those casesifiere the suemia ia very pronounced the physician in charge may order mina doses of soin. preparationof iron. Duat DIsease Thà inithe name given by a writer i one of lhe medical journals some time ago te a- train. of symptoxns seemiingly abways excited by the breatbing iti of dust. The symptoms sometimes resemble those of an ordinary cold, or'tbey may b. like rheulmatic joint and muscle pains, malaria, a bilious attack or an acute in- That the disease la distinct from any of those wbici it resemblea la thought ho b. shown by the. tact that it always follows the inhalation of dust and not exposure te cold,, sitting in a draft, indiscretion in diet, eye-aërain, or other of the usual pro- ducers ol similar symptoms. In one -instance this dust disease ithe case of a certain physician always followed a season of ptig clippings in a scrap- bock. The e k lie for tbis purpose was an old ledger whicli iad been kejpt for many y cars either in the ceilar or in the attic-both. places dry and dusty. This bock was handled only when a number cf dippingaLd ad accuniulated and the doctorbd a few leisure heurs for pasting them in thc scrap-book. After cadi cf these times he always suffered from spe- cial train cf symptema. The musty odor cf the bock seemed te cause an immediate feeling cf rawness in the nose sud.a bitter taste in the back cf the tbroat. This was followed the next day by the signa cf a sliglit cold in the head, nausea, las cof appetite, a coated tengue and a littie fever, witli muscular sorencas and depres- sien cof spirits. These symaptoms in- creased in sevcrity for two or tbrce days, aud, gradually wore awaLy in the course cf a weck. After suffering in this way a numnber cf times the docter did what h. would have dene at once for a patient under similar circumstances-he had the bock thr- oughly beaten and dusted, and the covers asud ede wiped witli a damp clcth mois- hened in a stprong antiseptie solution. After tiat lie ceuld haudie thc bock with uinpunity. Such an experience is net uncommen and the remedy is -the one that was found effective in the case described. Thc lessen can be applied in many cases where il la necessary te have a great deal cf old ac- cumulahed dust removed. This dust should neyer be stirred up and inhalcd by the persons who have te deal with it, but should always le attacked with damp cleths. Il le just«as easy to dajupen the cleth with an antiseptic solution as with water. This renders lnxnocuous the many kinds cf germi that may be found in old dust. a- - ttr I ~ i omas Ie t ouA ta..ikowWPs0og hm e d c\u0026a wcudeem mad gtnyou MM*NOÉas 0'-estrepae, e~pmeD o rlsty onteu eaddWtopSe tda tot gcsbeiet ra=Ighkyo 1000l's3a00 itW e uttorven L.candle;ma inaa on IMM* 011uP00 Tet.~LdOf=oua mutBreuo \u0026udz~sevta commo oD, udthe more hn twle Lfhduh t everyfihoeai amln peopesh ready euloyln b.tbf. Erft bewh!tew, tead a urnk icuar.h a tveareae mmh a aue if thre vers tueslgtedub asw to me Uns of ti. ladm= Usd1wIII hoasp lar Aut o hslvsd whm er7cmarm homeund mailBtoahoe is andetbu' after a trng. One frer vhode \"8 i1 i lampant yurow eamm da.W Ano Fm rahL ng amymieo how 91 =ça en astronwilgi\u003e. oit W- ed. Aakfo orlasrlbaoem pan.anShar MiMpE LauIP 0, 450 U\u0026W\u0026 FRUfta Chm aalogr uaoer.Btiêrt fur g tour apiltodctory191e5-191e vlg ue otaron in» ova. r show CnaittodfenPelbrna snigfellr ordea teqct fr oudry dsigs I an \u003ce a toniseite Ilghtrieco hneaet fie.atceonde MANthe hmedAsmP 0,25atou. .ll Weitnnip tleg Th ti egm m1i 'Th 1 Beo .Pir th Res tht te ow bol tu ho hi al ti \"na oi if get",
         "The Western HomM.0»onthly Sunday Reading A Little.Sketch ~tthis troubied oid world needia Upof quibbling over creeds wdrds and boetter deeds. ~q-\"iia ~i s saWh you Sandio\" and. amy and do,\" jfo lrangiins ovor teit; .:Ot éree\u0026 and code, perplexed, -àf charity unvexed. o ~f shouting. \"I lalone gr the right to huri the atone,\" of etart that will condone. ~.o! ruling. \"ýHere; you must Mthis 1tenet, wrong or just;\" ofe patient, hoÉeful trust. iiof lmlcresecopie acan, ztài, faulta of fellow-man; r of brave, uplifting plan. Wof dogma, leas pretense, Meobeliefthat Providence itifles our eommon.sense. ieocf chorda of kindnesa blent, r, -the discorda of dissent-7 awill corne the great content. begoand to. do good,\" iepli, for him who woigld, :re htmay be understood. W. D. ebit. Build igher!0 (2y the Lato D. L. Moody) ~Whon fTwas ln Engiand they toid me ta bcd ridden saint. There came 4obirds and they ftew round a tree, and I?,Y,\"1Wand bye vent off and get smre hay \"d straw and began ta build a neat. »dthe bcd ridden aint said, \"Build j#ei.\" She vas sure a cat wouid de- tr0 the neat. She was tempted te peuiot a servant te tear it down. 6h kept îaying, \"Bnild hi ghber.\" 1 arn #iig te get peopie tobtiild highor. ake up. Yen viii be disappainted it yen don't build higher. Be rich te- . yard God, and ycu'Il be rich for ever. The neat vas bniit, and one day ahe sent the servent ont te ace if there vers any, eggs and the servauit found thom. By sid bye there was littie birds, and p.ery mroning, the firat thing done vas te look and see if the birds vas there. But one morni. the feathera vere sont- tered ail around. The littie bird, had been tora te pieces by a. eat, and the old bird was eirping hor mcnrning for ber leost ones. Man, what a picture in lite! *WMhat we want is te \"Ibuild highen.\" Then it wili be casier te live a higlher 1f e. I remomber hearing yoarm ago cf a T ich man being trickon dewn, and lie ent fer a iawyen to make ont his wiil, and lie went on willing away his pro- perty, and his young child didn't un- derstan(ý what death vas. She heard the father giving away the oid home. Ille vas wvilling that away. The littie thing seomed tronbled, as if he was going te give the home te mothor, and said \"Whero are yen?\" She vent up fo the bed, and said, \"Have you a heome in that land where yen are going te \" Oh, bow these questions do corne home te l!and how a chiid may ask a ques- tien that ne philosopher can nwr Pather, mother, have you a home in that Iad-that land te vhîch you are going? What a horrible thing it inuit be to be a Lbouseiess and homeioss soni for ever I Now, corne. Isn't it the- heiglit cf waadnos: for a man or veman te spond aIl their time down here as inany de, if they are going te live again? It seenius to me that a man must get that thing settîed; if death ends ail, let us 0eat , drink and be merry,\" and give up Our chîîrches and aur Bible. But, if man lB liflnortal, and geing te live on, let us got ready. ForrlProst Bites and ChiIbIains.-ý-Chîlblains COrne i:orn undue exposure to slush and cold r-.' fro't-bite from the icy winds of wiflter. ifi the treatment of either there is no better Prparaton than Dr. Thomas' EclectricO, 5 t c\"-- teracts the inflammation and relieves the pIa1ý'The'action of the oil is instantaflC- Ous an,, its application is extr.emeily simple. The Uncongeni» Tauk Everybody in the wvend has te do soule unoongenial work. Thbia one of the few miles in ife tao whioh there ja ne exception. Even thoae who are mes- ters cf their evu time, who are high in couneils of state, or wenid-famed for affaire or riches, do that wblch they do not like to do. Mr. Ga4tone dace said that the Premienihip o! Eângland meant \"three-fourths drudgery and one-fourth pleamure.\" The President of the. United States apenda houreinii the tedious siga- ing o! the omaileat Post Office appoint- menti. The preaidenta of great cor- pomrtions ai gh ai thcy aign their naines, heur after heur, W h 'ea To do the uneongenOai tuak is ai much ea part of daily life ai arc dul veather and dry seasons. It ie true that for nome everything they do-the whole tank -in unoonienial. One of the 9psddegt facto in our present industriel situation la the deriaive lauglter with whieh cern- panies of working men receive the. doc- trine of the jey of work. They delare that they know notig about ItL Their work appeaus only te, their neceaity, to make a living, net te their ambition, net te their sens.eo!f iid achievement, flot te their intereat. But the iference- theugh à lamentabiy vide one-is mainly in degree. The uncongenial tank in a part ef the Commea lot.--The irls Owna laper. TvO Sigilcan 8tatemouts The papons from the Cgpe just te hand eoatain reports o\u003ef tihe meetings of the. British Associ4tion vhlh have been helid in South Africa this year. 1'vo -of the. mimberé, Professer SIms Woodhoad and, Professor McKendriek, beth of them Weil known fer their vork in regard, to the mnedical aspect cf the drinkr question, vere entertained .to. breakfast a.t ÇCape- town, and botii cf. them' spokç' out atrongiy on the pathological effects cf Professer Sima Woodhcad said thst ho had been studyinir the drink question rather froni the phyica, and therefore' tram the economie standpoint thau trom the nmerai, and as ta medical mian, as one Who vas engaged in the study et ditsse, as one Wholi, untortunateiy, had te eso thé reanîts of disease procesaca, ind oe of these Who had te examine, as it ver., disease front its inception, ho bad corne te the conclusion that alechol vas one ef the greateit factors in the production of diseasein theie modern days, either directly or indireetiy, that we badl amongît us. Professer McKendrick aaid that aicohol had the moat petent effect on aur nen- voua system., It acted on the brain, and produced effecta vhich, at firat, were te a certaia extent pleainrabie. Tihe falla cy that alcohol gave attength 'vas almost explcded. They knew that it did not do se, and tihat the apurt vhieh zight be put on in consequence of taking aicohol meant the gain cf a certain amount? ot energy for a short timie,, but only at the expense cf the body itaeif. Many mien teck alcohol because they be- lieved that it vas good for them. He thought this tallacy had been largely expioded, because expenience had shewa ail over the woyid éhat a state of per- fect heaith and vigon might be maintain- ed during a long lifetime withont the use of alcohol at ail. Why he Did Net Drink The othen day four yonng mon vere riding in a car chatting rnerrily together. At last one of them said: \"Boys, I think it's time for drinks.\" Tva of them con- sented; 'the other shook bis bond, and said: \"No, thank yen.\" \"Whatt\"I exclaimed his cempanien, \"have you become pions? Are yen going te preacx? Do yen think yen vill ho- corne a risionary?\" -No, fellewi?,\" he re'plied, \"I amrnont specially pions, and I mnay net becomo a missionary, but I have dotermmnod net te drink anether drop, and I viii tell yen why. I had smre businf es in the city with an oid pawnbreker, and 'as I stood Art, W1be ml à . O Il lu a'y.a ,NFoto Aj- pie ai. doub M'bcy WESTERN IHOME Q~ From this date to Dectaiber-34,1M The blstory of, buge au r~I* ot\"* record a\"y quotatiou# t»ts from or economy even approacli Weekly Telegeaand'Tlz e, Irm ~ *M nearly sxten oth8 for nield . =tI said of WESTERN £ANAA'S GIIEAT WEEI(qlY as the valuie of both A=c DOWw w reader. The Farmers' Weeky Teegaon is eo I w ilynespaerwtth features w0\u003c tentua f the home d Te Fuan d Ijo lc Homoq The 1Poets COrnr,« Womë\" \"6Littie men and Women,\" shrt and sedu t Are-- only a. few 0f the my features that hveMud i*,e Farmns'Weekly -Telegram the Most poulr whIe newspaper published west of the Great au Taire advantage, of this Great 06er T-a *The sooner you order the more you ge USE THIS COUPON THE W19STERN HOMER MONTHLY, Whlpg, cuis4. gnciomed pisa find 51.0. Piessa.mail to my aUvuu9 hkm snpso DqoeO 31, 1916, The Parmera Wedly Telegram and The Westen lieiU.mOeth7,. Province ....... .. .......... .... .. ........... When writizig advrtiu pleae Mention TiS. WutMIS.lOm.M UMWP.",
         "p~oeq~Month\u0026V~ n 4 luimi ab 4 ponthlY-. 4M er\"u g iideslgn, $450 PiaÉ. te= in, suifine -condition; ellisg ~ÉU$0cash,. $7 onthy. 0.MIlSlON CASE, ALMOST i tce $400, selllng for $26ý. ?MU.PLMO-VUY ELA- 8 takea la excbançe, lnu tie à. Repiûlar price X500; br. Terms, $10 caah, $8 mozthly. N YER.PIANO-lUSED in.pOrfeçt order. Regua r 0 ~ g O witli tes r. PANO - $500 INSTRU- 4gePl6 ar7by leadng -unec 4g. ELUS PLAYER PIANO- modrn nmechanical I'~ ~1Is~ ptsaaly fne siese. tblcPiaqr.Terni,$4 $ 13 nnhy Ten roils of f.YER pIANO, A COMBI- ' 14t l*h regmuar, piano, player piano leck\" player, a $1,000' instrument, perfectly, uew, but was used for demonstrating puroses, selllng for $650. Terms arranged to 8jsl . l s l a home instrument and also a ,great attraction for cafes or places of amusement. 20 music roils free. ON1E VICTRoLA REGULAI $250, NOW $165. Easy terms. ONE COiLUbBIA HORNLESS PHONO- grsph sud 25 records. Reguar price $45, misae price $26. terms, $5 cash and $4 nonthly. ON1E EDISON HOME PHONOGRAPH an«, 20 réèords, used. ýRegular price $78, sale price $28. Terms, $5 cash, $4 monthly. EDIS ON HOME PHONOCRAPH AND 10 records. Diainond point reproducer. Sale price, $25. Terms, $8 cash and $5 monthly. WINNIPEG PIANO' COR SU PORTAOR AVR., WINNIPEG lbut *t thOe offl t Ji d r\"(1d It h. f0 Md Tie old pswu- o'orne heArt left htrnet to 8.11 your 'ta at home dead, y'ff- dI~i* edtfS l cs. usve me th 1e oe for a del.' \" New, fellows, I havé 4,wife aud baby IIT.~. at- home mysee, sud..when I saw what .-odido. lu d.rngthat hua- \u0026tu wold verpas* My as gai\" UIes p'es\" \"Lif e,» says, a character in one of 'Mrs. Auella B. Barr's books, \"ba\u0026 a, maybe, in er ng, e ar;smaybe- that is just a# laikelyto please luas- not. I will -talcs -tii. i-ybe. -Ma-ybes ha\"e a deal to, do with life. When you co me, te think of it, tisere le net a ýVictorY Of anY iud .gained, uer a good ded. doue ex. eept on'a, -msybe.\" How true it.la - that mauny of thse bur- de»,undr wichwé,'w are iniaginary oùfte, sud often'vo cro stihe bridge b.- fore we corne te it. Suppose we \"1tale thée maybe\" aud console ourselves,;its tise thougbt that te.morrow, whîeh,*w. .dres 1, ujust *sMlkèy 't», bring us sa joy as a-.orrow. .UThrege rnsny \u0026,hip, 'twlxt thse cup sud. the . hp,» ' vorepeat viti, .sigis, meauing that thei. phessures for. whIhW. - long are -hikely te fail us; but ;vhy not take thei.ot her vie-w and thieltisai 'ulybe\" the. griefethh v 8411,sIpfeWin et, rehi-us after ahi? MIMAe bas'a aybe in everytbing\"l; le fi net sol Thse cleudt -are ferbidding, thse rain dreary, sud iV is easyte feel depîessed, but'wby net 'keepî a brave beaut, foi \"maybe\" tise sun is'hiding just behiud thse darkest cloud, and it- will cheer us -with its heorious 11f e if w. only gdwait a wee.\" .W. werry over saeme- tisiug wiih seems particularly bard te bear; .w\"y net rémember that thse \"xnay- b. lejust as likèly te please us As net-\"? W.é like te hay down ruIes, sud then expeet everythiug ln 11f e te conform te them; sud w. thiu'k that things must b. wrou if, tiey»àÔ not conte lu our own way ani at our owu time. But w. fre- qu.ntly discover our mistake when thie fairest gifts w. receive are like a sweet surprise, for they come at an unexpected time and lu au unexpected manuer. SW-e are fend of making plans for others as welI as ourselves, and it lsaa great shock te find thnt others are noV always ready te carry eut these pet plane of ours. But \"maybes have a great deal te do with lif e,\" aud others are entitled -te consideration as* well as ourselves. Is it net thie best way te accept our thwarted- plans with a. good grace aud emile with those whose joy mneans aur disappointMent? \"Maybe\" the. rough exterior which r- els us la only a mask for a lovig heart; \"maybe\" the frowniug face can b. turued inte a smiling oue if w. speak a tender word; \"maybe\" the road whlch ie rugged will net b. long; \"maybýe\" the trial wiih, eema se unnecessary wilI teaci s the very lesson which we ueeded the. mest; \"insybe\" God is trying te show us the best way ta serve Hi-m when lie closes the door Vhreugh which w. wish te pasesud opens another in a different direction; \"nisybe\" the roughest rond wi11 lead teatthe fairest goal, and the. darkest night will b. the. prelude te the brightelst dawn. -Shall w. net leave al in our Father's haud, trust His love and wisdem, and take \"life's maybes\" as He sends them? Women and ýAsthma. Wemen are uumbered amoug, the sufferers from asilimal by thue countless thousands. In every clixmate they will be found, helpless in the grip of .this ieleutlcss diseasc t'nless they have availed theniselves of the proper remiedy. Dr. J. D. Kellegg's Asthma Remedy bas' brouglut new hope aud lhf e t many such. Testimonials, sent entirely withiout solicitation, show the2 enermous bent-fit it bas wrought amoug wcmen everys here. Dye, -DepI. 1083-, Jaco, Micb. Naus...... ................ . dra........... ............ I-......... ............ in * '-7.,----- j-., - - - - -* V IfYeu Caq't smoç 'L. tii. vestibuleetofa -eeràai hespital -VIsi1ý \u0026Mee card bearmng thus advice: 'Niveïr .utter a. di$eourâgiùg Word while yený are li tishospitaL -You ahould coine lier. «Sly for the pûrpoSe cf help- in., Keep your hinderxng, nad bokls for other p1ces, and if you can'tMlle d0t go in.\" \"If \u003eyon don,'tamilè den't go ini\" It in good advice for other than, hospital -vlsitors. Who in beypnd the. mmnIçry of akidly smile? It in atonic to the dlucouraged. It helps the, littie child for whom thie world holda Bo muoli uhat- makes afrsid, and it checrs the. qed who inds life unspeakably lonely. AS Klngr Arthur's court was built by musieý, 00 tfe happier- 1f. we ail hunger forisere upon earth in bulit ini large part by ,the cheerful faces we %ce as we bear thie load sppointed for us. Siniles are as ind-ispengsbbe 'Lea true succss' luhf e as mouey, mind, sud might. As long as a man aea msle hi. i.net'beaten. ýZet in, hospitala only, then, but in the. home sud on the street, there lu s acal for thse kindlysunny amile. The. wayte have kjtei t, get i thse heart rlght with Ged, and then turu, -thée eyea te tise igbt,ý for the emile that helpe in the omile of heaven-kindled joy aud hope. Our Lives' Commentarles \"'As a father pitietis hie, children,' is'tei most people, a very swèet snd comfort- ing illustration of God's care, I suppose,\" eaid a thoughtful womau, _one who had known an -unhsppy aud: unfortunate childhood, \"but for years I could not bear te hbear those words, and even yet they eallU fr 'me no picture, of ten- derness. My father spoiled that text for me.\" Ou-. ives are cemmentaries, whether we will 1V se or net, and oh, -how many a beautiful gospel truth we may mike empty sud void! Som lives thrill us l1k. a trumpet caUl. There are persenailties se full of cheer and courage that' thefr very presence disipela glooam and doubt, aud arouses te effort and hepefulnessý' they make faded ideals vivid, again, and \u0026Hl high endeavors worth while. It je net se much what they say as what they are that is a ,mental and spiritual tonic, and there in the truth that touches us a]l. It is not tie opinions w. carefully express, but the lives we uuconsciously lýve that gauge eur power in thie world; not oui words but our atmosphere. Eacisoeeof us eau be filled te tthe fuinesof our capacity. That will mean, of course, that seme who have more ca- pacity will have r.jre life. But tht '(a- pacity itýelf will inerease, and w-3 shall grow able te, have more and shall have more. ChrWstmeans t-) batisfy us, and the\u0026 te 1rcreasa our poN.i \"rasosethat it .wiIl require more te sâatiify us. Very 'Near to Heaven We are very near to e eiie When the wond'rous snow-flakes fail; When we hear the rippliug brook, In the woodland's shady nook, Or the wild bird's tuneful eall. W. are very near te Hleaven When we bask ini sunshine bright; When we se. the steadfast stars; Or when cloud their brilliaucee bars, In the darkness of the uight. W. are very near te Heaven ,When we others' burdens bear, When in friendship's fervent clasp, Some poor brother's hand we grasp, And with him. our bes't w. s-hare. We are very near te Heaven When we soethe a troubled seul; Seek the broken heart to bind., And with tender touelh and kind, Strive te niake the wounded whole. John A. Offord. The Christian lif. is the 1f. cf Christ withîn us.- It is net imitation of Hlm. It is net our effort to be like Him. it is His owil divine life at w ork in us. '1 receive it by faith, and we keep' it by faith. This is the great truth of Paul: «'I have been crucified with Christ; and it is ne longer L thnt live, but Christ liveth inme. T. Try My Drafts Fme Get rld of your Rtheumatlsm with- èut Medicine and -~ - without risking a pùâij. Just .end this cow. Re- bringyo a Regu- lÉrDoa Pair of Dyer'u FootDraft. -fresh fromt my I laboratory. These 4 simlple but- Power- fui drafts afe so sure. to bring \"s qulick relief in any stage of this r' ~/, .cruel disease, that I gladly s en d theni without psy i n advance te0 ? eeysufferer I Thousands of nien Fsuu'xDIEU. and women have Correpndiig 0! written me from sUl parts of the world that my Drafts cured thern after aIl other means, *including à.- pensive doclors and baths, h6d failed. and even after 30 and 40 years cf -cruel pain. If you are suffering from Rheumatism I want to send them to you To Try Free. Just send me the coupon. Try my Drafts when 'they c\u003eme, and then if you are fully satisfied with the benefit received send me One Dollar. If not, they cost yeu nothing. 'You decide and I, take your word. You can see that I couldn't possibly make you this offer if I were flot positive that my Drafts are better and surer than anything clae you eauSget for any kind of R h e un!atisnl, ITac£ iwi where located or how severe.à My Free Book, illustrated ins coIors, ex- plains things every Rhettmstle seeda to know. Send to-day for- this Free Book and the Trial Drafts. Address Frederick Dyer, Dept. 1039j, Jackson, Mich. Send ne meney -just the coupon. HOW I KILLED MY SUPERFLUOUS-HAIR 1 Cured -Il Q.iokly -S. t . Nover Returned Evn Aller Bauty Dos- tos, Eleotricit and Numerous Delitories Fald 1 WILL TELL YOU MY SECRET FREE \"Prom deep despair te joyful satisfaction was the change irt MY ( , 'N feelings when 1 found an- easy, metkod ,te, cure a distressinglF bad growth of t' \\\\ Supcrfluous Hair, af- ter many failures and repeated disappoint- I ws-il1 send (ab- - te any other sufferer full and complete description of hew 1 cured the hair se that it bas neyer returned. If, yeu have a hair grewth you wish te destroY, quit wasting your money on worthless poewder*s, pastes and liquids, or the dangereus electriC needle: Icaru from me the safe and painless method I feund. Simply send your name and address (stating whether, Mrs. or Miss) and a 2-cent stamp for reply, addressed te Mrs. Kathryn jenkins. Suite 380 B.H., No. 623 Atlantic Ave., Boston, Mass. FREE C UPO Tis5certificatseen The Western Home Monthly te Mrs. ,jenkins' free confidential instructions for the banishmenit of Superfluous Hair, if -sent with 2c. stamp for postage. Cut eut and pin te your letter. Good for im- mediate use only. Address, Mrs. Kathryn Jeukins, Suite 380 B.H., Ne. 623 Atlantic jAve., Boston, Mass. SPECIAL NOTICE-Every lady whe wishes te bc rid of the disfigurement of Superflueus Hair should accept abeve offer at once. This remnarkable offer is good onIY for a few days: the standing of douer 15 unquestioned. *Wheu writing advertisers please mention The Western Home Monthly. MM lu enhe OnM and",
         "The Woetepn Honte,. fontlY- 1 un and, ,*Oo Thmfà ouest Cold aokaohe Neurnigla Lumbago lph*hela' $Oro. Lune@ RheurnmUs ad Mo Jointa ?rederick b. Pair of b1e, New i offe.r id of yu didane and, risking a Just send ou a Regu- Wra Pair of Foot Drafts front My Dry. Thaese but- Pewer- fts a e 50 to, bring c relief lu ige of this- isease, that lly sen.d ithout pay vance tao sufferer I ear of. ads of nmen omen have Sme from raft s cured .uding ek- failed. and fi pain. If L I want ta Just send when 'they tisfied with Dollar. If decide and ee that I offer if I are better as can Set %vu\" \" disbae on. sul..Procied icur neeî onare ý\u003cwth he n ress \"Urc cu the in, ol=ardPort Ih aou theh isae. i f ieus. tinne. Wl»ee th-Ji nt C iat ten ed.vaion mmbdWbe oled or tCase bdo . foradvi e o uini *~~e theS dn~ i p eserbp. tilw si Smtthe D SSower g o s CI SIt, ENan PlUS whicbla a certolf it i.r or dLes alvsed tnd ii.t \"0 * ttoint H u e a d Ke. Cb dn ot1e for u.- Ine 1 Bi tes o.\u0026 . a l rue s.lut I1 lad ea ,th. ee Trde M ark fo r ï Bu Pftci :M. ee Le. Popared byaLBEt. Aberai Nus. 7 PulflopStreet. Loqgoa. Eguiim\u0026 YEAR'S SUPPLY JI 0 O NME 0F MAGAZINESI SYOUKN W h hu-Urser0' ould be iOi fe Smpecoy ftheir Mgzn fthey 0*knew your addes. Ila Ur business ta funiseh Publiers. ny with the namnes of intelli- -im-sazineTea=cs If yo wllzt -ar fuli ]MY ISVETplain aend us OLy 10 cenlt- galBiver) or moneyorer we wilI send your %515Cta several hundrdpblishers within a yeaýr, Who will send you IRS smple cpies ofhundre e vral hnrdo hmte lea 'gStadar !mes, Farm Papers, Poultry JOurnas t Igane, Reviews and Weekly Papers, Mail* er Tde Publications, Housken Magazines, Isshion Jourals, Ilustrated Magaz'nes and in fact abut al kinds of higli-grade intere*tin mgaziié Cangta you in moset every mail for over a year Liiallfor ONLY 10 centsa i zvor). WE-DO-AS-WE-SAY 80send a silver dime at once and your name Will Son our next month's circulating list anrd you will PatIy surprise4 et the resutes as we aure YOu thtYou will be more then WeIMreaed witfl the amai investmnent. And you WL NYERre- (li t. Address the Magazine CircUlating CO.,, UXI 240, Boston. 1J.S.A.Circulating et.1001 .r 'Tfil ta wr ite TOR ful address 19XTRA plan. TOE-K O (MFORT SIt la a general remnedy Ràu=- 1for corns, tired, sweaty feet and ail other foot troubles. 0 Trial size 25c, extra large size 5oc. Free sample3 sent on reCeiPt of five cents postage. Vermilyea MIg. Uo Calgary, Alo. Fdot-Komfort Soan) Granules and Foot-KOxflot Po'ýider hould have a place in every homne. In8jst oni the trade mark. An applianee or remedy lfor cvery foot ailnîent. Sold at drug and shoe stores, or by mail. Smut I4evention We are glad te believe that smut, both in. wheat and oate of isat year's crop, was a good deal below the aver- age of previous years. But there is stili enough risk ' f taint in amples of seed that to superficial observation look quite dlean to make it very de-' sirable that precautionary measures should stili be used. By keeping at it for a few years mor-e we may almost succeed in stamping out the taint. W-e are glad to learu f rom the wholesalers that there has already been a pretty extensive Bale of both bluestone and -forma1in, and wbile we are about it wo may urge on. those who have not. al- ready ordered their bluestone te send in their orders at once, as no more will be ordered by the trade this year, and it willý be \"frst cerne first served'.\"1 For wheat either fdrmalin or bine.. atone wil1 do;. for oats formalin is. very mueh the best. There are always Borne who sec no use in fussing about tuila point, but when they reach, the elev$6 tor next fail there may be a decided An Aùmisu tio Dslry Raid mJU change la thein views. To avoid unt- pleasantness then, it Je'aiser te take a little pains now, the remedy is se cheap, reliable and easily applied. Mcn withi large haadling and pre- vions experience hardly necd te be told how te apply smnt preventives, but for the sake et thouqands of aew read- ers who corne la every year we give new directions fer bluestaig on a amali -acale.. if- the .w.heilVj»a dcean look-_ ing, and bluestone is only 'used as a safeguard, thon 1I L.of bluestone te 10 bushels cf seed will.be enough. Dis- solvei it la a wooden pail with warm water and neduce with cold water tilt yon have about _two pails of solution. A ceai cil barrel cut short, or a cern- mon tub, may be used te mix in.. Twc pounds of bluestone and four or five pails of water ia sncb a tub is the right thing te stant with. Now put in a bushel or se of your wheat la an open meshed sack, souse it la thé tub a minute se as te wet it thoronghly; then set it on a close board sloping into the tub se as tô let the liquid run back inte th~e tub. Then empty the sack on the 'barn. floor to dry. -In that way ail the seed for. a. mall farm can easily bc treated. If the wheat shows smutty make the solution a littie stronger. When the formai is used it shpuld be what in the trade is called' a 40 per eent solution.' It is the; only sure cure for oat smut. Abr either whoat or oats 41/ oz. forînalin la 10 gallons cold water will do te soak 30 bushels cf seed. Soak a few minutes if for oats, then drip aâ before and lay the seed on the floor la a heap. The gas formed in the heap wilI kili as well as if the seed liad bèen au hour in the tub. Next day: lay' out te dry, or it ry heat. Fol, wheat one- scuse latm u before Iaylag out la enôugh. The g9.\" fo*med la the heap ia sure death. totie' amut. Once seed- 'a sdry ltmay lie, a mogth or even a year and be as good asif.l sown the day after it bas been treated. Plants fmom Cuttlngs Most of the planta adapted te cul- ture la the window garden are eauily' growa- frein cuttings. if proper care is taken ila the.,slection of the otig 'A branch of sucob -recent growth that it is seft and julcy ia noV good. mate rial. Neither ila a.branèh se .o Ild.la. bas beceme 'bard. and woody. betweea these conditions, -la \"ha~ medium\" , whieh should b.' mongt .,fer Bend*.tfe ,branch youn.think et rni akJÊ é uttin« of. If it breaks off jfbarply, it àl tooyeuiig I-f it does not brek et all, but bénds wthout lr rupture of itis bozk, i l aeo~l *taual if it, shows a tendency to both break and bend, but does neither, it is mate to use it. -In making cuttings trom , however, do-zot break, them. by 'us4u force, but eut themn' off with' a r' kaife, niaking the cut an oblique one. As a geýneraI tbing two or three Wahs will be about. the r ight length. Çât, off the lower béaves close te the stalk, but aljvays' leave s'ome at thé top. ý Geraiunmsa ad many., other- planta\u003e cmu b6roote\"easfly by aettiag - cuïtings inite soil about thse oUd., plants, -but the afet and urst . method for the amateur to follow, for. al planta, is that of rooting the In. sand. Any shallow veusel wil answer as a receptacle for the aand, which, should be dlean and rather course. Have it about twe in*ches deep. Before put-. ting aýny cuttinga ln it, wet it well,' then insert the cuttinga, pinehi fIV firmly. about their base. Make nt 'a point to keep it moist, ail through. This la important, for if you allcw it te dry out yonr cuttings will be nuined. As evaporation will take place napidly, because et the perosity of the sand, yen will find it necessary to watch it carefully. IV may bc neceq yto apply water twice a day, andV~rhaps oftener, if the cutting box or tray lu kept in a warmn place, as it shonld b. Vo insure speedy and satiafactory ne- suits. If in a àunny place, cover the box with glass to retain enough mois- turcý to preserve that humidity of the air which' is of great- benefit Vo the cuttings.1 As a general fhing, most cuttinga will form noots ia from a week te ten days. Spme of thc harder wooded cnes will require a longer period. Yen eau tell when they have roots, because ncw 1 w uya o b , i ti v eb1ook o f a u b Ir,0 iad my \"psy-wheO plan.\" Dr.ami NaWm Licensed -PhyrncaaAt York, 36 Eaat Tid - 557\u0026W M MII\u0026 UV . kgê w$ Absorbine mad Abverbine Jr. m m a\u0026 ela Omeds Abôuüt the Farm [.Mo»e besOm Seeda te Book and rick Dyer, no money It .Nover erous IET FREE leep despair satisfaction1 ange itr il hm I fou% .method aO listressingly owth, of ts Hair, ai- failures and disappoint- send (ab- re and obligation) her sufferer 0W I cured urned. If ta destroy, ss powvders, Oua electric d painless r namne anda Miss) end d to Mrs. No. 623 icate en- reader of to Mrs. -ions for Hair, if Cut out for imn- Kathryn Atlantic ldy -ho irement of bove offer good onIY f donor is msenilftiOft",
         "~tt~u~ot ~ nMabh,.ud w - jtê boe i~ Out k~r W*~VUBT i zwp 1h bUrnous 70U w rd.ed judgment of 'Artisa, the uWo jlz0e exéiec thi.* U\u003euaçi P hll fa dezen, anrd that tfié .U n t*aae ~1eM standt ouIln hoa rlie Cmnad's firet Md 1Lersastls Piano l»Ot . - . A GODUFARfi WOR.IGB BIucher style, 6 Inch, tan or grainu, wlth heavy solid leather rfl setviceable boot that you c.i kIýck around\" in. Will stand heavy wear that cornes to a farta stili keep its good appearance ait term of service. This is only onc of our bi 1 dmoid leather working boots, \u003e adapted for Farniers and Thres W »ZE 01CATALOG\u0026UENo. es. coetalning our tkpecialized fines of reliable SEQES, CAPS, SWEATER. ',1T, XRS etc., direct tram the Manufacturer to the Customer. #re ab\"ouft.y beyond the reach of competition in Canada and every thehidgheSt quflty'and unsurpassed value. Gooda sold only on \"Cashi basas. flux UoNTGrJIrERY.WARD,.CO. 0F CANADA I Cana\"'\u0026 Groatent DIrent NI\u0026-OrderIpllzWty Heu.. Dg ýieve4, l bëputforth. - ut ýdo -not ütii. m sd for a .fort- nb*t. Lav ora h étire UrItitheir 'r\" - bàib emaae oonsid*wAbe glow*b Taremonlug ~uu1 tdégstc \u0026Mi dlgturb lth., 8\"n imidélicate OS\u0026 ýone, wtb 'aai* kr fé 1-M\u0026 1m out ý lté Squr\"-of*.a ôt W rtatlinV thé rots~er ttb gwthodt ,braktngi i apé*tfpOéelH à, potrésady to redéli I, dprêts, the. souitightly aboit Il inbea il la ln place. Water wdll £iid set It An sahade until it has taitéà hold ci thé sou bhy extend4 gilsý rooté lâto It. Ue émail pots at fiet.* ---Méa, 1v.iliooled .erutîingaare 1lont. fté po 1 là bèeaune hey are put luto ;\u0026t dPiJlItesolarge fore thei. ~e'a. lii. a tis:Usé'sinait pots foI~amai plaita mishift, le largor sIse oné aétheroot11i thé old one\u0026. Thé cnation of the roots u b. as- ettaluUd bh, Iirerting the pot and top- plnglit1alinst aorneth4 ghard., The là-irwll lip oit- easily, and It cart hbé returned t. the- pot wlthout, the .ditturbanc of a r*ot.-Exchange. 9« i iais on pou\"tw ýh ostý profitable part of poullry alu ir,\u003cpwomen àa lhe production of eg»ùLor sale. For tlé -average womaun b.a b hem.te look afler, 1he __r i nda on the mnnagerumit The etz of feeds and feeding, metlb *ryv -prominet branch -ocf the .lnaa aiOà n.SstiaI is abso- l ute1r1meeets1 là, aidai' tegel the g»attt ossbleprofits. l'or leavy, e j .production a, mixture éf oode la nebmary. :Clilcien. need lh liefood. âÏe ý eXater sheIle auabeh sedud, Itbie fçnii oflime seema te sfly serve the p~urpoge aboutt b. beal. Il is iblise agopl= b\u003e ;brealc 4the mhel1a up fine uikeop # quityýbétorëe iS fY4 or hens sil of, tfie Ibe Sud t bo a.»r th\"il, lâee mortar A'ma bzoen . ânmtone wMll anwer the '1rés fnot no muoh auuginluhi. kln\u0026 tood aathereIn lthleway lu wblê 1ls geen. Jeedlng -utensils ahoûld hb~e bi oten. D ovide U nklny vessels and eround bone la valuable to feed dur- ing the molting perlod as it supplies fealher-building material. À. good winter feed ise untbresbed millet. Generally it doesinot psy le keep a hieu atter the la two i'ears old. À. A puilet hatched iu April or May W ER S sbould begin te lay lu November or Decembor, and keep on until bot c\u003eo'r weather commences, laying about frein OO T 10 to125 eggs. A reaily' good ben, well fed and housed, the second season will lay 5 fron 150 to 250 eggs, but after that bher egg yield will ual be profitable. blacle' oi There are, of course, exceptions bo this soles. A rule. an literally 1 keep smre hene over the second' id ail the i boot and winter for breeders and others for ter a long mothers. ýig lne ofSome bens will not mother chiekens articularly but the poultry woman will learu ber shers.matronly hens lu a eason. Keep tbe young poultry as they are almost en- IS, GLOVES, tirely f ree from disease; mdll your old r.Our prices pultr excepth e fobrdig rarticle is of po r'ex h ewfrbreig iwith Order\" There are twe ways of keeping track of their ages. One le lbe web punch LUM ITED that hakes a amati round hbe. luth. )*Pt. wthin weh of the foot between the toes. MAITOBA The otîjer rnethod ie by means of metal leg bauds. Tbe punch le the surest and the eas- lest. You eau make one punch bole this year, two next year, aud the third year goes without. System le very uecessary lu the poultry l)usineýs. P~EOE . lerbert Shearer. If Miller's Wormt Powders needed the sup- port of testinionials they could be got by the thousands from mothers who kn.,w the great virtue of this excellent medicine. But îlýe powders will speak, for tlhemselves and in such a way that there can heý no question of them. They act speedily and thoroughly, and the child to whomi they are administered will show improvenient from the first dose. tllztplthqOt*BUUwsex- p. ~ b.m Igt iginuet .ul- lelIworthy - the - M0l01i 4fal ex- 'p4exuimta1 épwem cf ap pealnu beM.tryig14q'.. z \u003e09 the. aoret of th*, ,miust 1.egsl brdns of 4p1o tr.sinul*riular. Hne'got Pr*4nssor acuubn161lutkiJ fdrm arè4d 4 aritI io wid rep- tr6. w*ère' olleocte\u0026i ted houe \u0026gain Z dlii, thé e' % 6 halves df the t .hrWitt te\u0026 i-b ' themnleiesand th eider' portion f 1he lme l',wigs alà by thfemaelves. Tlrî; è ienta *Wme, réeea eg iesI U l th mni\u0026le of May, and In «.vry musassm- lea resuita followed. Port ectly h..rdy trois had fWe per oiît lIes. water ini th* rtwigwtho'n li .of' .nertaln baCInea\u003ethe peroe#tâgeof twater r= n u etci roportion te the hAri ta f b rsen.- Nerit-fait the couqrisnwIl _hç tarted lu. thé ýfail, butf mn»time hisa .bulletin has been, lsiÜod to induces frit growers cime- viiero te give attention -to the ques- tioc. As Prof essor 8hutt himeli notes: \"Ha4~nsmor 1h. ablllty of the new rowth to paso the winter without in- jury, le a very important considera- tien when *electing varieties for a commercial orchard TUi a noitheru lati- tude. The term, naturally, ie a rela- tive one.- Ther,.-rre ong varieties of appe,,i ell recogzed degrees of hardines(and even for the saine vsriety 1h. bardinensmay vary accord- ing to the severity, of' the winter and possliy certain other factors, e.g., the location of 1h. prehard, tho oharacter of the so11 and the lime in 1h. autumn at whieh vegetative growth ceases. Il is thua seen, that while bardinema may. be, largely an lanhedted i it, il1 orrethat May h. infuuedb eviron- ment.\" The. saine principle afeéots al vetable growth iu climateasuscb as ours. Grain ripens more slowiy on some soila han on cthers, and land that ripena ils-crop alowiy at firet will ripen thein fauter as Uie goes on. Il '5 the osais with lhe -ripeing of twigs on ail kinde of Ire.. The Farm 61ilIs Opportunity In a talk with the farm girl James J. Hill says: \"'A young woman who applies herseif te tbe study of what'farmlng really is and goes at it with the saine intelli- gence she would give to achool-teach- ing bas a freedom of life bef ore ber which no. cboked city. can bestow. And: il is gratifying to me to se. that many young women have corne tb a realiza- lion of Ibis, for we fl.nd tbem lun lbe agricultural colleges, studying dairying' and catlle, golnq out inlo lbe farm work; and opening succesaful benner-, ies and squab enterrlses, and even directing numerous irrigation enter- prises where fruit ie te be cultivaled, and the sbeep a«Éd cattie are to follow. No city iu lbe world eau be pros perous unIess the farme are Wh~ you contemplaI. turning your ba f~' the farm bt enter uponl a lite you do not understand yen are putting away from yourself a pot of gold, to say notbing of the lost contenîrnent and freedom of lit e. .-i The study of the ehemniýal (produie- ing) values of varioue souls le one of the best pursuits a girl cari take up.\" Mr. III then tells this experience of a farmer's daughtcr ln a north-West state. She had ambitions to become a practical fariner. Receiving ber grain- mar school education , she formed the acquaintance of a teacher who bail the wisdom b ,point out to ber the excess in value of farm over city lite. This teacher gave ber elementary and advanced books on soit chemistrv, and bad lier address various, farm aul- tiiorities the country over on import- ant farm.topie.Step -y step, as this girl gained the information she desired, she begau to fele more secure of lier Star the lt4 thos the pai AI a are mak then tion j * be and Non oies they hum then A the with The and lie awa, h. ] begt aniln Ileav watE cleai Mian to Lk rel. When writing advertiaers please mention Tbe Western Home Mon hly.",
         "ex- Sbul- ail ex- l our Iâ*t in t lhis eret of xdiness 31é got ifùm kd rap- raliiess. L' tuoe. \u0026pinu of the. s and - 'twige itietiti Iithe. issm- hardy bter lu loettaln wàter bo the aIl the lieý fail, s been s else- ques- notes: le new )ut in- isidera- for a; n 'lati- a rela- arieties eca of same accord- er and .g., the. aracter tutumn Bées. hi go may. 1 ft là aviron- etsl ail ich as nly on d laid It will on. hi F twige 't, James herseif maly is intelli- 1-teacli- \u003ere lier F. And, bI. many realiza- lu the. airying, D farm henner-' i even enter- bivated, foiIow. -sb~ Thp ~tr OêMnbL living animaile doy. is tO 4v No, b.u od Ti.os.jhuditb inatter how Uhrd pesd~ simgplae rm )aes deer, rabbit, aqirrel 'or otier purely 'beg1v032 tO 1behious terrestriai animaýl may Y, itwill re- xwes l eg tted; Observé whetwbeh main above water. But,'the\"'mus§krat,, steoor bites *heu tii.. glrth, ie however, the bear, and pthersdive i -I im tg4n He ebpiald b. dives Wbis mediaet.-ubioLedger. aî~»Édxanxe-siiigeor doIb1e 'if if 'you wouid know 'the value of a \u003cr'4rlvng -and in * cet or w,i i o dollar, try to borrow oie. he1ywrkTi.reu hul Do0éasý%tô deermuae iniether h. 'un a Wfien .BuyIsg a Hese bard oi tender mouU4b1and to,-nMebhW - ~~maInuer Ci lwpdnding to;e ii.puLAie if 'you are bu i2a. horse.neyer bc Observe wete îe suesor frljhtes-et satisfied'that iie is horoUghl sound or etrangis objece when beixig hitched te servioeble until you bave seen him i the oart. One should be. ertain tha\" action. tuhisMt due to improper fiting 'bar. In mild cases of stringhait fa.ulty \"osa . b4ore re.eting hi.m. à tiglut-fit- action is observed only upon the etart or tMng coler may make the. difference bc- backing. The feet loui .b. picked up tween a pire\". acting animal- and one t6' fhow how the animal will stand while that la wholly obedioumi\u003ek suffl Iba aef tliroa.t W t aid. the. bau t. deteeti bgadbrt ~t tba. h. could W f\u003e hîer 1aid ýmotfer. aIk e tb.m 10 ve lier control ~.a4e~çrn p14 of the at 'zot thIïved. She asked -iht ici une nmre of hier n.w t.'hig corn acreage had ýnever r\" peO!y P ow ed atid., after. sced- le cutivâtôn U been given it. *ëeldeci t1uI±1-one bugheils of t. 1è'. ac, and, onie 'season, ,44e bushels of oats to the acre. soil hsd been perlmitted to at the. wrong geason of the aid the. acreage was steadily de- inl value. The girl believed twas not iu the soul but in its Takiiug a farmhand, ah. hadl the plowed six inches deepi Sep- * She watched thie plowing ber- -to se that every. ichi of ground evenly turne\u0026 and- the au b-soil broken. The fied was then lef t selgf untithe f olowiîg spring. Ahle spring it was carefully gone. a gainfor plaîting, and seeded ta As soon as the crop growth ap- etii. girl took lier 'loue helper, 'ecultivated the -feld. 'e saw to it J bat the rmots of the,. ernoinjure . She kept the. sou brok n and the weede out. a week ,til harveat that field was for, and the. yield was a gain of steen bualiels per acre over th% aid lii. father aid mother thoug~ this 'ty good, but the girl kept She te, fertilize lier soil ancltoro- eropa, until-she raised s corn crep ixty-îine bushels, t the acre. -Tihe ne of that particular piece of Imi 't up thirty-flve to forty per cent, the. girl practicaiiy denonstrated' aa woman could mianage- the laid, gtthe higiiesi resuits. gAny. younig woman who lias abilty hto gain coîtrol of twenty acre\u0026 Sfitr farip laid, taken f.romn lier or bouglit from others eu. ween lier books andiher common se, wrest out- of it, such a comfort- $beliving.as no city worker cau ever oj The opportumity ls one of your t h one of long and liard experience, mit me to, say frankly te you-the tY jet not calling you. It doca not vaut you, it does not îeed you. The ety'is not suffering for lack of. peoplo or brains. Its great hunger ia for food. Step to the. back door of your home. ,Stand 'on thie step and look out over the filds that have not liad ane-haif «hé attention tliey deserve. They are e4lling te you. Tliey wiil reward you. Mýd for what you do lu this wise, those of the cities and thc places where the marte of mnen make confusion and pain, will rise up and cali you biessed.\" Swlmming Animais Aimost ail animais know liow to swim without having to learn it, As Ooon as they fail into the water or are driven into it they ïnstinctively Make the proper motions, and not oniy In4nage to keep afloat, but propel themselves without trouble. Excep- Mions are the moikey, the camel, giraffe and Ilarna, which. cannot swim without ---assistance. Camels and Ilamàs have to b. helped across water, andt giraffes and Monkeys drown if they enter it. Now ind then both of the latter spe- oies mnanage to cross waterways whcu they are diven to extremities, just as bumai beings occasionaily can keep thenselves above water througii sheer friglit. A funny-' though able, siy*iimer le the rabbit. He submerges hism body with the exception of head and tail. The latter sticks away up in the 'air, and blis hindL legs make \"soap suds\" as he chuîirs the, water madlY to get away.i But with all lis awkwardness he is a swift swiminer, and is oniy begten by the squirrel among the land animais. The squirreî swims with his Ieavy tail sunk away dowî in the water and his head hed higi. fHe cleaves the waves like a duck, and a nan iii a rowboat has ail lie can do to keep ahreast of thé swimming squir- rel. Oiie thing that noie of the laid VES-the gt New Edison witb die. new Diamoxn S ichoice of all the brand newDiajtond Amberol Records will beem yoJ-0 out a pwiy dowa. 'TIi. fiSes4 est that money can buy et vcry arch i6 et whch imitetions of the genuine Edison arc offéred-a btam . Mr. dsn'O Amongail his wonderful inventions his pihonograph MI'Mr. He worked for years striving ta produce the moat perfect p1 Qic produced this nçw model, and now it wMllbc sont ta ou S on e Siirtbng X( Rock-Bto Direct Offer If you wish to kecp Mr. Edison's superb new instrument, Heur ai thelaetw4d0 sagk send us oîiy $1.00O after the fret trial. Pày the. balance on the . *nmLu ut 0 easiest kind of montlily payments. ct. ag iitiç~s~pa4i Tbink of t-a $1.00 payment, and a fcw dollars a month t\u003c, from Iaughing at thÉe funffic 4 gtthis brand new style outfit-the Diarnond Stylua reproducer, Entertain your family and your th musical quaity-the.same Diuznond Amnberoi Recorda-. friends with everythinrfrom ail thme muscal resuits of thme higlia rc ultsya i.get Grand Opere to Cornue DuS est value for $1.00 down, balance on esiesi mntly termes. Vumfe-hni,-o Convince yourself-afree trial first I No money downno C. o. D Vueileteni not oie cent to pay unies. you ch.... to k..p the ixitrument~ chocse, scnd it back. Our New Edisont-l#M Your naine and address on a, postal or a letter (or juit the a- coupon) is enough. No obligatîon in asking for the'catalog. Get this off er-while this offer laats. Fi out coupon today-now. F. K. BABSON9 Edison Phonograph DIstubut.iS Departnft 7407 3» Porte Ave., Wi.dpeg, Mas. U __ $tut\" eOffice. EdOce mm14 Chimmu, M you do ~away te , Bay nt and* produe- one of k. Up.\" 'Zene tlh-west orne a Sgraml- ied the lad The SexceSS nentary ýmistry, rm ail- import- as this desired, of bier",
         "Thê Weete~n Home Monthly By EBathAÀ. 1Fh \u003c'What's pour name, saked ibn ligger lu a pal: Ber te, . nw -oyi a.,ho1 lb.guisshi doren th \"i? u 0 wk muchý of Er frOm muTanI! 1 . \", a Frenchy, -are yu Otb,,\"u' hé smn.d ii otratger rather centemptu I~~.t nuchgood at hpguags. ere, one of shu.,«feteh .up that 'n yow.g lCd*ardo; T want bh paiY-vousing.\" YoungPeopfle VU OTsi, and flnd out i I t afiw fellow ridlah buany cake in blé trunkfu,\" rut ln an- rdlay ther boy suggestively. \"My trunket ba.vént côme f rom the station yet.\" young 'un, \" 'Mère, Edwards,\" crled the dominéer- tronzing man- lng Jagger, as a pale, delieate-looking lemned againat littie.-lad was thrust forard through hoe firet day of thé crod vhlch had collected, \"air -1 sha'nit: bite your favotite French a bit, and fid out 1tram Ibis Monsoo chap if hé will joi 'nglesh-t arn the bail team.» Very shyly at firat Bertie Edwards ,ou?\" said the' beÈan hi, questionlng, as thé others the dark-eyed stood laughing and glggling behind hlm; nougly. \" 'Well, but soon récovering hie coinposuré, had talking, pur thé new-comer's history; boy bis name Fou chape, hé vas Emile Lé Grand, and his home lu 'eekly bourder,I Paris tilli hi. father dléd, when hie iim te do norne gradfather, who li'ved lu thé country, fad brought hlm'here. MeH knowi nothlng. about basiball,\" Bertk uplained to bis -a.ud1mnoe **ha\u0026 a««.r-aeeu It played, iand -\"' .\"WeIl, that seittes l Il\"J'agger burat lm. 61 guëssed hé was a. bofty, for hlm ueck-tle la made like a,, girl' bow, and his hair stickg up ail oveç' like a bla.ck- ing 'brush. He'll do for your chu, Edwards; you don't play games êituer. A pair of sof tics together. Ha-ha!\" A\u0026nd off walked Jagger lu, séorn. . A Jagger's words earried a gooddeal of weight in Dale House Sehool, it was pretty generally t-jught -that Emile was not '\"up to much,\" as the saying goes; and for the first few day., at any rate, ho was lett sa good deal ta, his own éompany or to that of Bertie Edwards, a. studious, sensitive littie lad, whosé health did not permit~ of his joining in any of the rough game. \"I say, yen fellows, Higgins' crled out one afternoon, as he came running toward thé bail ground, where practicing viiplw ,«you .houldgo Inýto the m anl See thatlIfttle Mousoo chap ZgUrn about on the roes and bars. Edwarde and 1 have been watching hlm. Ue'sa.a perféet acobat. Hc'll take it out of you, Jagger, at thé hlgh jump,\" Higgins addéd, mischlevously. 1. \"WilI hé?- We shall sec,\" the other exelaimed, not-over-pleased. at thé sug- gestion.- \"It' takes pluck as well as activity for that. I doubt if thé littie Mossoo, bas much of that coinmodity.\" \"'Yes, hie ha.!\" a Bmall voicé ex- claimed, rather hotly; ani 'turniing, thé 'boys found, to their astonlshment, a littie champion for Emile in thé shape of Bertie, whosé usuahly pale face was now fiushéd crinison. \"Why' his father was an aw-fully brave soldier.\" '«A fine lot yen know about such things, young bookworm,\" the bigger boy éxclaimed, pa.tronizingly. \"Well, get out of the way; and, Hliggins, you take a turn at batting now.\" But it wae soon genérally recognized that Emilé shoné ,in thegymnasiurn; even the old drili-sergea t compli- ménted hlm; and day- by day the for- lor littié Fiýeneh boy began to, make friends amongst hi\u0026 class-mates, tili an évent happened which. at once placed hint ln the position of the moat popular boy iu the sehool. It occurred in'tis .way: One Saturday night, just as thé sup. per-bell had rung, a report wént through the sehool that _â, large haystack or a bouse was on fire about two miles dis- tant, and the blaze from it could be dis, tinctly seen from. the playground. A rush out of doors followed, and, sure enough, away acrose thé fielde a thin column of smoké, on which. a lurid light was thrown evéry now and again, was plainly visible. \"«It is lu thé direction of Mr. Edwards'a house, I arn afraid!\" Dr. Crammer ex- clalmed.. \"Déar, dear! and the néarest fire-éngine la at Blackton, fourtéén miles away. Bqys, ve may hé of hélp,\" ,the kind doctor added. \"Each of you get a pail or a can, and corne with me ever to thé firé.-» Nothing could bave pleased the wbolé school better. 1 doubt if ever the gooi\u0026 principal had heen such a popular mani as hée was at that minute, whén easci boy, armed wlth anytbing capable of holding water that hée could lay bandi on, wa7s following hlm to théeosene of the disaster. As the party dréw near they quickly discovered that it vas, indeed, Mr. Bd- wards's bouse whlch. vas ablaze, and thé idea that their school-féllow Béitie might bé ln lt-for, being a Saturday night, hie vas at bome-added to their alarm. \"llow kie o f you to bring hélp!\" Mr. Edwards exclaimed, as lhé burried fow- ward and wrung the doctor's band. \"You see, the weet wing le getting almost b.- yond us. Form. l ne heré, boys,\" lie called, \"and pase your buckets along as quickly as possible. We have plénty of water, I arn thankful to say, and it ean- not surely hé long now before the enginés are her.\" Everyoné worked with a will, and it. gave hcart to ail when they saw tha.t at last thé fire was, diminishing. Thieiia terrible thing got whispered from onc to another in thé crowd. One of thé childrén *as missing, and muet hé soie- wheré in thé burning building. '*l ain't seen Master Bertie nowheres,\"p a stableman rémarked. \"He sleeps in onme of them top mons, ton,\" hée added, pointing te a floor just below thé blaz- ing part. \"Bertie!t\"-thé name caught Em ile' ear. \"Jagger, take you, please, my bucket,\" hée said, in his broken English. \"Played out, aye you, Mossoo? Wcll, band it ever, then. Mossoo'a in a regil- lar friglit; he's as wvhite as a ghost.\" Jagger said to the boy standing next hini, a s Ermile disappeared from his place ini crOwd of helpers The fire once more seemned to bé gain-- ing ground, creeping a*nd licking its wvay along, fillin g the place with thé ghastlY fiv'Lering glare, and crackling and throw- ingr out showers of sparks, which went floating and twinkling.awqy amidst thé curling brown smoke iùto thé night. Anid lmow hard everybody worked, passing i ta toc; 4t4C mA 110Ws RESOLVED THAT Th.c B3TE1POWNSTOCKING IS A1300N rO M'oTH E RS A ANA4P FOR L5ANTA CL-AUS For Hard Wear Buster Brown Stockingu are made to stand-.the tost of rough and tumble play in which eve r hy boy-your boy- spends'half hieu' rne. Buster Brown stock- ings are tbe greatest wear resisters ever mýde- the strongeat, long fibre cotton, specially twisted and tested for durability, with thiree-ply heel and toe, well knitted, well finished and fast dyed in Blaclc and Leather Shade Tan. No more darning if you buy Buster Brown Stockings. (£Wman-ï#o iitto iinj £am*Ia4wt. tu oeauab ~amitrnt * (!ntartix MILLS AT HAMILTON AND WELLAND., ONTARIO A Also makers of the celabrat\u003csd \u003c'ttle Darling\" mnd U[ittle Daisy\" Hosiery for Infants and Chidren Girls, Too- Suster Broesu'aSister's Stockisg for the girls la a a,îlendod iookdi atochlng et Amoderato price. two-throa EnçUlsh morcerized lis stockimg. that s shaped ta fit and muars vory wei lIudeed. Coior-Black, Leathor 9hadei Tax, Pink, Biuo and White.",
         "The Western Home- ifont hiy -C0omstatly '.ubIed With Boils. NE ON HIS ARNS AT ONCE. dock Blood Bitters ,URIED HEM. di Imt the amC chap ma, bars. ling hlm. take it hl jump,\"' liO other the eug- 'well as the littie imodity.\"1 oce ex- ring, the ment, a ho shape face was is fathier ut such e bigger Well, get )u teke a Bcognizea inaium; compli- the for- to, make , tiil an aced him uIar boy the sup- through tk or a ils dis.. d ho dis, ind. A nd, sure e a thin rid light an, was 2wards'a imer ex- neareet fourteen of heip,» Of you with Me ie whoig the oil ilar mani hn eaeli pbleà of y handi sceleo quickly Mr. Bd- and the r Bettie ýaturda.y to their Ip! \" Mr. ried fei- l. \"You Mst be- \u003eOoy,\"~ he aong au flenty of it enl- fore the 1, and it i tat at Theti a rom olie B of tie be sonme- wheres,\" ps in one e added, th blaz- 1Emile's bucet,\" ? Wcii, 1 a regil- t ghost.\" mext hima, place ini be gain'- its waY ghastly .d throw- ich weflt iidst the ght. AnId passiflg i IVit'monde of * W. Have t. *Writeus and mention your wants. WMERAt SPICIALTY CO. Box2704. Montremi. Couett UEfg la auD h( ACHES 'mous ndPAINS vanish quickly after applyiflg the powerfilly efficient anti- septie linimient Absorbifle, Jr. Don' t experient-use Absor- bine, Jr., first, which Baves tilac and mnoney-nIY a few drops usually required to do the work. D-oerthinafully expected Of a igh.gradl)Ui. mnet a)ia 1a dlta)n;apsitive ,eptdind gei- eide. lis qge,,jcia poitie aeo v erietmt- and agai by Compe ent cherl aboratorÎes anid Il Beb*trra gerielde mkesAbsrbiiii, Jr., 1ý-h-1111llidtoicute, braises, mores and wodeltiile the gtr1«.Liîîiak's the wZound aseptil and proinote apil Ats proinptly in aiiaying pain and reducug a[Isp-11111 «u renriies AIIr,, r. *le pureiy herbai, and tlîereiorCe lf' t-i me i, '1, ,ýe »It 1.4 a riSO pieant preparatiouitd\u003ce8 nt tirea riae a greas ,residue. hAb' i, J r.,le eold y ieading drIggist\".i t $1l «O hotbe0 lrnt direct postpaid. l',rnfltor A IERAI TRIAL 80111E addreseSuRl«eii '1'tO I0.li s end for trial botle or procule rcguIar SIze il, i ',ur drugglst to-day. W. Y. YOUNG, P.D.F 509 Lymnans Bldg., Montreai, Can buckets and saving furniture, when sud- denly the doubtful whisper became a terrible certainty; Bertie was missing, and the stairs Ieading 'to the west wing were now ablaze. Just as titis fact was known, a face appeared at a window on the top floor and a cry of \"Ther e ij! \" went up from liose working below. A laddexviras quickly placed,against the house, but, alas! it did not reach high, enough to be of use, though Mr. Edwards stood on the summit wvith out-' stretched arms. *Then the horror of the situation began te dawu upon everyone. .Suddenly the window was pushed open, and a boy's figure, without coat or waist- toat', was scen upon the parapet oufisMe, with soenething heavy on his back., \"«Mossoo! It's littie Mossoo! .And he's g'ot Bertie! \" a number of voices eried, as a bright blaze showed the pale but f rm face of Emile perched up in the danger- Ous posfition.. Then tbey saw him peer down over the tonework edge, evidently trying to judge how near tbe ladder reached. It wa seen. tha14AýIr. Edwards was telIing Iidn what to do, and everybody watehed, say- ng 'to himsef: \"But what can be done 7\"., Our Boys'and Girls A well-known minister who bas been travelling in America. eays that one day his attention was attracted by a. crowd of people, and wben he joined the crowd -we nover can help running te aee what is the matter, cau we 7-he fotind that they were elosely watching a man in the centre. And wbat vas he doing? Well,'he was sested on a box, and. was pa.ing po- tatoos. Nothing much toe e there, you will say. But the~ minister *atched him losely and learned soenething. .After carefully paring a round, smovbh potato, hoe tuck bis knife into -one end of it, and slowly moved it aroixnd, xnak- ing a sore of curved incisions. Remov- ing the knife, lie again. xnserted it at a dîfferent angle, and made another *dries ofecits. Then lie removed hie' knife, anid pulled ont a part of the potato., What lie bad left looked like a white muse. IHe stuck a toothpick into -the base of the artificial rose, tied en imita'tion green leaf te: It, and dipped the tarved pece of po- tatô iute a rail of rod oeloirIng matter. Reinoving it and shaking oifMthb bsurplus 441 gifféred for mu 'eMr wlthf terpiblk 1nuiiestion a4fd Censh\u003eiWo. became thin 1'and' mise l',iebd frequent disa. p\" u aý-dbèoei o- run down that I nover, thought 1 wouid get n'ellagain. ,\u0026 nelghbor adv ued me bt y 'elt a-tives'. -I did no spd b hie iuzpr 7lo cf my doistor, 1Z bega b mprove aa\u0026. 1. --adviied.*m\u003ctgo on wimA'~tg~f~ 1 contntted this me4lcIne and afi m relieve4. 'I Conalder that I owe M Ni'le tb Fmut-\u0026-tiv«\" \u0026Pd I waat ho aay *4 those vlao sufer fom- IsdigeatONý Constipation or Heqtdaches. ry 'huit. a-tlve'.Gi*li oèyrimdka a/air chah«e ud you will tet Wu1.the \",e sI dld\"I. COM\" EGÂtD1ZA.ý .At ail dealers or oet.'poalpidb Yruit.-a4ivea 1MSité, Ottawa. Puiends an WO \"It -worke ail right, Bertie,\" Eruile was baigt is friend. \"'Look net you anwero, only hold you tight.\" Then quickly the boy turned himsef round, and, with bis human burden hang- ing on for dear lif:, lowered hirnself gent- ly over the parapýet toward the anxious father -below. The crowd et\u003cood motion- less. Weould the boy'ls muscles bcar the strain of sueh a weight. Lower -lower-yes, 'another moment Mr. Ed- wards's strong 'arms were round his son and lis preserver, and a loud and pro- loîîged cheer broke from. the excited crowd below as, -with his double burden, ho dcscended the ladder. Then up dashod the fire-englne, and streames of water were seen directed upon ýthe flames, and ever-ybody worked with such renewved energy that in a short time the i-est of the building wvas declared safe, and the Dale IHilhl boys waiked home again-al but Emile, who, at Bortie's e'arnest request, was left behînd. On the Monday anorniflg, however, when our hero appeai-ed hurry-ing up the drive the whîole achool turnod eut te meetiiim, andl, much to Emile's aetonish- ment, in a twin1kling ho found himself 5liouidler higli, and then, on the backs of tie bo\u003e-s, and, amidst real YarýlT:ee hr î'glis. -as earried inte the schooiroom. Durîig\" th--iuortiixjg recess one of the firrit to corne up te our hero %vas.oJagger. 'I sl\u003couid like to teach voit hasebali if yuou would let me,\" lie said. \"I wouid bc so glad to learn,\" replied Emile, looking very pleascd, \"if yen- thought I really could.\" \"Ilather!\" was ail Jagger found him- self al-le to reply-ln'tlie thou-ht a deal ~roethan he \u003era! 1. dropa- of celer, ho hela up to the won- dering gaze of the crowd a red rose. Ho was making roses out of potatoos 1 Now, I daresay snany of ny littie friends who i-ed tdis coiumn-and I seem te know xnany of you quite well already -would like te get a nico dlean potato and start to carve eomething like a-rose out of it. But there are many ways in whieh 1 want yon te try and inake roues out of potatoes. If yen do not'undor- stand, perliaps father or mother 'wiiI ex- plain w-at I mean. There arqý many commnon, ordinary things whieh you chil- dren can make very beautiful, if y ou only try, and some things that yen find very tiresome can bo made- quite deightful if you deterinine to turn potatoes into rosee. I amn sure yen wilI remember how Jesus, who was always illuminating coin- mon things, stooped to wash Bis dis- ciles feet. A commen task may be- corne very beautiful. A. famous man namned Booker Washington toele how hie once went te an Institute and aaked for employment. Ho was told to sweep a room. Ho saye hie whole deatiny was wrýtpped up ini the'sweeping of that room. You sec,,lho was xnaking a rose out of a potato, and, the resuit wasthat hie was given a good stàrt in life. We can all do the saume. Has niother ,.sked you to dosome littie errandlaJ your school lesson a littie trial te you? Well, ti-y your best to turfi the pota.toes inte roses. When you grow older, you will learn how truc it is that Earth's crammed with heaven And every. common buâh fatuo wlth Ged. Englieih Composition Essayst -Lefttr Writinq i. D. A. Eail prepared on October 1, to sccept a lmije number of pups for tuition by coereupodeuce., Thê e r4o- tion imparted by Mr. Evanm la ~Iot -of eteregSyped chsractoeltio. h.~e sotusi TremuIent of every studet ame oare- fulyistdid.Xod\"ettue. C30Z 76 CrVStI Cty, MMOn . Tade Marke aa~eIa Wiefrbookist mdOlOUm *etc i. FeatberstodaU k\u0026 c». tJerald 8. Roubugh \u003eEl.8. sSe- 10Dsa\" bi NOVA \u003ee rweefgA» WINNIPEO 'THE LABEL on your paper *ili tel whe your mucrptooexpiru. Seud'lu your renewal NOW 1*' 49 CAME ý'TRUE lldois are caused by bad blood, and s ý'ë*ss the blood is made pure you cannot ýi^'t t get iid of them.a aiOntments and salves will do you noat 0ViWyymg medicine such as that grand g îâZ remnedy Burdock Blood Bitters. a )Àr. Samuel Buckler,, Tataniagouche, fi ~TS.wtes \" Last summer I a 0 ~otnl troubled with bols. I had .=. on ryarms at once. I thought it si Scaused frorn bad blood so I got twob i b6Utès of Burdock Blood Bitters, and \u0026 ~'Iioee the first bottie was done I began -'M Sfeel a great deal better, and before tdhe secnd one n'as finished I did flot kàve a boil, nor have I had one since. \"A ccnnot recommend B.B.B. too highly.\" *Burdock Blood Bitters is màxýufactureç1 only by Trhe Tr. Milburn Co., Limited, \u003c1'oonto. Ont. jA Woman'si Sympat-hy Are you discouraged? Is your doctor's bill . b.ayy financial load? Is your pain a heavy \u003ci pyalcal burden? 1 know wbat these meari to delicate %vomen-I bave been discouraged. Me; but learned how to cure myseif. I want toi rilieve your buM~ens. Why flot end the puin and stop the doctor's bill? I can do this. *ir,,youandwiIl if y ou will assist mie. Ail you nmed do is to write for a free box of heremdywhich has been placed in my *bandaý to be Siven away. Perhaps this one bQx'.will cure you-it has donc so for .others. If o, I shall be happy.and you 'will bc cured 9«,et2c. (the cost of a postagc tamp). Your lattera -held confidentîally. rite to-day for ~fr treatment. MRS. \u003e E. CURRAH, WMiDOR, Ont. \"'I 'e.- t s \"'t 't, «'I 's s, \"s, ~4\u003c i mas",
         "The Western Home.Af onthly Yv ,,4 ed teMad«ny.to more MM e,64,ýq#the n.w modlela., Sur- PIS*- ae owi4edwith ae- 000 r are marked by diot'$ïpldy,. Gathere flouices wu tvh .#es*s gare seeanon- many nê o4r.wels.,, Reversing the .ýeera1 -de-, ero f 1 ùwMhn wbieb 'shOWS aa-in wibt on \u0026ê*iney skirt, one sonancy I.. wýt wltk th l iplest of skirt styles. ' ere'aêtwo 'istinive -types0 o 0f ~sgly-totre boy1 sd oanghti at the wlinea wfth' a ireular flaring shirt joined. at ithe- front and aides. The other styleof coat in looes itting and lna plendid. f\u003eh sports, motoring and general wear. - Tiat of the fitted type in beat'for dzsssy wear. A good- feature le the convettible collar, sud a amart feature is the LouiS XV pocket. Velvet, broadeloth, velour de laine or zibelene. are good materials for these Prineas effeets .and eue piece frocks are styllsh this seaaon. But there are likewise* semi princessa snd waist of- fets, sueli as our grandmothers may 'have worn, with flowing aleeves, over undereleeves of soft white material. Many of thie faîl one piece froeks have simple lines, depending ou their style for smartnens i eut and finish. The waist with pepluni, separate or as a part of the waiet, la shown in the newest models. Among the new waist forme are many with deep oval open- inga, filled hii by a front closing chemn- isette. Three-pieee akirts with Patchi pock- es eare smart. Street clothes for youug girls are of varied -style. Belted and looesftting jackets are shown;. nome with separate body and skirt sections. There are girlish slips lu simple chemise style muade up in serge and trimmed .with taffeta. The slip opens in a \"V\" front, and ile fluished with a smart .ollar. The froek le lengthened by a circular flounce. Draped bodices are shewu on dance and evening freeke,, with underbedy eut with low neek aud. short sîeves. I Blouse and mid4y styles are eharni- Ing and plentiful for1 growing girls. There are new dresses for little ones; somewhat lu the order of the oid Gab- riele drese,, m\u0026dp with front losing and té gathered guimpe of white lawn or batiste. The return. of friiled waists le hailed with deliglit,.because these styles are s0 beconring, especialiy te siaender, youthfui figures. The- neweet ekirte show flatÈ fronts, and baek gores, with the fulness ad- justed at the sides lu plaite or gathere. Boys look very smart i the new Norfolk suite and Dickene coats. Empire coate lu velveteen, corduroy, cheviot, and gabardine are nice for littîs giÏrls. The new Quaker collars are meet bu- coming lu their demure simplieity, and help effectively te brigliten up an oth- eie.simple waist or gown. 1441-A Cool and Comfortable Negli- gee. Ladies' Dressing or Houes Sack- This style has, pleasing-liites. The yoke and sleeve' portions are combined and joined at shoulderý, centre bnck, and undàrarm seams. The body portions are full and gathered te the yoke. The fuinees may be conflned at the wist- line, witli a b elt or sash of ribbon. Crepe, lawn,' percale, chale, cashimere, batiste or silk are excellent inaterinis for this mo del.. The pattern le eut luý 3 sizes: Smali, ý'medium and large. It pequires 31/ yards of 3à, ichi material for the mediun ase. A patterni 'of this illustration mailed to , any address on receipt of 1 0e. lun silver or stamps.. 1445-AÀ New ami Deconrlng Model- Ladies' Dress i Semi Princeas -Style wiih Sisove in Wrlat -oi, Short Length- Stripsd poplin i gray toues was ussd in this instance., The style je ngw and up to date, with its priueess front and flare skirt portions. . The sîseve in wrist lsugth lias a. straigit ouff. In. elbow length the cuff finish je lu turu- back style. The skirt portions are eut lu, gores and joiued te the panel front. the back forme a box 'plaited panel. Serge, taffetae cashmere, mixed suiting .sesrsucker, Cheviot, gingham r eae are ail goodt for thie style. The pattern le eut in 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 indce bust Ineasure, and requires 8 yards of 36 mcnchinateriai fer a 36 inch size. The skirt measures about 3%~ yards at the foot. A pattern of this illustration mailed to any addrcss ou receipt of 10e. ilu su- ver or stampe. .YI .Waist 1443-,-SIirt 1450-A Practical Styliali Design. Compnising Ladies' Waist Pattern 1443, and Ladies' Skirt Pattern 1450-The waist and skirt have new and attractive lines, and are suit- able for combined or separate develop- ment. The peplum, a uew style fea- ture may be oýnitted. ou the waist. The skirt has five gores, 'with ample fulnes and fashionable flare. The wai 'st pat- tern le eut lu 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches bust mensure. The skirt lsecut in 6 sizes: 22, 24, 26, 28, 30 and 32 inches -waist measure. It wili require 33/ yards of 44 inch inateriai for the skirt, and 21/? yards of 36 inch -materiai for thc waist for a medium size. Serge, taffeta, poplin, satin, flan- nel, wool mixtures or nevelty suitinge are ail good, for this design. The skirt' measures S3-yards at thé lower- Odge This illustration, calflor'.-two separatE patterris which will be mailed to any addres on. receipt of 10c. for each pat- 'terri ln silver or stamps.- 1% 1451 -A Simple Attractive Style, Girls' Dress with Chemisette having Convertible Coilar, and Sleeve i ithei of Two, Lengths-BIue serge with trim- ming of soutache brald is here shown, It may be. combined with red or blue in a lighter shade or with white or tan checked suiting, novelty mixtures, gai- atea and ginghamn are aiso good for thii design. The chemisette is, adjust- able and could be muade of lawn, or- gandie, batiste, lace -.,«9ý ,e\"nroidery. The skirt je a six gc*gmÔdel, witi plaited fuiness at the panels, and the aleeve le good lu wrist or elbow length. The coilar may be closed high or rolled to form a deep neck opening. The pat- tern isecut iu 4'sizes: 8, 10, 12 and 14 years. It requires 4 yards of 40 incli materiai for a 12 year sîze. A pattern of this illustration maiied te any addresseno receipt of 10e. 1436-A New and Becoming Style. Ladies' and Misses' Basque Costume, with Two Styles of 0'ollar, aud with Sleeve in Either of Two Lengths-c4ray serge could be used for this design, or brown broad cloth, with collar and cufs of satin or silk poplin. The inodel je aIse, goed for taffeta, voile or erepe and lends itseif nicely te ail wash fnb- ries. The lines are graceful and youth- fuily bocoming. The style offers sev- eral variations in neck and sleevc fin- ish. The skirt â 6 gores and le joinedte, the lo ~dge of the basque. The pattern lse u in 7 sizes: 3 sizes: 16, 18 and 20 years for misses, and in 4 sizes for ladies:. 36, 38, 40 and 42 inches bust mensure. It wilI require 511ï, yards of 40 inch material for au 18 year size. The skirt measures about 33/ yards at lower edge. Size a8 will require 61/8 yards of 40 inch materiai and measures 41/? yards at its lowcr edge. Fashions ,,and Patterns ÀM«Ml Ordu. pa TtenopmtanontThe We.ternHome Monly, Winmpeg - 1~- '' i .', 'j'. B.,A pattern of titis illustration mailed ;e to any address on receipt 'of loe. in siu- y ver or stampe. 14»8-A Neat Dresa for the Growing Gi-As here shown white serge was eombined with black.and white checked 9 suiting. The style ipfiseie for galatea, r gingham, seersueker, linen, linene, or -percale, good for lawn, batiste, poplin, ior repp, and aise suitable for taffeta, i velv'et, velveteen, corduroy, flannel, iL novelty and plaid suitings. The right -front of the waist ie shaped at' the r closing. The skirt je gored and plaited. -The siceve may be finished in wriit -length with a etraight cuif, or in -elbo'w *length with a jaunty turnback cuif. à The pattern is eut in 4 sizes: 6, 8, 10 eane I 1 years. It requires 81/1 yards of 1. 40 inch material for a 10 year size. 1 A pattern of this illustration mailed *to any address on receipt of 10c. inu, sui- 1ver or stamps. 1453-A Practicàl# Desirable and Ser- viceable Model Patterri. cjat for Girls. This style je excellent for ,,heviot, serge, tweed, lihen, cretoline, silk, lin- ene, or repp-The fronts are crossed in reverse fashion, and present a smart and stylieli appearance. The eleeve haz a neat cuf finish, and with the higli closing at neck edge, the model wili be fine for cool wcather. The pattern je eut lu 4 sizes: 8, 10, 12 and 14 years. It requires 3 yards of 44 inch materiai for a 10 year size. A pattern of this illustration mnailed te any address on receipt of 10c. ln silver or stampe. 1454-Ladies' Coat with or without Yoke Facing-This amart design je lovely for broadeloth, serge, eheviot, wool mixtures, tweed, taffeta, velvet or corduroy. It would look well in' blue or green broadcloth with velvet facings in self or contrasting color. The fronts are lengthened at the sides below the waistline; by plaited portions. The back le plaited. Back and front are overlaid by yoke sections which xnay be omltted, or, if used the material be- neath may be eut away. The collar closes high, with a jaunty quter por- tion, which could be omitted. The pattern le eut in 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 luches bust measure. It requires 23/ yards of 44 inch material for a 38 inch size. A pattern of this illustration niailed te any address on receipt of 10c. in silver or stamps. 1431 -Ladies' Apron with Princess Front-This desirable model lias shoul- der strape that extend over the front and form deep convenient pockets. The skirt portions are joined te a \"Prin- cees\" panel, and are flnished with a beit at the waistline, to which the straps are attached in the back. This model le good for gingham, sateen, cambrie, iawn, percale or drill. The pattern le eut lu 3 sizes: Smar, xnedium an~d large. It requires 47/s yards of 27 inch mnaterlal for a medium size. A pattern of this illustration mailed te any address on receipt of 10e. in sul- ver or stampe. 1449-A «Unique and Attractive De- sign. Ladies' 8 Gare Skirt with or without Trilming-Broad cieth, chev- lot, mixed suiting, serge, voile, taffeta, faille, poplin or velvet would be excel- lent for this design. The side gore are s fitched over the fronts lu tuck effect. e fronts and back portions are ln- lshed te forni inverted plaits. This model je aise good for linen, gingham, seersueker, chambrey or eorduroy. The pattern is eut iu 6 sizes: 22, 24, 26, 28, 30 and ý2 inches waist measure. It requires 514 yards of 36 inch materiai for a 24 inch size, which measures 3% yards at the foot. A pattern of this illustration mailed' te any address ou receipt of 10c. in sil- ver or stamps. 1457 -A Popular È'ractical Style' Girls' Dress with Sîceve lu Either of Two Lengtýs-As here shown cheeked gingham was used, with white linene for trimming. This design wiil develop- nicely in serge, plaid suiting or wool mixtures. It is aise nice fôr linen, pique, linene, velveteen, corduroy or poplin. The fronts are flnished with siot tueke underneath which the clos- ing may be affected. The skirt le a four gore model with a charniing 66grown up\" flare. The pattern le eut",
         "The- Western Hogme Monthi y ion mailed loc. in sil. e Growing serge was te checked or galatea, linene, or ite, poplin, or taffeta, ,, flannel, The riglit ed at' the nd plaitèd. ,in wriât r in *elbo'w back cuif. 6, 8, 10 Syards of x size. ion mailed loc. iný sil- and Ser- for Girls. r \"di,çeviot, ilk, lin- crossed in a smart sleeve has the high el will be pattern is 14 years. i material rn of this ,ddress on ampe. r without design is eheviot, velvet or Il in blue 'et facings ['he fronts below the M. The front are 1h nay be terial be- he collar uter por- ed. The 4, 36, 38, asure. It Smaterial on inailed f loc. in Princess ias shoul- the front ets. The a \"Prin- with a hieh the ck. This L, sateen, -il. The [, nmedium rds of 27 )n mailed Oc. in sil- ctive De- with or th, chev- taffeta, be excel- gores are ck effect. i are fin- t. This gingham, roy. The 4, 26, 28, sure. It iaterial sures 3%s n mailed, c. in sH- i Style' ither of Schecked te linene 1 develop- or wOOl or linen, Iuroy or ised with the clos- irt is a charming Il is eut Rd She tWai*M. Send 4e- now for sample Cake -large enough for a fuil week of any of the. Woodbury tetet eo.Wt it you can begin at -once to make go ur skinwhat you wouid loveý to have it, Once you haàve the week's-size cake shown above in your hands- once you have its soft, white lather in your fingers as the girl above has it in hers-you can begin that moment to really change the con- dition that is keeping your skin from being attractive. You can do this-can make youir skinwhat you want it to be- whatever the trouble is 110w. Your skin, like the rest of your body, is changing every day! As the old skin dies, tzew forms in its place. This te gour opportunitu le that new skia which is forming every day going to 1 maee or mar your com- plexion? With the cake shown above in your hande, wîth its creamy lather in your fingers, you can begin to make this new skin so strong and héalthy, so active, that it wi11 gradually but surely talce on that greater clearness, freshness and charm w$rich is but a promise of the radiant, velvety complexion-\"a skia you love to touch \"-that the steady use of Woodbury's always bringe. inî-Write ou'for- the. wek's-uim e e oW b~ S~py .4yu name and addreus with 4c (il îlstmpe or coin\u003e)o*aabus~vibIw $eond-On this page are four pf. the -famiou*,WoodbM ytst~aswk* have brought to «thousanideof people- thei.caM cOf\"' asia oIwtooî Chooseethe cone uited to the.asa-\" Of yoaw AUiis4 foilOW It p mItewityUiU you recevyour week's-size calm. ft will bdng yous i 8 0M u wY, M wÇ othertatgreater, attrctivenaÀ you have 1ofiw ï tor 8is dwthddifa. w un For 4c. we will tend yon the. week'm'%,8 k*@t iý e~ shown aboye. For Ide., samples of Woodburrs Ptoil 5a, Powder. For 50c., a copy of the Woodbury Bock, \"A kia To3 o Toill, and samples of the Woodhury propaiuionm. *Addresa The Midrew Jergens Co., Ltd., 657 Sherbrooke St., Perth, Qnt. Let your mirror tell you which freatment to use-N Go to your mirror 110W and examine your siin closely. Look for iny rough places that make your skin appear sçaly when you powder, for conspicuouS nose pores, excessively oily skin and shiny nose. Perhaps your skin is tender and sensitive, or sallow and coldrless, or unduly tanned. Whatever condition you find, il can be changed. Which treatmnent docs your mirîror tell you your skin needs? To correct an oily skia and shiny nose FIRST cleanse the akin tisoroughly by wash- Ling, ia your umual way, with WoodburY'i Facial Sont, and lukewarmf water. Wilpe off the surplus moisture, but leave the skin slightly damj,. Now work up aheavy warm water lather of Woodbury's in your hands. Appîr it to your face and rab t into the pores thoroughly- always with an upward and outward motion of the finger tips. Rinsewth warm water, then with cold-the colder the better. If possible, rub your face for a few minutes with a piece of ice. This treatment wiil mnlke your skin fresher and clearer the frst time *u use it. Make it a nightly habit and befare long you wil1 gan cam plete relief fro;n the embarrassmfent of an oily, shiny 5kn. To reduce conaplcut\u003eus noie pores WTING a cloth fromn very hot water, lather VVit with Woodbury's Facial Soap, then hold It to your face. When the heat bas expanded thse pores. rub in,. eey gently, a fresh lather of Wood- bury's. Repeat this hot water and lather appli- cation several times,s.topping as once if the nase feels sensitive. Then finish by rubbing the nose for a few minutes with a piece of ice. This treatmnent wth Woodbury's cleanses the pores, strengthens thse muscular fibres so that they can contract properly. But do not expect ta change in a week a condition reaulting from years of negtect. Use this treatnuent persistefly. It wiil grad- ually reduce the enlarged pores and cause them ta contraýct until they are inconspicuouo. Note:I If you want to begin ai once-lonight-to brin g t your skin the charm -Vau have ion ged for, tear oul ie illustration of the cake above and put it in your P-urse as a reminder to ask for Wloodbury's today at your dru ggis's or tilet counter. A To Tou* a îaffu,,coSMa. Iegs Suna r~Porwashdloth ia very warm «ter Mdl .LJhol Iutto your face. Now take the cake o Woodbury'5 Facia Soap, dp it in water m rubthecak-isof oerour skln. Leave the ruih cayke s1over fonor a few minutes until the skia f drawn and dry. Then danpen the skin and rab the soap in gentiy wth an upward and outwarfr motion. tiehue face thoroughly, fret la tegid water, then la cold. Whenever possible, ru the face brlskly with a piece of ice. Always dry carefully. This treatment with Woodburys cleanses thse poes, brings thse blood to thse face and stimu- ates the fine muscular fibres of thes kin. Try it tonight-sel what usoft color kt brinpi to your cheeks. ht acoth la wim. latbeof W.odbwly'le dloiJ upa\u0026M dowa lit Unail ther:b ao witlv tbe \u0026t. whlte lathor. Rub tu# yOVEt yor l thepomaM1tt Mlghy wth .tuWt cold. About once a weekra4ùtolas rth a plece of ice. AlwaYU dr s.u1 This treatzmt will b£ eet to a tçnder skin, mnake it ftsistantt af=d ep It attrative. Try k tonlght. YOU wiRl W lthe dtrnc ipimedlately. 25c cake is sufficient for.a imonth o'i wesofayoftetemnts gvm bere. Get a cake ioda y and begin your treattnekrt tonigt You usiJJd W..dbuw.S Faw Soap for sale by Canadian Drtgg\u0026itlfrorn Cous a#4ACm$- .1~ I - '/ ll i :",
         "1u~sizsi , o 8anud. \u003ey.ars. I reuM 8 yards of 40.lc atra auiwdiess on rselpt of 100. in The ahedi iXmitbaa of, a nu 4IIeU\u003e O or. Sirt-Plaid suit- ~Dd\u003c ine onnavms ufied rW It la nies for. serge, rdllus, oaaimsre, li nen, pnbse, voile * aM 1poplin. bais sipleMUes ,sud ',is Sa déep côiar.,Tii. long atrait oue, wltk poluted sMd ui elbow lengti if,l a\u0026 shaped turu, baïk cuR. là cut ilu38Sima: 16;,\u003e18 Th reI quires 0% yards of, erlal for a. 16- year oize. saures about 2%, yards at @h~o Vi th 'crêpe for -thei. uker. This style le' attràotivsfor glteapoplin, repp, with im1%, omreorslkfr nola al maocà nlr ga eg, hé boit may b. omitted. i7ï skiz s a*trslght and plaited sud la joined to the. dreesa under th boit. Tii. tucer may b. flnished wvitb Iongor hr sl.o.The.pt- tera la eut lu4 *A. Ï1 ..',8,1an1 yeer It requires Ilyrd f27mi mtral for an, 8 year eize. for thie guimpe, end 4 yards of 24 inch material for the drue. A pattern of t\"fillustration mailed, to any adclress on. receipt ;le n i ver or stampa.t 10.::sl' 1440-ÂTrimancl DalntyShirt Wzýst. ]Ladies' Shirt Watt wth Ragln Sisevo lu Wrlst or Short L.ngth-This attrac- t4ve dosign was dgveloped inblack and àd\"1edvd4thtfe1915'oat.crop- But that'e.tnçre1y th~e start of the harvest. Now..conie 1u~cousbrekf~stsstetuingfragrant, t o greet folks e'ý'er Thcp. cornes ,the fruition of Nature's object in niaking tWîs wondious'food. Wel-built brains and. bodies, vivacity, easity SPirtavind go. In nmilionti of homes there wîIl ripen in -this way the final fruit of this oat orop.ý Be sure you get your share. QuaerOats Vim-Food Made Doubly«-Delicious Soni. of the finst atsawiiich gréw thiio 7yewbave coome to. the'Quakepr basamill. :ut t, ntii qveoithos.e hoice ça*t ç uwpl-tiedi re dlsoarded in in kI, Quaker Oats. 'WW plek outtii. quem. rina-tii - .b ig, fuii-fiavorsd\" r grains. W. get butPr ten pounda of such we r oats from a busheL. premiu ma Thé lus'eioûs 9 usera,, \u003em gakeg knowu as and Alu Qukr *Oas are 'Se' fofdcýr made 0from thoge We Inert, grains ouly. 10c. piackaj 25c. round Th.t's the secret COUPOn..hi af thua favor sud value f2c srm.-And that'sà premiums why 1his rand in sent for the. world over. Quaker Oasais now the favorite where- ever oat loyers live. Some people send 10,000 miles te get .it. And some, lu, countries far away, pay a double price.. You eau get it -at .y9uf. neareet store, wlfh_ MIs\u003e ont any exra price.. akermany You eau get it al- kg at wsys, for t hi s e, jewer y brand neyer, varies. Utensils. Do't you think it i pckae. Worth w hi le to packangte. peify this grade, won in the lu buying a.- food ge. Each like thi ? erchandise It w orei ly on the you say you want lt-if you specify Quaker. Oats. Regular Package, 10c. Large Round Package, 25c Except in'Far West '1h. Quakter rQas (3mpany Peterborough,'Ont. Saskatoon, Saskc. I 'f1 M~54 the. foot. A pattern of hs illustration white checkedi tafeéta, witli collar snd xuiled to any address on receipt of 10e. cuiTe of white batistp. It wouid b. in silver or stampe. nice ln.. erepe de chine or cotton crepe, 1455-Â Unique aud Pleaing Design.% madras, lawn, batiste, poplin, repp, Ladies' Dres n Raised or Normal flannel or velvet. The long sleeve lias Waistliune with Siseve lu Rither of Two a. neat. cuiT with a dainty turnover. Lengths-As here shown, black\u003c velvet For the sleeve in short Iength the tiiru- was used,. with dotted net for the. back cuiT forme a suitable finish. Tii. sîees and insert sud white crepe for- collar le made in \"Quaker\" style, wide,ý the. chemisette and collar. The design with deep pointe sud round over the may be flnishe\u0026 with* short sleeves. The back. The patteru la eut lu G sizesel desigu les nice for taffeta, faille, serge, 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 luches bust gabardine or poplin and leude itself measure. It requires 2% yard,% of 44 nýieely to cosbinations of materials. In inch material for a 36 ineh size. green satin with ecru crepe for con- A\u003epattern of this illustration xnailed trast this model' wilI b. very attractive. to uùny address'on reoeipt of 10c. iluasl It je also nice in' white or other color ver or stampe. L taffeta,ý with batiste, net or lace. for 1430-An Up to Dàt-ékand Practièal trimming. The. pattern la eut in 6 Style. Girls' and ]Misses' Combinatioli sizes, 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inehes Corset Cover and Petticoat - Lawn» bust measure. It requires 61/2 yards of dambrie, batiste, crepe, o'r silk could'be 36 inch material for a 36 inch size. Tii. used for thie style. If developed sep- skirt measures about 31/4 yards at the arately the same materials are good foott A pattern of this illustration for both. Sateen or flannel eould alBo mailed to any address on receipt of 10e. b. uised for the petticoat. The mOfle in silv er or, starnps. may be oimittedi.The. pattern is eut 1456-A Simple Comnfortable Dress for in 5 sizes: 12, 14, 16, 18 snd 20. years. Mother's Girl.. Girls' Dress with Tucker It requires 31/, yrdsof h7 ii te- haying Sleeve in Either of Two rial for the skirt, and 1% yards for 'the lmiuî e offeri: to Qi Silverware minim' ýin eacb one cour age and t id, packag ls a me 2c. to app wanted. 4 j Gore LUngi land le g ixel eloth, waist finish skirt trimi patte 12 y (mci tract Vais mnode .featl: for rnay d0itei lengt neèat dnav 1 V'N",
         "Tii. W'tep, aseMmb *rifth r$âeyads Of 6Oinch fr$ mfor orh aô \u002614 yedr Nqw idPopular- Mode!.. Two '$.oe Czogiar Skirt (in .aU . ~ suiting was used in 5or, i1Wltie-hce gtance. The.style -shows. new es,, sud lis moot 'comforta-ble and tU. i la 'good for broa-d cloth, SsergeVOllol gabardine a-a lià desirable for linon -ê'ahfabie...The. losing is .the tuck a-p in front. The skirt ~ma I raised or normal waist- -The pattern is eut in 6 sizes: ~.26, 28, 30 and 32 inchea- waist It . I requires 28/ yards of 48 ;,tiÂ1 for a -24 inchi mie, *hich ùsie: about 3 yards at the foot. ~-ACharming Mode!.- Girls' in: Surptc. Style, * P our shown black 'and, *hi\" e silk was oom- bined with black taffeta. Th .desîgn is'iood also for cloth,erge,- velvet and silk or' satin, faille or ppn. The waist patter», 1438, is, eut ' 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40,.-42 and 44 inehes bust measure. The skfrt, 1430, in 6 sises: 22, 24, 26, 28, 30 anid 32 ihes waist mneasure. It requiros 3% y.s aOf nia terial 44 iches wide for tetuÉiie, a-nd 3%/ yards for the skdrt, 1%/ yards for fkie underwaist and Ive yards for the overwaist f6x a 36 inc4 \"iz. The skirt measures about 3 yards at the foot.« This. illustration cals .for -t*o sep- arate patter»s which will b. mailed t. any address. ou receipt of: 10c., for eacli pattoru in silver or etanVo.. 1434-A -aintyearmeut f0?tu te Hour of - Re st sandlepose-L\u0026MS ie'I- mono or Leunging- lobe--Sueh' pvtty patterns, i crepo, lawn,: batiste, dimity aud ilk may b. 6btaiù,ed-:forgaru*ents 7;4- o 14:39 81\u003c~~ T Core Skirt and Bleeve in Eltiier of Twoc Lengths - Checked gingham lu brown 1 and white lis hre showu. Thiâ style1 la good for serge, shepiiord checks,i mfixed suiting, echambrey, Devonshirei eloth, k-haki, percale and fla-miel. The1 VWa-jt is eut with surplice fronts andk hasa long ehoulders. The sleeve may be fliehed in wriet or elbow length. The *kirt is mnade with 4 gores and may be trimmed with a ja.unty pocket. The pattern is cut in 4 sizes: 6, 8, 10 and 1yeare. It requires 3 yards of 401 inch material for a 6 year siLze. 4 Waist 1438-Srirt 143-A Very At-4 tractive Gown Comprising Ladies' Over1 Waist, Pattern No. 143q, and Ladies' Shrt with Tumce, Pattern 1439-This Inodel has new and attractive style1 features. The overwa4st xnsy do duty for any aider blouse'or guimpe, and ma-y be miade without the pointed trim-1 ~g portions. The -leeve in wrist igth ha-a a deep euif, plaited at the enter part of the' arm, 'and in elbow length a snmrt'turubacïk cùff forms a neat finish. The tunie on the ekirti n'a-vbe omitted. The under or foum- d\"tion ekirt is lu tbree goreo. As here E cf this kind. This model expresses grace and comfort lu Its aimple -limes. Dainty pink and white lawn was*chosen\" with a neck finish of washable. edging, and a decoration of velvet ribbon. The pattern la- eut lu 3 ies: Smàll, ]me- dium aud largo. 'lt reqaires 6 yards. Of 36 inch material for a medfim gize. 1442-A ]Popular Pleaalug Styl. Girl' Suit with 1 Gored Plaited Skirt and Norfolk Blouse (Sleeve i ither-Of Two L.ngths)-As, here howii obecked gingham lu blue and brown, tome, w»s combined witii blue cbambroy. 'For comfort, style and practical features, this model ha-s mucii to reoomnmend it. The blouse may be fnshed with or without the ba-ck yoke facing, anad the beit ma-y be adjusted\u0026 at'Empire or low waistline. The shirt ia a 4 gore model, with plaïw dfulness. It ma-y be fin- ished with- the skirtband or joined to an underwaist. The leeve in to be made lu wrist length, with a ba-nd euaf, or flnjo~ed at elbcw length with a tari'-' back -cuf. The patter\" in eut iu 4 aizes: 8, 1%~ 12 and 14 years. It re- quires 5y/4 yards of 44 inch material for a 10 year,sirz. OS! 4detormiination to make my work S'muo, writeufr booldet ud f ither pardiIam Mr.En COATES- lQ»ý, 224 ~IHS'VE, INJ Phono Main M9 Ish'eri sa under fiaushed 'ho .pat. anud- 12 27 inch for the inaterial n'ailed, 1 Sleeve attrae- ack andc Lr and \u003eud b. L crepe, ,repp, ve ba-s irnover. e ttirii i. The e, wide, rer the ibust of 44 mailed in W-l- ractical 1Lawn, mud le d Sep- e good Id also ruffle ijecut yeas. mate- for'the :008",
         "ts, *ifbpro \u0026btbyare able te go , a.4 ~ rt»WStftheounùàt4. woùldoa thliam' »Ort l1tete, I hope ~li~i*it.témë.e. y àdreis s l WIêlSEGlot.I *11 igumyseif, Y -~. rowu.eéyed Ravenshoe. '# ~ with otherýsshil ed, plain envî ;à~ ~t o ' Oear ]Mtci3r4plxer Iu~,psp tie we.ernerwlhson e jjere,\u0026 And. a. 1 aid k~~~ tii a, erilSor I dobav bosihe g.to1Iuit. quher iteau I upJuýthe we stghr'IlL~oobte wlel i t to nAjb u u r' te - Saskatehewan, JÙlY 23, 1015. ýDear'Editor,-Like many othets I arn Ju ht .nwsubscriber, and, arn itere-sted tii 'orrspudence. Column. Have o, en dhetie prrvlis of reading your valusbli papeti buÙ1l e èver lad the couage *itô . JI Uve oia, fam, but tii.1S!, O ,ài*11 as tbe people, are uew â* ILikemot, young girls I ýnr foM4''o Ue, and s\" lifela 80 very quiet libre 1 tio1ght I *ouhd like to exeang .Ôtàpndeeewith any who would cUr e 1o wit.I enjo reading, un-aetut ranb, r Wo1 books. Ho* of' rax ke* tro eers have read book byI! êMCun 1 1lam one of the. maIIIIItII vmreitng for lie r next .,-bool t ic, 0* Ou tt Arnfond ,oflfauey worki t6êj anùd wouId 1ke to excbange pattergs Wt làUà fl.aAthene.\" 7LI ag ewth 1.M. R. on patriotism, aise ielne's» advliee te \"Mere Bache- Ion\" aemé qit ernet. I would ike very mueh to. sec my letter lu print. Will close, wisliing the Editor aud read- ers of Thâ Western Rome Xonthly every ùcess. kfy addross fa wlth the Editor. MI ayours eyqsincenely, - Martha.\" Why #uûfet fram. corne *hen thge an be paInIesIy' rooted out by using HollowaY's Côrn Cure. »I*ê MontIÈIy \"Wo iselau'ai Books ai4MusWIc Winnipeg, Ang. 12, 1915. Desar. Edtor,-Ihav#i been a reader of The Wèetern Home Mônthly for lesithan A y.éi, nd I must saky-1 greittliappre. ciate ýits contents. \u0026aturally, being a âttadent, I arn interested iu the Phlloso- pher., I aliýp h1d miny other valuable àrticIÈs, especialiy ini \"Household Sig- gestions\" is I arn batching it this suml-- nier, and I feel *sure 1I ai» learn front your.valuabie pape; how to cook. When wiIl the girls ever lose their conceit, and admit that they are not tbe oniy eues Who qeau cook weil? It le- tbe suggestion of Miss Grace in the August number that inspired me to write: \"Dou't yen think It would be nice if we discussed music, aud books lu the correspondence cohunin.\" -Yes i \"Mies Grace,\" I believe it would. Musica fls the roul with gladness, and good books provoke lofty thouglits and higli ideals. The discussion of new books and new mnusic would be a valuable hlp to the readers of the Correspondence Cohurnn. I Wouid like à. fe* oU the reader\u0026 to express. an opinion on Hall Caine's book, \"The Woman Thou Gaveet Me,\" or on Charles Kingsiey's \"Hypatia,\" or'Haw- thorne's \"Scariet Lter,\" and also on \"Tipperary\" as a war song. Wbat bas become of the \"British Navy\" and \"Sol- diers of tbe King?\" Hlave they taken a back seat for \"Tipperary T\" My address le with the Editor if anyone wishes to write. Student. Western Home Monthiy as a Cure for the \"Blues.\" Ontario, August 11, 15 Dear Editor,-Ahthough not a sub- seriber, I bave long been a devoted reader of your splendid paper.- The Correspondence Column always has a special interest for me, and as a' neyer- failing specific for that malady so -;'--~-~**~i--~ -~ --1-,~ -~ NEROUSDySPEPSIA Ah.ma ndPalaloni,-Strlking Success of Dr. Cassell's Tablets *the AI-BÉritish Remedy o f WorId-Wide Populart.m nloe dyjr tI1i baCànà\u0026daWho read this true otory cannot fail to get new hope from its perusal. Mh l MS t4 WiealUnd, Bristol, England, had suf ered from acute nervous Dyspepsia for eleven yeare.-0rdinary treatmernt had f ailed to do her any good, yet Dr. Cassell's Tablets cured lier completely. Could more convincing prooôflf the valuê of this great medicine be off ered? Mn.Rogrs aya \"I isquite ceveu yars since I llnst bèganute be troubled. with pain and wind after f ood, and ail tit tinte I was neyer quite free frorn Dyspepsia. Frequently I had frightful attacks of pain in my chest, and w:fld in àuchqtltities3 that It timoat choked me. My heart would paipitate tili I went quite faint. 1 was very nervous, toc;,go nervous, in fact, that my husband lias actuaily stopped the dlock because I could m ~ -not bean the ticking The resuit of ail this s.uffering was that 1 became quite thin and anaemic, and no weak that if I tried to do iny housework I teirply1 Cento.fainted. I had to pay to have it dont- for me. Iatterly I could not get about the house witihout support, and I used to turn the broorni upsidé down and use it1 as a sort of crutch. At night I always had peppermint by xny bedside to relieve * fuie wind. NPVclufto av mUBS.LT. 5ANC imiiuiliii émou 6\" umw iéIl haW à t iaI~ te . éimiluIUasp~tt eNo. - ',Mf course, 1 bad the best treatment, but 1 got no0 better. They told me t have iny teeth oit, and that 1 didn't. want to do. But wvhen I got Dr. Cassll'a Tableta, whab aa changel They relieved me ahinost at once, and as 1 peýsevered ,with thein, all my pain, wind, headaches, and other troubles gradualiy disappeared and iiow I arn in splendid hcalth. I can eat any kind of food and arn stronger than I -have been for years.\" WVhat le the'explanation of these cures? How isit that Dr. Cassell's Tabelts eau restore healt4~so surely? It is because they act as alhcalth for-ce, renewling- ,itality of nerve and body, and compelling healtliy action of every Jife pro- ,cess. Tbey are a reliable reinveiv for f % Nervous Breakdown Neurasthenia Kidney Trouble Malnutrition Nerve Failure Sleeplessness Dyspepsia Wasting Infantile Weakness Anaemia -ctomacei Disorder Palpitation 4111( are specially valutable for in irsiigng otliir.g and younig girýsl s approacli::g m-oinanhood. AI! Druggists andi otklprst1roih iitte 1oniniotn seliDr. Cassell's Tàblets at 50 cents. iiopein ott1.N-:g districts sl:oti:d keep D)r. Cassell's Tablets bv thini in case of ehuznv A'. Drevalent' amng we old bftchelors, tlue lues,\" it takes the idin9 off the cake. Of althe many topice that have cone tip for discueàicu 1 thinýc that the old thonie, love, bias. been the most\\ popular and perhaps the most abrnsedm Does any- one knéw what love really is ? A certain bigh-brow, I mean a college professor, bas discoveree that it is a mild fôrm of insanity., And was It Sherman gr Jes Wiflard that sa.id that an engagement was \"'a misunderstanding between two fools ?\" Poor'oid Sunset Bill, didn't they hand it out to you, though? But your Water- loo is coming, neyer fear. Somne day you will fail, yes, actually fall, in love witli some meek, dçmure little insiden, anid iafter.,\u0026he has led pyou safely up to the climax, and you get down on your knees te propose to her ini the most conven- tional manner, with your heart a-thump- inig like a motor boat, she bands you your qlmietus. ÀA'Colàd'feeling steals around your heart when it siowly dawns upon yoaù thaf she bas been flirting with you. I was quite amused at your challenge, Scout. J3y ail means accept it \"Dido.\" And I suggest that \"Freda\" acts as judge, and that the loser has to give ber a cushion on whièh is worked a design of a blonde (peroxide) girl. By the w4y, Freda, wby al that grouch against those perfectiy defenceless blondes? I bave xny own opinion that you bave bad one for a. r,:val in some school girl love affair. Now,' 'fesUp. I noticed a very good letter iu the June number signed by \"RLigbt Hot Thistie.\" He le quite right in bis assâe' tion tbat those of us wbo are unable to enlist cau be just as useful to the Empire here at borne as those brave boys are at the front. But to be a patriot and stili remain at home, one bas to do \"hie bit\" by giving money and helping lu SEND FORA FREE BOX A free sanîple b* will bc seunt you on receipt of 5 cents for mailing and packing, by the sole agents for Canada, 11. F. Ritchie and _Co., Ltd., 10, MecCaul-street, Toronto,, Ont. Dr. Cassell's Tablets are mnanu- factured solelv bb' Dr. Cassell's Co., Ltd., «Manchester, England. lu It J.S cal for s-r tare -w 1",
         "The Western Honm MNnthly Ueu-SA elo rs, thlé thêe cake. Lave corne t the oid t\\ pepular Dees any- A certain rofesser, lfôrr o f ngr Jess gagement ween two :bey hand ir Water- a. day you love with ien, and ip te thie our knes t conven- a-thump- auds you ig steals ly dawns n flirtiug challenge, t \"'Dido.\" acts as give bier a design the wt4y, !et those E bave niy on. for a air. Now,' r iu the gt Hot is assl\u003c1 unabie to ie Empire beys are triet and ;o do \"bis elping in frrnu ~I±,n ~ lace, rom the peasant workers of Bu Due to the war these Englisl lace-makers are in real need. ujust, this struggle is not of t] ing, but these peace-loving folk f erers. Therefore purchases no good deeds aa well as profitable Yeu'll be delighted with the we want to send yu. Write fo Mu. PEJRL A1mxt'R N;i\"ara Falh.ont. SONO POEMS money writing sn ams. Past cx: ncssary. urpropostion Pasitively Wacetavailable work for publicat cure copyright in your name. Our coi, 'est ofanycompanyoflitskind. Haveea of dollars ta writers. Send us your son Inelodies today ar write for instruCtiv its free. -Morks-Ooldsnth Ce.. Sept. 84, Whlire writing advertisers pleaE The Western Home Manthly. -NFA NTUM. jMoi r Sd le was lu a Véry Methers canuot watch their children te6 losely for signs of choiera iufantg;m, ~this disease carnes off thousauds of Ilfata cluring te hot summer mrnths. Unr. Cee. W. Garland, Presser Brook, ).,writes: ' Lest summer my -boy j , c, then a ycar oId, was taken sick with ebiera infantuin. He was se bad thse watte matter frein thc bowels looked a. I t had corne frein a broken bell. I ont- word te ttie docter whe was at a -n\"lor's,- about a mile distant, and he suy bey was lu a very daugerons eàùdtion. H. sent me some tablets wUiic madie ie cbild vomit, snd viien hi learned that, tliy causcd vomitiug -b# sent me more -tablets te stop it. Iu tii. meautiifle I batI been giving Dr. iowler's Extract of Wild Strawberry, which I continued using, and when tic bottie vas ail used rny baby was cured. I theugh it only fair te let yen knew about it.\",1 Dr. 1Power's Extract of Wild Straw- berry lias becu on tse market for the. past 70 ycars, sud le kuowu frei n ee end of Canada te the other as a positive cure for ail bowel complants. When yen ask for \"Dr. P~ower's\" b. sure yen get wbat yeni ask for as there a areny rank imitations on thi. market. The. genuine is mauufactured by Thse T. Müiburu Ce., IÀ\u003cited,, Toronto, Ont. -\u003e ric.. 35 cents. j. Ladies Stvo Your Coiubings I We eau make 3=urcom b!n p Sinto a Wtchandt wny oul YOU 50 centa an aunce.. Send us your 00o1mbing-it Will surrie yu to se he fine switc thate. je eout of even a mai quatity of hair. (oepodnsInvited on matters reittn t bar.Advee tfe. D.J. Kein, Proprietor Mit.e alrr«nlug Parlers 207 New Enderton Buildiag WINNIPEG Mer., Alta., Aug. 1, 1915. Dear Editer, - .fter reading \"Juat Me's\"l letter iu aur May number, I tbougbt, niaybe, sbe andtheii rest ef the ircle would lilce te hiear from t beautiful a gentleman bachelor and big !iew straight On the subject \"Just Me\" introduced, Liks, Eng. narnely, that western. bachelôrs are net gentlernanly; so e be.goeesMiss sebool àh peasant 'eacher conteuds we are ungentlemaiiiy, Just Or because soe of us ameke, others chew hir mak- beastly, I agree); but if a bachelor gets ce are suf- a littie cempany andI satisfaction ont \"of ow wiIl be a pipe of, tdLacc after a bard day's te you work in the field, andI batching besides, rebokis titis ungentlemantily? lsay, no, ab r i t-da.be does not look for auxy Sypathyvrorn the. girls lu his lnli os,ýr esimple DNG, reason, he la gettiug wisé te thés. west- ern girls. I consider myself à, gentleman stili, altbough I have batched and f armed f6r five years, andI after it al I retain MYmanners, wblch 1 waa taught by WANTD moherand at school,. As before, I stil fio. pBica have the samé respect for,' pure wornan- :perience un- hood, andI look te, the2n fer nebler* andI e unequaled. higiier ideals. But after living in this Mpoin Stffwestern cotintry a few years a man la )aidhundreds liable te acti a littie différent, simpiy \u003eng poemls or because the young wemen bave aitered iebooket- 4,sgh.. D. C. him lu bis manners. Why should't a inau raise bis bat te females ln thé -- coutry, as well as du the city? Because s-- mention 1 have heard thbe remark (softly) wheu a man bas been polite, several other lu- everr, possible way. - Are ve doing it?1 Let us solemnly aak ourselves that ques- tion, fellow readers. I arn afraid that I bave already out- doue mywelcome by rnakiug this, my first letter se long. Will close with be',t wishes te the Editer -and al bisenu readers. A Voice. from the East. X Plourishlng Nercliant at 21. Marebveli, Saak. Aug. 9, 1915. Dear Edtor,-I bave nov taken yeur paper, The Western Home Menthly, for Over a year, and find it very intereeting, espccially the Correapoudence COlumn. I bave Ibeen geing te, write béfere, but did net get tirne, and bope that rny letter will escape the W.PB. I amn a merchant, bave a atere ber., amn a little over 21 years of age. I bave some proprty in Ontario, andïsoenu Britishi Columbia. I bave a new two-eated Ford car this year. I am English. Hlave dark browvu eyes, brown hair, weigbt- 165 pounds, bot temper., Well, I hope .1 aal se. this letter in-Print, dear Editer, alid boPing some of Yeu people viii write te me. I yull a igu myself -as Kid. A Lucky ReaLer. Fort Saskatchewan, Alta., \u003e July 26ith, 1916, Dear Editer andI friends-I 'ýhave read The. Western Home Monthiy nov for over. a year, and especiaily the. Correspondence Colurnn . There bave been several letters this summer on -the question of love, both as te cures for andtii. degnition of love. SoÉieoe 1 gave a recipe f'or curing love. Does -she really imagine that there is a cure for \"«true love?\" NO, Sir!1 There is ne cure. It cernes te StaY, andI tbrougb ail trials and diBappoint- ments, \"true love\" is tii. geateat of helpers. Some of your iueky readera, 'Who, lik. inyself, bave fouud the one and only girl oni earth, wilI doublegsS0errObOrate titis stateinent Ânother correspondent aya b. 'bas found (hie bird snd vanta te get rnarried, but does net 1k. te until bc bas a nest made. To hlm I would sugge8t that the. twe of tbem will inake the nest rnuch quicker than ho alone. I àmea bired man on a farm and had the cheek -te fall in love witb a farrner's daughter, and we are bôth satisfied vith rny position as long as we bave eacb ether. This, I think,' is tru. love, lu its truet seuse, where the. girl is prepared, te. lower her position and undergo bard- slips andI de without little thinge s'he bas been used te liaving ail lier Ife for the xuýn ahe loves. what do your read- ers think ? Hope this escapes the. W.P.B. 1 wil aigu myseif, -\"Aberdeen.\" aTii, Otier Side Of the Story.\" UWfnts to Settle Dowei\" Dear Reader,-Just a lin, te greet yen. I bave a f.w questions te ask. First of ail, I muet explain. myseif. I amrn a Englishman viio bas been out ber. lu th%~ west elght years. I amn married, but bhave ne famill. I wsh te ask Toen ail If you eau put me andtheti. if. vise te g.t inte teuch with smre one wbo wouid employ us te look after a hornestead\u0026 Would like te get back te tithe prairies. I justi love farrnlng; I am used te it, and jirn aise a good gasoline engin. Man. Am a life abstailuer snd net a bit afraid of work, but I amn tired of b.ing a *anderer ou the face of the. oerth, ana just visb te settie devu and make a berne for te best andI deareat girl lu the word-my wife. Now, eau anyone find tirne te let me bave a lin. lu anaver te my ques- tions. I amn afraid. the. Editer will put this iu the. W.P.B. Once more, good *isheeu..teail ry friends of tthe dear old Western Home Montbiy. I now close, bepiug te see this iu print. Address with' the, Editor. Home Lover,, B.C. SnuD Biut. Potent.-Parmelee's Vegetable Pils are small,,\" but they are effective in action. Their fine qualities as a corrector of stomach troubles are known ta thousands and they are in constant, demand everywhere by those who knôw what a safe and simple remedy they are. They need ne introduction to those acquaintcd with them, but ta those who may not know themn they are presented as the' best preparation on the. market fo~ disorders of the stoinacb nit stances, I could tell of whbioh\u003e would prove oyoir tbit,.the oo untry git*ls¾lo' 1e areciate filue manners iuan'\u0026' a therefoe, we can't expect them te zteila gentlemanzfrom the opposite. If yeu are polite: ,te tber, n, d0oft9r assistance where 'it would be gegt1ea manly to do se, b. prepared te b. treated with a very cooèl and indifferent, air, instead of a thank you, or a polit., muswer iu thie negative. For.instance, 1 know of a young lady wbo .was caught in a tiiimdrstormn, and the ligbtnilng was bad, and, l1k. most girls, ahe 'was nervous, a- young man with whom \u003eahé was very: well acquaintçd, offered to escort lier bornsd, as per *usal, wae treated.withjanything but politeness. :Of course, she aecepted the. offer, but the. feilow neyer r.ceived the. thank yen,4 whicb would have giron him a,, very différent opinion of tat YOU l~Byt6 wha heao f- er' a pr»Mu. eme-are the acta Of DU1 mannerswhicii burt a ma's eelings, ad,.afte\u003er al,- wiiy la lb tiiese girls can't, b. a littie more polit., and natural. 1 amnsure, if WOud îMe things. go aleng muai bett4r luin, th country. Many à. piale and sca a been a failure viiere l l tfty.XWn off with a swing just beèauae the youn9 ladies have made therneeves objectici. abl..Wbat la the O\u0026u5G ofet t ii,1 t becauae tiiy uhink - teeoh t ek lif 3\"i dresa-why, it la- nothing elue but dzrma they talk cf; du that case lw. » expeet -tiem te And Urnà.i for nebler thoughits and rellectien. I1 k. te is a girl smart \u0026anu neat in ber dreis, but pleasa let un have a littIe mote smat.- nes lu nianner. Sur.ly, tii. uo li#te enougii. Believe me, the.naneaw~ comrnand more respect from youw friem than the, excess of dress would. Iis l geing. omre when a girl gel. sncb * awollun . ead , that just because db May b., imperative that ber father abouli wear, overals, ah. la asha2ned for hb« girl friena te ee iim. Why siiould * man b. deaplsed just becaus. hie occu- pation vil not permit hm ta vear a mmart suit; yet, bi s cup\u0026tion rnlgbt b. more noble tban. the reïl estat. mi]L. and ne doubt his MMOeY vOUl b. cléaner.. Weil, Juat .m, yen beins a sebool teacher, I would say you vere in a better position tlian us I\u003eachOlffs tO look alter tbis manuer teachlng for 1 vas tauht bm, et sabool, as veil as At home.. Hope Ithave îaot offended anycue, but thes truuli will eut; se yen young ladies read crefuly .very veek the. youn-laesppage--urs truly, . ½1ir. Bachelor.\" byCIo utiS.. CLAY GIOVEPIv's iSV.USS. 5. U. W 1- -11 be its le F. 10, nt. nd.",
         "The' Western -Home Mon thly Vegetale Comb\"ntim--Pick aver \"td wash cge-holl peck d offpnah. Cook in au umcovered verni with a lr0 quantity of bolling aalted witer te Wthm asbeen added one-halltealmoof cf a nad oite-àthfd euoofuiofsoda. Tisumeth- 0caum, the inach'to WWtii ita green ~btop,:and add three table- \"FOO feIU rone tab\u003eeavonful o md eu nd e-bail cpfu of créam.Rpe- and pec noabu~ee border or d4n mogd adlet stand lie keep bot inaa plan fflbot water plaoe la the omen. te- itiove f r9m tli old lie hot el gdiai. FOI ecouler with aMliboilod- beeta cof uni- forr aime, aeaacmed withbutter,. sait d pe, surround wth.sctona cf lad oepflei egg a' etiE*ths Ienetwise, and pour around ene ana one-haif cupfule of -whit»euce.,This vegetle combina- #Aon la exireniely goodanjýe appetising, and the cler acheme of it la very pleasing. CreOB'nofCo1O Su-Ti, ebaa 7. 'Taie threeheada of oelery, wash quart of Water colcalwly for a hall hour; plire. tbroue, a clander urgjust a m uh of the telery as oeibe.ut;7 a double. bolier wth one -quart cf nil. Pub together tbree tablespoonfuls of but-, ter'udthree of fleur; add to th loup and =ountil smooth . ad thick; add a tee-» t\"o.ful and abalf-f sait andadiof sewed Apples and Ptatoe-FPare the 1 ~Ut intc, moderately omail pieces andpaboiluntil almiot done. Dramn off the wate, eaving only enough te prevent the potatoe f rom adherrng letheape; plaean'eual anpuat cf tart apples, miled coredand eut ina eths, on top. Cover and let thé stear cook thora. Whetn teadet mix thoroughly, maah alght1lr or te an even consistency as mnaY ho desired, and add a toaspoon of butter or good fat frora a roast to »-bout every quart cf ililture. This dish may ho usod for in - nier or as a eeparate luncheon diali, and s aerved with somne meat gravy or brownod bacon and onions as a sauce. It cm hoe nieely re.hoated with or without browning as a potate, omelet. The kind cf apples uaod 'varies the flavor greatly. Stuffod Cabbage-The idigeatibility of f reah pork oni aceoirat cf the large pelcent- age f fat it contai la ar oly octed la the f ollowing dish . Theadm ireO f bread and eggs reduces Ibis pereentage and the requit la a very wholeomne,, palatable and dedidedly inexpensive dish. Procure one pound cf lban freah pork VerY flnelY chopped. Be surenet te use sausago meat ormeat mnto which ' 1, md fat have been freely mixed. Ac r this ltwo cupa cf stale bread orub, two eggs, well beaten together, two level teaspoona cOf sait, One- hf teaspoon each cf ground nutmeg, swoet marjoram and thymne, one teaopoon cf ecreped onien, a dash of pepper, hoet watthr enough go it wll stick toethor, from four tableepoona to one-haif cup. Chopped parsley coery sait and sage 'nay be added, But are not neeesaary. Now place a cheese- cloth in a colander or mixing bowl, remove the largetad moisit perféct leavea whole from a head cf cabbage, aud arrange them lu a forma sirnilar to the cabbage, on the cheesecloth. Inside of Ibis place the meat farci in a round loaf, iap the cabbage leaves te make àà flr'n a covering as possible and tie the cheesecloth -to hEtold linlushape. Cook this for one heur lu sufficient boilmng water te just cever, using one level table- npoocf sait te tvery quart cf water. A *aitebotte'n of the kettie in which it ila boiied jes a great heip lu lifting il eut. Serve with white sauce. Inistead cf boiled, thia dish may aise ho braised, lu which case the cabbage leaves, have te, be boiied from ton te ffteen minutes before thoy are placed around tho meat. Coeked lu this way the dish ils eerved with some roast gra ~. S Babette Sandwiches are made from halved Scotch sconies or muffins buttered and spread with apricet preserves. Add a la'yer cf whipped and sweetened cream. Peach and Macareon Dainties are de- licious and satisfying. The mouids are made of peach pulp and sweetened whipped crea'n stiffened with geistlue. Nea, iv ail chiidren are subject to worns, alnd pmail are hem iwith thien. Spare theil suffe riiig' iv uiiing motliir Graves' Wormn Extrn in tr, t i e )e t riecd y of t he kind that cati J e iîad. Charlotte. Russe roquires tho, yolka cf four, egp, four talemmnpoonfule cf t g t tablespoofuls cf powdered m=ei lved in one cupfui ef hot milk and two cupfuls and a haif cf whippod ereara. Flavor and place lu rounds cf cake. Raisin Bread 18 Easily Made--Sift two pounda cof flour inte a basin, add one deesertaponful cf sait, a quarter cf a pound'cf lard, and half a poundeofraisiiis. In awiell in the conter of the fleur crumblo one compresaed yeaat cake stir mi one cup- fui cf milk aad acupfuleof ukewarmwater until more than hai lmxd toa batter; on tIhe meaty portion thon filin thi'a recptale ith a higÎAy seaaoned bread 'dreain, aeutfrom the breast of ai veal sm traafrm into- a tender and tooth- 1Or, the breast of veai cut into pieces of£ uniform size makes one of the most palatable of stews cither alone or with potatoos, by dropping smnail squares of bakinmg powder dough iito the pot thirty minutes before the stew is dished' a most delicious pot pie is the resuit. h miight ho weil to add in this connection that the covere of the pot must not be lifted even for an instant, after the dumplinge are drobped in or they will be tough and Soggy. Again, stew breast of veal until thor- oughly done, seasdn highly and thiecen Daughters of the King of Buigaria. In Europe it is the belief that it is oniy- a inatter of time when the father of these two charmng girls will be drawn into the world war. A new photograph of the Prircess Eudoxia (lef t), and ber equaliy attractive sister, the Princess Nadejda (rigbt), as they appeared in the garden of thieir father's palace at Sophlia, ]l,,Idgar i a The Prindess Eudoxia was born in 1898, and ber sister was born tlie year iolwn.They bave two brothers, Crown Prince B3oris, now twenty-one years oid, and Prince Cyril, boni in 1899. Their niother, niow dead, ivas Marie Louise, daughter of Duke Robert of Pama. Their step-mother was the Priricess Eleonore of Reuss-Kostritz, who distinguished lberseif witb ber Red Cross work in the Russojapanese ivar. cover in a warmn place for forty minutes-, then work in the rernaining flour. Adtf lukewarin water if needed to makeý a ight dough; then leave agaîn for an hour. Di- vide luto smal baves, leave for fifteen minutes, then bake lu a moderate oven for fort.y minutes.i Breast cf Veai - Housewîi'es in gen- erai dg not appreciate the cuinarY 1pos- sîbilities cf the breast cf ve.i, whichl i lioth inexpeasive and savory. but reg:trd if in Ille light of a tnatke-shift wIîen no otiter (-tt canbe had. BY li:ving the hutcher opta t11)Ille ipocef- twhich lies' bctweetî Ille e nus the liquior to the consistency of gravy. Remove frotn t he fire and pick eut bones andi grist le. Then bake betweeia two crusts like chickea ipie, which, indeed, On s er of t uh like in lpoint cf taste. One f te iosttoofbsonie ways cf se rving brewst of veai and Ille One icasi known s ..as foI1owvs. leî t etinto ral lier stti~iii ieces, ienit tew tentier anti season. Lift ouf aeul dip each piece in b1e Mt ieti olk .of egg, idredgt w if h ut-ead rttta utA frv a.1goldeil brown. T,(esoi ol:uTi ,,tin lit ili Ql oi f experi- ente anrentteulweo ilu llaîii- Household Suggestions k r..' 56 à champ Dlnnat Soak a quar of Haricot beans ln water ailnigt. utthem in two quarts of wtrsdsimmer tiil tender. (From two ito three hours on a serap of flue wlll do thi.) Slice two or three onions flnely,fq them, in somne drippmng or fat, then put Mn the beans, peppor and sait. Fry- tili nicely browned. Don't throw awyay the water the beans were etoweè'ln, it is full of nour.. ishment. With popper, sait, a littie milk and thickening of flour and flavorlng of onion and parsley, it mak\u003ces delicious soup. Very good foç?df or chikiren or invalids. To Roast in, a Saucepan This saves fling. It 18 a good way to cook email thick piecès of meat on a emal slow ire. A astout iron pot with lid is needed. Put in a littie. fat or dripping when it smokes put in the meat, turn it ti each ide 18 browned. This makes a seal to keep in the juice. Draw the pob4o the aide of the fire, keeping the lid on, shaklng occasionally to prevent burning. Allow twenty minutes for each pound of meat. Cooking Green Vegetables Prepared for The Western Home Monthly, by Abby L. Marlatt, Home Econom- ice Department of the University of Wisconsin If we think of vegetables in terms of the 85 per cent to 95 per cent of water diluted with color, flavor and a smail amount of eolids, then the price of water masquerad- ing as vegetables seems high. ,But, if we think of the need for flavor and minerai matter to induce a botter ap- petite and keep the body ini good health the purchase of the vegetable, in season, wiil seem less costly than tonics from the drug store. It is most important when prèparing vegetables to save the portion which gives flavor and that which provides the minorai 'natter needed by the body. At ieast 20 per cent of al l ion required by the body has its source in vegetabies. Experimente have shown that flavor and minerai matter are lost in Iess or greater measure when these vegetabies are cooked in too much water which is later thrown away. It is best to useo as littie water as possible iu boiling green vegetabies and to keep this water to be used later in soups or sauces. The loes of minorai matter from vego- tables through boiling may be as hig has 36 per cent in spinaeh, celery, abbge, Brussels sprouts, cauliflower, carrots and not more than six per cent when these same vegetabies are steamed. Flavor, when its source is from a pro- ducts which is readily given off in steamlng may be retained by cooking at tempera- tures below the boiiing point. It is for this reason that peas, asparagus, celery cucumbers, and carrots should be cookeil at simmertng temperature. Strong flavor may bc lessened by eook- ing rapidly in open vessels. This is truecof cabbage, cauliflower, onion, and pepper. Cabbage may be \"cooked\" at the 'end of twenty minutes. ILonger time develops strong flavor and, in hard water, inay d;trk- en the colorn Those fresh green vegetables which con- sist of leaves and stems may Le steamed; or may ho cooked without added water if heat is applied siowly, causing the water in the leaves to escape in such amounts that the plant cooks in its own juices. Dýeicateiy flavored vegetables, as pes, string beans, squash, and rutabagas, mnay be served lu their own juices, seasoned only by sait, pepper, and butter. Brussels sprouts are improved in flavor if cooked in mneat broth made as for soup stock, or in water flavored with bouillon cube. Car- rot s, ceiery, cucumbers and surmèr squash mnay »be. improved in appearance and flavor by first eooking in water, then drain- ing andi üovering,ý7ith white sauce. âmagcen vegetables are cheapest in the s.. ffl of the year when they are most nee ded by the human body. At other soasons, the expense is f ar beyond the ben- efits to be derived fromn their excessive use. Canned vegetables then shouid take their place even though t1ue flavor and minerai matter inay not be so batisfactory.",
         "(From tw 0 aire Will do 3 finely, fIr Ihen put iii the water ull of four- littie miik Iavoring of MiOUS soup. invalids. pan )od way' to on a smail with lid is r drï * akes a meal pob4o the )n, shaking rig. Allow of mneat. bles - Monthly, Econom- rersity crms of the ,ter diluted amount of nasquerad- for flavor better ap- ood health in season, s from the preparing ïhich gives ,he minerai U least 20 the body flavor and or greater are cooked ter tbrown ,e water as Eles and to in soups or .rom vege- ashigh as arrots and these same ùm a Pro- a steaming b tempera- It is for us, celery be cookei 1 by cook- s is trtie of id pepper. the 'end of develops may dirk- which con- steamed; d water if te water in ounts that ~as Peas, agas, may soned only Brussels cooked iný 'ock, or in .be. Car- ,ir squash ance and hen drain- ,e. )est ini the are most At other 1 the ben- ýssive use. take their d mninerai . 44.",
         "A \"PerfetIly Balanced Food te flour is recognized and used byA - ail civilized \"races as a staple e FýESýideth-samtrne p OS\"-NUTR'TIO 0 otIstuffs;à n ls4nur toubeeause tco ýrer!w't ssue 'arrd ,fLrni nry Mpare r6Vi4eenergy/ g)téà;ô''no*r' ad beefr, mu1 re B'read'andl ra YEP R, wheth#r, you y Vancouver or ,.nîp-g it in Hàifà4 , Ths4\u003e, b 4e miIIed to argr y~n . Ilbs e eGnd i'sm ing, standard by reasonof .its hiith quality and its~ uniformlity. A -finer flour carmot be made. rWhe Li UbiyVU~I you' buy aflour o nQown goodn es-known to the wholesaler andl the, retailer-known tr the' public. Vour grocçr, will refund -your money if you do I flot fond PURITYto be''better than any other flour. WE'STERN' CANADA FOIUR MILI[j MILLERS\u003e TU TII9 PEU » '~ \" ~ IC homical . La b@ratory ...... q 'I eéý1"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Western home monthly. : Vol. XVI. No. 10. (October, 1915)"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "source" : [
         "Scanned from a microfilm held by Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06912_190",
      "label" : "Vol. XVI. No. 10. (October, 1915)",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06912_190",
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06912"
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06912_190/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "subject" : [
         "Canada -- Biography.",
         "Canada -- Biographies."
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "Sons of Canada : short studies of characteristic Canadians"
      ],
      "creator" : [
         "Bridle, Augustus, 1869-1952.",
         "Challener, F. S. (Frederick Sproston), 1869-1959."
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Title from title screen.",
         "Tod \u0026 Cordingley, p. 41",
         "Watters (2nd ed.), p. 470",
         "viii, 279, [1] p., [16] leaves of plates : ports. ; 21 cm."
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : J.M. Dent, 1916."
      ],
